,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,Data Engineer,-1,"Why you'll love working here:

Zylotech is a fast-growing company that rewards autonomy and creativity. Our team works hard, is fast and collaborative, and we encourage personal growth. There are many opportunities to work with other departments where you can interact with some incredibly talented people.

What you’ll do:
Coordinate with Product management and technical stakeholders to continue building our SaaS product data + decision pipe
Perform architecture design, data modeling, and implementation of Big Data platform or Data pipe
Architect and develop big data solutions on either AWS or GCP cloud platforms
Set up and manage big data infrastructure to ingest and process data from multiple sources for Enterprise customer deployment
Create scalable & robust data pipelines to transfer data from source to destination data stores
Player and coach across a team of big data engineers, ML engineers, data scientist towards agile shipping of features and milestone
What we seek:
Prior experience in building, developing, architect scalable big data applications from grounds up preferably in product startups.
2+ years of experience in Data Engineering
Experience working with Big Data stack, Big Map Reduce, Hive, Kafka, Impala, Hadoop, Big Query, Spark SQL, Spark Streaming, HBase etc
Experience in Databases (NoSQL and SQL)
Experience in creating Data-warehouses and scheduling automated ETL jobs
Experience in Docker and Kubernetes
Good Communication Skill, both verbal & written. Confident in communicating with business & technical stakeholders alike.
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science or a related field of study.
Important Personal Attributes:
You are curious about technology & science.
Team matters.
Challenging yourself is an intrinsic part of who you are.
Sharing and debating ideas to get to the right answer is important to you.
You seek to act and don’t wait to be told.
You like to teach those around you.
You are serious about your work but also believe that laughter and levity are important.
You work hard and you also have passions outside of work that enrich your life.
Winning is important to you, but so is how you win.
You take pride & ownership in building a Product and company who is disrupting an industry.
About Zylotech:

Zylotech is a self-learning customer intelligence platform that helps marketers create complete customer profiles for targeting revenue opportunities more effectively. Powered by AutoML, the platform continuously unifies and enriches internal and external data, and performs ongoing micro-segmentation, pattern discovery, and recommendations, all while integrating with a variety of marketing clouds for on-demand accessibility. Zylotech’s cross-industry clients have reported up to a 6x increase in customer lift. For more information, visit Zylotech.com.

Zylotech is an equal employment opportunity employer and does not discriminate against any applicant because of race, creed, color, age, national origin, ancestry, religion, gender, sexual orientation, disability, genetic information, veteran status, military status, application for military service or any other class protected by state or federal law.

To all recruitment agencies: Zylotech does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Zylotech employees or any other company location. Zylotech is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes. Unsolicited resumes received will be considered our property and will be processed accordingly.

Qualified Applicants must be legally authorized for employment in the United States. Qualified Applicants will not require employer-sponsored work authorization now or in the future for employment in the United States.",3.4,"Zylotech
3.4","Cambridge, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
1,Digital Data Scientist,$89k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"Reference Number: R2569083

Position Title: Digital Data Scientist

Department: Molecular Biology COE

Location: Toronto, Ontario

Job Overview:

Product Research and Development is looking for a Digital Data Scientist within Analytical Sciences (Toronto / Swiftwater) to help drive the successful deployments of new innovative digital solutions (e.g. LIMS, electronic lab notebook, ERP etc.) within bioprocessing and analytics. This position is responsible for implementing new digital systems within Toronto / Swiftwater that are aligned with global strategies, and to support the current testing requirements within the Analytical Sciences. The Digital Data Scientist is also a key R&D LIMS administrator for supporting the use of the LIMS system to meet project timelines and regulatory requirements. This includes LIMS master data management, LIMS process improvements, and to collaborate with other global LIMS administrators to ensure global alignment. This role will also develop and validate computational tools for analyzing big data (e.g. high-throughput sequencing data) demonstrating the application of digital science.

Responsibilities:

Provide scientific expertise within PRD and Analytical Sciences to support data science / digital transformation initiatives relating to pharmaceutical data mining, data modeling, big data acquisition, and data structure.

Provide key knowledge and technical support of electronic systems (especially LIMS, scientific data management, data science, e-biobank etc.) to Analytical Sciences. This potentially includes master data management process relating to LIMS and other LIMS administrator activities (including but not limited to updating and approvals of sample plans, configurations and specifications).

Support and diagnose LIMS incidents, provide management and timely resolution of technical incidents.

Provide input/direction to process improvement and harmonization initiatives for analytical electronic system (e.g.: LIMS life cycle management, transversal ERP systems, data science) through local and global working groups and initiatives.

Develop, implement and validate cloud computing for big data analysis within Analytical Sciences.

Requirements & Qualifications:

Doctoral Degree (with a minimum of 2 years of experience) or Master Degree (with a minimum of 5 years of experience) or Bachelor Degree (with a minimum of 10 years of experience) in Computer Science, Informatics (Data Science or related discipline), Science/Life Sciences (Molecular Biology, Microbiology, Biochemistry, Immunology, Bioinformatics or related discipline)

Experience implementing digital systems (e.g. LIMS, data management, electronic lab notebook, etc.) and familiarity with pharmaceutical data structure

Experience in use and administration of a commercial LIMS (specific experience with LabWare LIMS is preferred.)

Software development for biological data analysis and familiar with cloud computing (experience with genomics / computation biology data analysis is preferred.)

Experience with computerization system validation and 21CFR part 11 / EudraLex Annex 11 requirements including system testing, validation, and data management

Experience in writing development reports, standard operating procedures, qualification plans and validation reports

Excellent written and verbal communications, organization and teamwork are required.

Terms of Employment:

This is an independent scientist position within the Analytical Sciences (Toronto / Swiftwater) - Molecular Biology Centre. Some travel might be required (US, Global) and the frequency is dependent on the project needs.

What makes this position unique?

Sanofi Pasteur Product Research and Development and Analytical Sciences (Toronto / Swiftwater) is looking for a Digital Data Scientist to join our dynamic, fast-paced environment where analytical electronic systems are a mission-critical application for the business. The position will collaborate across functions and sites to simplify and implement data science / digital solutions within PRD and provides support as necessary for regulatory submissions. This role will also help advanced the application of digital science by supporting the development and validation of computational tools used for big data analysis.

Benefits of working in this role:

This position is a key strategic role in decision making for offers the opportunity to collaborate between different functions, sites and senior management to promote the implementation of data science / digital solutions within PRD. This role is recognized as a key position in make decisions in the areas of master data management and incidents related to LIMS and is fundamental to the success of all testing within the Analytical Sciences platforms and product release data to support the on-time release of clinical trial material.

Location Information:

Toronto or Swiftwater

Sanofi Pasteur: The world’s leading vaccine company

Sanofi Pasteur, the vaccines division of Sanofi, is the largest company in the world devoted entirely to human vaccines. Our driving goal is to protect people from infectious diseases by creating safe and effective vaccines. Our company distributes more than 1 billion doses of vaccine each year, making it possible to vaccinate more than 500 million people across the globe. Sanofi Pasteur offers the broadest range of vaccines in the world, providing protection against 20 bacterial and viral diseases.

Sanofi is dedicated to supporting people through their health challenges. We are a global biopharmaceutical company focused on human health. We prevent illness with vaccines, provide innovative treatments to fight pain and ease suffering. We stand by the few who suffer from rare diseases and the millions with long-term chronic conditions. With more than 100,000 people in 100 countries, Sanofi is transforming scientific innovation into healthcare solutions around the globe.

Sanofi is an equal opportunity employer committed to diversity and inclusion. Our goal is to attract, develop and retain highly talented employees from diverse backgrounds, allowing us to benefit from a wide variety of experiences and perspectives. We welcome and encourage applications from all qualified applicants. Accommodations for persons with disabilities required during the recruitment process are available upon request.

Thank you in advance for your interest.

Only those candidates selected for interviews will be contacted.

Sanofi, Empowering Life

#GD-SP #LI-SP

At Sanofi diversity and inclusion is foundational to how we operate and embedded in our Core Values. We recognize to truly tap into the richness diversity brings we must lead with inclusion and have a workplace where those differences can thrive and be leveraged to empower the lives of our colleagues, patients and customers. We respect and celebrate the diversity of our people, their backgrounds and experiences and provide equal opportunity for all.",3.9,"Sanofi
3.9","Swiftwater, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1973,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
2,"Principal Scientist, Discovery",$121k-$234k (Glassdoor Est.),"Role Description:
We are looking for a highly motivated principal scientist to join the Discovery Immuno-Oncology group at Jounce Therapeutics. The successful candidate for this position will play a leading role within a team of scientists engaged in the discovery and testing of novel cancer immunotherapeutic biologics. Direct program leadership of one or more early discovery programs including managing timelines, driving key go/no-go decision making, communication of program strategy and progress, contributing to regulatory filings, and management of multiple reports are key elements of this position. The candidate must be capable of working across functional groups and possess superb oral and written communication skills. The ideal candidate should be a highly motivated self-starter capable of working independently and as part of a team.
Responsibilities:
Lead development and execution of one or more early discovery programs.
Provide both immuno-oncology guidance and technical expertise to a cross-functional team.
Present program strategy and progress to research leadership and senior management teams.
Assist in management of program budget and deliverables.
Play a leading role in the Discovery IO group by sharing ideas, data, and working closely with colleagues to ensure success of entire early portfolio.
Drafting documents in support of regulatory filings.
Management of multiple direct and/or indirect reports.

Requirements:
Doctoral degree (Ph.D., M.D., M.D./Ph.D.) or equivalent in Immunology or Cancer Immunology, postdoctoral experience of 1-4 year, with 5+ years industry experience a plus.
S/he will have a strong background in Immunology, with a track record of successfully advancing early target programs in an industry setting.
S/he should have managed multiple direct reports and/or managed project teams.
Publications in top tier journals, and/or patents.
Excellent organizational, communication and presentation skills.
Strong time management skills and focus to drive toward key decision points on target programs.
Able to thrive in a highly collaborative, fast-paced, team-oriented environment with colleagues from diverse disciplines but with the capacity to work independently.
Ability to think creatively and critically to make a measurable impact on projects is an important aspect of this role.
A passion for bringing novel therapeutics to cancer patients.
Experience with technical report writing and IND filings

Equal Opportunity Employer
Jounce Therapeutics is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate in its employment decisions on the basis of race, color, national origin, age, physical or mental disability, marital status, religion, creed, sex, or political beliefs. We offer a competitive salary and benefits package. All applicants should be legally entitled to work for any employer in the U.S.
To apply, please visit https://careers-jouncetx.icims.com/.

Company Overview
Jounce Therapeutics, Inc. is a clinical-stage immunotherapy company dedicated to transforming the treatment of cancer by developing therapies that enable the immune system to attack tumors and provide long lasting benefits to patients through a biomarker-driven approach. Through the use of its Translational Science Platform, Jounce first focuses on specific cell types within the human tumor microenvironment to prioritize targets, and then identifies related biomarkers designed to match the right immunotherapy to the right patient. Jounce currently has four development-stage programs, two of which are clinical-stage: vopratelimab, a monoclonal antibody that binds to and activates ICOS, and JTX-4014, a PD-1 inhibitor intended for combination use with Jounce’s broader pipeline. Vopratelimab is currently being assessed in a Phase 2 clinical trial, EMERGE, and Jounce plans to initiate an additional Phase 2 biomarker trial using TISvopra for patient selection, SELECT, to assess vopratelimab in combination with JTX-4014. Jounce’s IND-enabling preclinical programs include JTX-8064, a LILRB2 receptor antagonist and JTX-1811, a monoclonal antibody designed to selectively deplete T regulatory cells in the tumor microenvironment. For more information, please visit www.jouncetx.com.",4.4,"Jounce Therapeutics
4.4","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
3,COMPUTER SCIENTIST - ENGINEER - RESEARCH ENGINEER - PERFORMANCE METROLOGY,$58k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:


Join our Intelligent Systems Division! As a member of the team, you will help develop creative solutions for existing and next-generation technologies for healthcare applications using advanced modeling, artificial intelligence and machine learning. This role entails frequent interaction with technical clients and colleagues to understand requirements and constraints of the task objectives. Operate in various phases of the system lifecycle, including applied research, requirements generation, design, implementation, testing, integration, installation, and documentation.


Education/Experience:


Must have a BS, Masters or Ph.D. in Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Biomedical Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Mechanical Engineering or other related disciplines. Must have at least a 3.25 GPA. Must have course work or experience in more than one of the following: image and video processing, high performance computing including GPUs, network and routing protocols, logic programming and knowledge representation, machine learning/artificial intelligence, software development, signal processing; communications and RF. Strong software skills required. Experience in C++, C#, and/or Python preferred. Experience with Linux, real-time operating systems, multithreaded programming, and/or networking/socket programming is a plus. An interest and/or experience in working with hardware a plus. Excellent verbal and written communication skills required. Must be able to work in project team environments and independently. Must have excellent problem-solving skills, be self-motivated, and be driven by challenging problems. Must have good organizational skills and attention to detail with an aptitude for continuous learning and leadership potential. A valid/clear driver's license is required.


Special Requirements:


Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas


For more information about this division, visit the Intelligent Systems home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.1,"Southwest Research Institute
4.1","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
4,Research Scientist - Molecular Biology,-1,"Living Carbon is a pre-launch public benefit corporation with a mission to fight climate change by enhancing CO2 capture and storage in trees. We believe that gigaton scale CO2 drawdown will only happen if solutions are both environmentally beneficial and profitable to landowners. We’re working with some of the largest timber companies in the US and well-known reforestation projects to develop a proof of concept. We’re backed by some of the most prominent investors in Silicon Valley including, YCombinator, Sam Altman, and Chris Sacca of LowerCarbon Capital.

If you believe that climate change is the defining global emergency of the century and want to join an ambitious project that’s working on a biological solution, we’d love to hear from you.
Your role: *
We’re looking for someone who’s excited to be part of a mission-driven early stage company. As our Research Scientist, you will play an essential role in planning and executing molecular biology experiments to help meet the company goals. A successful candidate will have experience with molecular biology, cloning, and molecular assay technologies, and a strong working knowledge of plants. You will also have the opportunity to contribute to the company’s strategic goals and think creatively about how to move quickly and solve problems.
Responsibilities: *
Lead the hands-on execution of molecular characterization of transgenic materials
Perform extraction, purification, and quantitation of DNA, RNA, and protein from transgenic plant tissue samples
Develop and optimize molecular assays in the area of molecular biology and biochemistry including but not limited to PCR, qRT-PCR, Western blot, Mass Spec
Design and make plant expression vectors to optimize transgene gene expression for the ultimate goal of improving trait performances
Design and conduct molecular and biochemical assays and screening systems for discovery of genes and enzymes to enhance carbon condensation, assimilation, and retainment in transgenic trees
Maintain up-to-date knowledge in molecular biology and biochemistry and proactively propose and implement application of new technologies and ideas to improve the workflow and to speed up the project goals
Author assay protocols, SOPs, work instructions and other documents as needed
Keep a detailed record of experimental data and analysis. Summarize project progress in written reports and present during team meetings. Timely communication of project progress to the leadership team. Participate in scheduling and forecasting meetings, be flexible, be able to handle multiple projects and help drive key decisions with solid data and scientific leadership.
May train and oversee the work of lab technicians, providing ongoing coaching, guidance and feedback to ensure technicians are successful in their work, as well as have the necessary and timely access to information and other resources.
Previous Experience: *
MS/Ph.D in Molecular Biology, Biology, Biochemistry or related field
Demonstrated hands-on experience in general molecular biology involving isolation, manipulation, and characterization of DNA and RNA from tissue samples
Experience working with qRT-PCR assay is desired
Hands-on expertise in molecular cloning and sequencing (Sanger and NGS) is desirable
Experience with bioinformatic tools for DNA and protein sequence analysis is highly desirable
Experience with protein biochemistry including purification and immunoassay is preferred
Experience with protein engineering is a plus
Expertise working with complex protocols, making reagents is desired
Demonstrated ability to plan experiments, analyze data sets, interpret results, trouble-shoot experiments, prepare reports, and present results
Living Carbon PBC offers competitive compensation, and generous healthcare, dental and vision insurance.

_Living Carbon PBC is an equal opportunity employer. _

_We believe the best solutions to climate change are created by diverse teams. Living Carbon is focused on building a multicultural and inclusive team with strong representation from the many diverse communities disproportionately impacted by climate change. As a public benefit corporation, ensuring solutions to slow climate change are widely distributed to all peoples is critical to the success of our mission. _

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Relocation assistance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Living Carbon,"San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
5,Research Scientist - Molecular Biology,-1,"Living Carbon is a pre-launch public benefit corporation with a mission to fight climate change by enhancing CO2 capture and storage in trees. We believe that gigaton scale CO2 drawdown will only happen if solutions are both environmentally beneficial and profitable to landowners. We’re working with some of the largest timber companies in the US and well-known reforestation projects to develop a proof of concept. We’re backed by some of the most prominent investors in Silicon Valley including, YCombinator, Sam Altman, and Chris Sacca of LowerCarbon Capital.

If you believe that climate change is the defining global emergency of the century and want to join an ambitious project that’s working on a biological solution, we’d love to hear from you.
Your role: *
We’re looking for someone who’s excited to be part of a mission-driven early stage company. As our Research Scientist, you will play an essential role in planning and executing molecular biology experiments to help meet the company goals. A successful candidate will have experience with molecular biology, cloning, and molecular assay technologies, and a strong working knowledge of plants. You will also have the opportunity to contribute to the company’s strategic goals and think creatively about how to move quickly and solve problems.
Responsibilities: *
Lead the hands-on execution of molecular characterization of transgenic materials
Perform extraction, purification, and quantitation of DNA, RNA, and protein from transgenic plant tissue samples
Develop and optimize molecular assays in the area of molecular biology and biochemistry including but not limited to PCR, qRT-PCR, Western blot, Mass Spec
Design and make plant expression vectors to optimize transgene gene expression for the ultimate goal of improving trait performances
Design and conduct molecular and biochemical assays and screening systems for discovery of genes and enzymes to enhance carbon condensation, assimilation, and retainment in transgenic trees
Maintain up-to-date knowledge in molecular biology and biochemistry and proactively propose and implement application of new technologies and ideas to improve the workflow and to speed up the project goals
Author assay protocols, SOPs, work instructions and other documents as needed
Keep a detailed record of experimental data and analysis. Summarize project progress in written reports and present during team meetings. Timely communication of project progress to the leadership team. Participate in scheduling and forecasting meetings, be flexible, be able to handle multiple projects and help drive key decisions with solid data and scientific leadership.
May train and oversee the work of lab technicians, providing ongoing coaching, guidance and feedback to ensure technicians are successful in their work, as well as have the necessary and timely access to information and other resources.
Previous Experience: *
MS/Ph.D in Molecular Biology, Biology, Biochemistry or related field
Demonstrated hands-on experience in general molecular biology involving isolation, manipulation, and characterization of DNA and RNA from tissue samples
Experience working with qRT-PCR assay is desired
Hands-on expertise in molecular cloning and sequencing (Sanger and NGS) is desirable
Experience with bioinformatic tools for DNA and protein sequence analysis is highly desirable
Experience with protein biochemistry including purification and immunoassay is preferred
Experience with protein engineering is a plus
Expertise working with complex protocols, making reagents is desired
Demonstrated ability to plan experiments, analyze data sets, interpret results, trouble-shoot experiments, prepare reports, and present results
Living Carbon PBC offers competitive compensation, and generous healthcare, dental and vision insurance.

_Living Carbon PBC is an equal opportunity employer. _

_We believe the best solutions to climate change are created by diverse teams. Living Carbon is focused on building a multicultural and inclusive team with strong representation from the many diverse communities disproportionately impacted by climate change. As a public benefit corporation, ensuring solutions to slow climate change are widely distributed to all peoples is critical to the success of our mission. _

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Relocation assistance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Living Carbon,"San Francisco, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
6,Customer Service Analytics Manager,$17-$30 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Customer Service Analytics Manager
Milwaukee Branch
12355 Uline Way, Kenosha, WI 53144

Customer Service is the heartbeat of our company. We depend on our Call Center employees to serve our customers and fulfill our promise of reliability.

Better together than apart. This position is on-site, and we are looking for good people who share our passion.

Uline is proud to operate as a drug-free workplace. All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.

Position Responsibilities
Manage the Customer Service analytics team, listening to recommendations and taking measures to maximize team effectiveness.
Provide leadership, training and coaching.
Evaluate business processes, developing and implementing solutions for improvements.
Create performance and success reports.
Build and maintain relationships with branch leadership to drive performance.
Act as a liaison between business and IT groups.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor’s degree.
5+ years experience in business analysis.
Experience leading and developing top-performing teams.
Experience in call center, warehouse, or supply chain environment.
Knowledge of data design, ETL process, data warehousing and SQL.

Benefits
Complete insurance coverage that includes medical, dental, vision and life insurance, Flexible Spending Accounts and wellness programs.
401(k) with 5% employer match.
Paid holidays and generous paid time off.
Bonus programs that include annual performance, sales goals and profit sharing.
Scholarship program for children of employees.

Employee Perks
On-site café and outdoor patio.
First-class fitness center.
Beautifully maintained walking trails.
Free chair massages.
Numerous employee appreciation events throughout the year.
Opportunities for community involvement.

About Uline

Uline is the leading distributor of shipping, industrial and packaging materials to businesses throughout North America. We're a family-owned company whose incredible service, huge inventory and quality products fuel our ongoing expansion and growth. We offer same-day shipping on over 37,500 products in our 812-page catalog and on our state-of-the-art e-commerce website.

Uline provides the essential supplies needed to keep organizations operational and productive. To protect the health and safety of our employees, we have modified our normal operating policies in response to COVID-19.

Each resume submitted gets individually reviewed by our team and retained for 24 months in case a great opportunity opens for you to join our Uline family.

EEO/AA Employer/Vet/Disabled

#LI-JF1
#CORP",3.5,"Uline
3.5","Milwaukee, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
7,Sr. Staff Data Analyst - Marketing Analytics Manager,$86k-$154k (Glassdoor Est.),"WHO WE ARE:

Freedom Financial Network is a family of companies that takes a people-first approach to financial services, using technology to empower consumers to overcome debt and create a brighter financial future. The company was founded in 2002 by Brad Stroh and Andrew Housser on the belief that by staying committed to helping people, you can ensure better financial outcomes for both the customer and the business. This Heart + $ philosophy still guides the vision of our growing company, which has helped millions of people find solutions for their financial needs.

What began with 2 people in a spare bedroom has now rapidly expanded to a vibrant business that employs over 2500 employees (known internally as The Freedom Family) in two locations: San Mateo, CA and Tempe, AZ. When you visit either of our offices, you’ll understand why our employees have voted us the Best Place to Work for the last several years. It’s a place where the Heart + $ philosophy continues to thrive, where we believe that success is only achieved by doing what’s right for our customers, our employees, and our communities.

In order to create brighter futures for our clients, employees, and businesses, Freedom Financial Network holds itself to four core values that have grown out of our Heart + $ philosophy: to care for everyone around us, act with integrity every time, collaborate with everybody we work with, and get better at what we do every day.

THE OPPORTUNITY:

We are looking for a Senior Staff Analyst/Marketing Analytics Manager who will work closely with our internal and external business partners in developing data-driven solutions for the organization. In this role, you will be involved in analyzing campaign results, validating assumptions and provide recommendation for future campaigns and product offerings. You will also collaborate with team members in assessing and developing new analytic opportunities within the broader analytics organization

THE ROLE:

Conduct large scale analyses, with ownership through all stages: understand business goals and strategies, formulate the analytic approach, perform data extraction, exploration, and transformation, and translate results into actional items for the business team.
Leverage deep hands-on technical skills to produce analyses in various topics including, but not limited to, customer segmentation, campaign performance, marketing attribution and return on investment/ad spend.
Closely work with business partners on Direct Mail (DM) initiatives to ensure successful execution of campaigns.
Analyze DM campaign results to inform future targeting and optimization decisions
Iterate scoring model and perform model validation to be implemented on DM campaigns
Perform data operations necessary to execute campaigns
Develop methodologies to analyze, understand, and quantify trade-offs in marketing decision making
Interact with multiple functional teams across the organization to identify potential issues, implement solutions, improve throughput, and automate recurring processes.
Collaborate with Advanced Analytics, Data Science, and Data Engineering teams to implement predictive models into various stages of marketing funnels, particularly in adapting modern analytics techniques to offline marketing channels such as direct mail and linear television.

REQUIREMENTS/CHARACTERISTICS:

6+ years of hands-on analytic experience in the financial services industry
Hands-on experience in SQL, Python, R, Excel, and Tableau
Experience with data analytics and statistical modeling concepts such as multivariate regression, segmentation modeling, machine learning, data mining, simulation, optimization, and forecasting
Strong understanding on how the data should be captured, stored and structured in data warehousing environment
An effective cross functional communicator in both written and verbal skills
Ability and willingness to learn in a fast-paced environment and adapt to various situation
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field such as Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Econometrics or equivalent

CULTURAL FIT (Our Core Values):

Care (for everyone): We show compassion and contribute to the well-being and growth of those around us. We only pursue products that improve the financial lives of our clients.

Act with Integrity (every time): We take the right action even when it is hard and even when no one is watching. We treat our employees, clients, and communities the way they wish to be treated.
Get Better (every day): We innovate, iterate, and improve each day. We are creative, take thoughtful risks, and ultimately learn and recover from failures.
COLLABORATE (with everybody): We strive to work together toward a common purpose by proactively sharing information and inviting participation. We recognize the perspective of various groups and embrace healthy, constructive debate.

WHY JOIN THE FREEDOM FAMILY?

Fast, continued growth – there’s a lot of opportunity for advancement
Voted a Best Place to Work multiple times by our employees
Benefits start within 30 days
401k with employer match
3 weeks’ paid vacation (increased with tenure)
9 paid holidays & 5 sick days
Paid time off for volunteer work and on your birthday

This is your opportunity to be part of a growing company where dedicated professionals strive to help customers and each other succeed every day. If that sounds exciting, we want to talk to you. Apply today!

Attention Agencies & Search Firms: We do not accept unsolicited candidate resumes or profiles. Please do not reach out to anyone within Freedom Financial Network (FFN) to market your services or candidates. All inquiries should be directed to Talent Acquisition only. We reserve the right to hire any candidates sent unsolicited and will not pay any fees without a contract signed by FFN’s Talent Acquisition leader.",3.4,"Freedom Financial Network
3.4","San Mateo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
8,Data Analyst,-1,"Who We Are

Strata.ai is a consulting and venture building firm focused on the exponential potential of Decision Science, Artificial Intelligence, and Extended Reality. We partner with the world’s largest organizations to solve, develop, and scale robust solutions through meaningful innovation and a hyper-focus on measurable impact.

We believe that to build successful relationships, technologies, or companies - we need to invest in people. We aim to attract like-minded individuals who see problems as challenges, are obsessed with solving them, who can think creatively and drive their ideas with data, can be depended on to deliver results, and is always willing to help those around them succeed. We believe in integrity, transparency, accountability, and trust.

If it seems that we are describing you, then we would love for you to apply.

Overview

We’re looking for aspiring Data & Decision Scientists, Data Architects, and Machine Learning Engineers to be part of Strata.ai’s Consulting Base. You’ll be working in either team or individual capacities to design, develop, and deliver objective focused business projects for our clients and partners.

Your quality communication, documentation, and organization skills will be instrumental in your success for this role. You’re hungry, constantly researching the latest methods, techniques, and technologies and have an affinity for details and accuracy. When a business decision is made, you're confident that the data behind that decision is correct and complete.

Requirements

Responsibilities
Research, Gather, Organize, and Analyze information from multiple sources and mediums.
Ensures completeness and integrity of data as well as their sources.
Coordinates requests for more or complete information as needed.
Keeps track of information sources, purpose, time of consumption, and destinations.
Research information ownership and privacy concerns, ensures security compliance.
Filter, sort, sanitize, and “clean” data to be programmatically utilized.
Prepare operational datasets with only necessary or relevant data points.
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports.
Collaborate with management to prioritize and information needs.
Provides reporting, project summaries, ongoing status updates, and maintains all records of processing activities.
Become a source and advocate within and outside the organization(s) for data science, decision science, and artificial intelligence.
Supports ad hoc needs and performs other duties as assigned.
Requirements
High School Diploma or GED, Undergraduate degree preferred.
Strong Organization and Prioritization Skills
Experience with G-Suite Tooling (Gmail, Docs, Sheets, Slides)
Excellent communication skills in both oral and written.
Attention to detail, ability to execute on directions accurately and timely.
Ability to work in a team environment and maintain a professional disposition.
Commitment and competence to provide excellent customer service; positive, flexible, and empathetically.
Must have your own computer and a fast and stable internet connection.
Benefits

Pay and benefits are competitive and based on industry standards and individual experience and skill sets. We offer salary and contract engagements. Salaries includes Healthcare and 401(k) as well as Unlimited PTO after 90 days.

]]>",-1,Strata.ai,"Miami, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
9,Staff Data Scientist,-1,"We are a company of passionate individuals striving to improve healthcare and patient experiences. Our evidence-based medical content and software tools empower both payers and providers to make the best decisions for patients. Our work makes a difference in the quality of care that hundreds of thousands of patients receive each day and we're proud of our positive impact.

MCG Health's Data Science Solutions Team is responsible for building, delivering, evolving and operating the company's Data Science Solutions. These solutions empower doctors, nurses and patients to make the best decisions for health outcomes and quality of life factors valued by patients. The primary purpose of the Senior Data Scientist is to provide thought leadership and pragmatic technical leadership to the Data Science Solutions group and their use of AI, Data Science, Machine Learning and Natural Language Processing Technologies.

In this role you will:
Collaborate with business, product, technical stakeholders and team members to deliver innovative solutions that improve the efficiency and effectiveness of healthcare delivery
Be an expert on problems that matter to MCG's markets / clients, and propose approaches to leverage data, AI / ML / NLP / DS technologies and MCG's assets to address these problems
Contribute to establishing a team environment of collaboration, excellence and innovation
Provide thought leadership regarding the continually advancing state of the art of readily available AI technologies and cloud-based services that are relevant to MCG products and solutions
Contribute to establishment and evolution of methodologies for development and maintenance of data science models, to ensure effective usage and rapid, continuous improvement
Contribute to technology choices (build, buy, use open source) to support rapid experimentation and development of data models that can be readily transitioned to production
Collaborate with DSS and/or MCG software engineering leadership to deploy platforms to support data ingestion from internal and external sources, and to deploy platforms to support continuous transformation of successful models into production usage
Partner with MCG technical leadership team to ensure compliance with security, privacy (HIPAA), regulatory and other obligations
Represent MCG's Data Science Solutions group, products and technologies to business and technical stakeholders at client companies and industry groups / associations
We'd love to hear from you if:
You have a minimum 5 years experience working with AI technologies
You have demonstrated experience building one or both of: Predictive / classification models using Machine Learning techniques, NLP systems using Deep Learning, or other techniques
You have demonstrated experience delivering successful ML and/or NLP solutions to the marketplace is required.
You have demonstrated experience working with software engineers to design and deliver Data Science platforms and tooling for use by a Data Science team is required; this may include creating such a platform from the ground up or successful configuration / deployment / usage of third-party platforms augmented by internally built tooling as needed
You have demonstrated experience with cloud-based data science services
You have demonstrated experience mentoring and providing technical leadership for data science model experimentation, and ongoing enhancement / evolution of solutions
You have demonstrated the ability to think ""outside the box"" and identify business problems appropriate to usage of AI / ML / NLP / DS techniques is required
You have demonstrated proficiency with lean system development practices successfully applied to deliver business value at sustainable velocity
We embrace diversity and equal opportunity, and are committed to building a team that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, and skills. It is only with diverse thoughts and ideas that we'll be able to create the change we want in healthcare. The more inclusive we are, the better our work will be for it.",4.6,"MCG Health
4.6",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1988,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
10,Weapons and Sensors Engineer/Scientist,$45k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Description


Dynetics, a wholly owned subsidiary of Leidos, is seeking a talented Weapons and Sensors engineer or scientist to join a diverse team to create unique modeling, simulation, and analysis solutions for complex weapon and sensor systems. With offices across the United States engaging in the defense, space, cyber and commercial fields, Dynetics provides responsive, cost-effective engineering, scientific and IT solutions.

Dynetics' National Intelligence Department is seeking an engineer or scientist with weapon or sensor system experience to support the United States Intelligence Community. The engineer/scientist in this role will analyze and transform intelligence data into software models that further our understanding of foreign threat systems. Following development, the models must then be integrated and maintained in multidisciplinary simulations for use in analyzing the capability of these threat systems within complex environments.

IND3
Basic Qualifications


-Candidate must possess a Bachelor's (or Master's) Degree from an ABET accredited school in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Software Engineering, Math, Physics, Computer Science or an equivalent degree with 3+ years of applicable experience.

-Candidate must have Matlab/Simulink experience.

-Windows programming skills in C/C++, Java, and Python are a plus as is experience with Linux development.

-Candidate must be a resident of the North Alabama area or willing to relocate to the Huntsville - North Alabama, AL area.

Other Qualifications
The preferred candidate will already possess an active DoD security clearance, or higher, and will be able to possess a Top Secret clearance.
The preferred candidate will also have prior experience (or education) with design, analysis, and/or modeling and simulation of sensor and weapon systems.
RF, EO/IR, dynamics, controls, and signal and image processing experience is particularly desirable.
Security Requirements


Candidate must be a US Citizen and possess (and be able to maintain) a Final Top Secret/SSBI Clearance or meet the eligibility to obtain (and maintain) a Final Top Secret Clearance.
Job Number:
01.01.14-11

Closing Date:
10/30/2020

#CJ",4.2,"Dynetics
4.2","Huntsville, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
11,Senior Data Engineer,$91k-$166k (Glassdoor Est.),"Our Data Warehouse team is looking to add a Senior Data Engineer. Qualified applicants will have 5-7 years’ experience in a Data Engineer position with a background supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency, and workload management. Ideal candidates will be experts in Talend, Python, Snowflake, CID and SQL.

Here's what you can expect from the job and what you need to be successful:

Job duties
Create and maintain optimal data pipeline architecture, including building a data pipeline infrastructure for optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data from a wide variety of data sources using SQL , cloud based relational or non-relational databases employing Talend, and/or scripting languages like Perl/Python
Build complex data platforms, and large scale CI/CD data pipelines utilizing a variety of technologies (REST APIs, Teamcity, Jennkis) and cloud databases (Snowflake)
Identify, design, and implement internal process improvements, including automating manual processes, optimizing data delivery, re-designing infrastructure for greater scalability, etc.
Work with data and analytics experts to strive for greater functionality in the organization’s data integration platform
Collaborate with technical staff to identify, learn, and understand software problems
Follow established configuration/change control processes
Identify options for potential solutions and assessing them for both technical and business suitability
Work closely with peers, stakeholders, and end users to ensure technical compatibility and user satisfaction
Essential Skills
A minimum of 5 years of developing ETL processes using Talendnformatica including the processing of NoSQL and JSON formats. Talend Certification preferred.
Strong skills with Ant, Maven, GIT, Jenkins, TeamCity.
Experience in writing Jenkins, Teamcity pipeline groovy, PowerShell scripts
Strong skills in source code repository tools such as Clear Case, SVN, CVS, and Git.
Advanced working knowledge in scripting languages, including Python, Perl and Shell.
Deep understanding of ETL, ELT, Talend, Informatica, Hadoop
Demonstrate independence, creativity, and initiative; as well as the ability to master the company's product architecture and its business goals
Experience in working in an Agile project management environment
Excellent problem solving and critical thinking skills
Superb verbal and written communication skills
Location: San Jose, CA 95134

First Tech is not currently offering Visa sponsorship for this position",3.2,"First Tech Federal Credit Union
3.2","San Jose, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1952,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
12,Lending and Mortgage Data Analyst,$46k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why Provident

Provident Credit Union is member-owned, trusted, financially sound, technologically advanced, and provides ""world class"" value, convenience, products and services to all members. We are headquartered in Redwood Shores, CA and have 21 branches located throughout California, in the San Francisco Bay Area, and Folsom.

Job Summary:
Responsible for maintaining the effective day-to-day operations of all Lending Operating Systems (LOS).
Coordinate the installation of new software releases, system upgrades, patches and resolution of software related problems.
Perform a variety of tasks to assist in the development, integration and implementation of new application software to support Real Estate Lending, Consumer Lending, Accounting and Loan Servicing.
Enable control and maintenance of lending system records to support effective management analysis and safeguarding of information required to service loans.
Develop and maintain a coordinated working relationship with our Information and Technology (IT) department and outside vendors as required.
Coordinate the lending information needs of all departments and assist with training efforts as they relate to LOS.
This position will participate in real estate and consumer lending portfolio analysis, design and implement of budget forecasting models as well as improving process efficiency and system optimization


Specific Job Duties:
Be able to create basic business rules and conditions using Encompass 360 (GUI) and write more complex queries
Support the Lending Department through knowledge of the mortgage process (Encompass expert preferred)
Maintain and test system updates, and provide report writing (Tableau preferred).
Responsible for managing the accomplishment of the Credit Union's long-term objectives, strategies and policies, relevant to all lending systems in the Consumer, Collection, and Real Estate Lending areas.
Ensure compliance with up-time benchmarks as defined by each department.
Manage relationship between all vendors and internal customers, including the Information Technology department, working with all parties to ensure lending systems remain functional, up-to-date, and useful to users throughout the lending division.
Develops, in partnership with users, workflow processes, business rules, controls, reports, and interfaces with vendors, documents, and other tools to maximize efficiency and establish standards for high loan quality.
Ensure that our systems are secure, by providing timely access and restricting access, as instructed by department managers.
Actively participate in the development of the vision of the lending systems and their enhancements.
Create functional specifications for new or modified systems or processes. Recommend system improvements.
Gather and document business requirements, formulate use cases, track requirements, provide status, and ensure quality of solution throughout a project.
Develop test plans and pre-UAT testing, documenting and tracking issues, and ensure timely issue resolution, liaising between users and vendor support on rollout of new releases and enhancements.
Participate in the process of re-engineering systems and work flow in lending operational areas in order to ensure efficiencies whenever and wherever possible.
Make changes to systems as instructed by superiors. This includes the maintenance of documents, workflows, and processes.
Prioritize tasks to ensure that tasks affecting loan production are the top priority.
Participate in the design and implementation of analytical tools that improve the effectiveness of data used for making decisions. Contribute to the design and implementation of budget forecasting tools using statistical modeling and other techniques that result in less variability and higher accuracy in the budgeting process.
Participate in the design and implementation of portfolio management tools that improve pre-payment speed analysis, loss analysis, and credit granting criteria and processes.
Responsible for preparation and compliance with Change Management documentation and protocol.


Job Knowledge/Experience:
Knowledge of commonly used concepts, practices, procedures within Real Estate and Consumer Lending.
2 years of experience as an Analyst/Administrator working with Encompass 360 Loan Origination System preferred
Experience creating and editing custom input and output forms
Well versed in using Microsoft Access, Excel, and Word
Demonstrated project-management skills.
Oral and written communication skills.
Demonstrated research and analytical skills.


Education/Training and Preferred Skills:
Bachelor's degree in Business, Information Systems, or Analytical Techniques preferred or equivalent work experience
Knowledge of Business, Information Systems, or Analytical Techniques preferred or equivalent work experience
Possess thorough knowledge of Real Estate Lending including documentation, compliance, forms and related system configurations and processes.
Complete required BSA & OFAC training annually.
Understand and adhere to BSA & OFAC policies and procedures, including reporting suspicious activity.
Working knowledge of:
Federal Lending Requirements
California Credit Union Law and Rules and Regulations
Provident Board Policies
NCUA Rules and Regulations
Department's policies and procedures
Ability to communicate clearly and with fortitude of purpose.
The position demands maturity, flexibility and someone ready to contribute at a high leveland enjoy the rewards come with it:
Fully paid health insurance premiums
Quality medical, dental and vision care coverage
401(k) retirement plan with matching employer contributions
Strong commitment to investing in your career and educational advancement by offering up to 100% tuition reimbursement for approved
Incentive plan
Generous paid time off and paid holidays
Flexible spending accounts
Short and long-term disability coverage
Life and AD&D insurance
Provident membership
Rate discount on home and auto loans
In-house training
And much more!
Provident is an Equal Opportunity Employer

We are a winner of the Bay Area News Group Top Workplace in 2017, 2018 & 2019. Check us out on Glassdoor",3.9,"Provident Credit Union
3.9","Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1950,Nonprofit Organization,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
13,Scientist,$75k-$157k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Lundbeck, we are tirelessly dedicated to restoring brain health so every person can be their best. Headquartered in Copenhagen with sites worldwide including in La Jolla, California, Lundbeck is the only global biopharmaceutical company focused solely on brain diseases. Our legacy in neuroscience goes back seven decades and we have a long heritage of innovation. Lundbeck has developed and commercialized some of the world’s most widely prescribed therapies for psychiatric and neurological disorders. Today, we remain uncompromisingly committed to improving the quality of life for people impacted by brain disorders. Lundbeck is unique from other biopharmaceutical companies in that we are 70 percent owned by a research-focused foundation. We have a deep and productive pipeline, and we continue to bring forward symptomatic therapies to help people live better lives, while simultaneously pursuing disease-modifying treatments.

SUMMARY

Lundbeck La Jolla Research Center, Inc. (LLJRC) is a discovery research arm of H. Lundbeck A/S. Our mission is to develop innovative medicines that address significant unmet needs in the treatment of psychiatric and neurological disorders. LLJRC is seeking a highly motivated scientist to support preclinical stage programs in the portfolio through advancing our mass spectrometry-based proteomics capabilities. The successful candidate will join a multi-disciplinary team within the chemical biology group and lead efforts to expand our state-of-the-art proteomic platform using advanced quantitative proteomic techniques. The La Jolla-based chemical biology group provides core proteomics expertise to global Lundbeck and collaborates with leading academic labs, including the Cravatt lab at Scripps Research, and, as such, the group has the opportunity to explore the application of proteomics to a wide variety of CNS drug discovery programs and basic neuroscience research.

ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS

You will be a key contributor to multi-disciplinary project teams supporting early discovery programs through establishing MS-based assays to enable the discovery and development of high-quality small molecule therapeutics. A majority of your work will be lab-based, focused on the exploration, development and implementation of innovative MS techniques to characterize small molecule-protein interactions in living systems and to address other novel scientific questions. The job will entail establishing robust sample preparation protocols and developing targeted and untargeted MS acquisition methods suited for quantitative analysis of peptide analytes within complex peptide mixtures derived from biological matrices.

We offer the opportunity to join a dynamic and energetic team of qualified colleagues working in a leading CNS specialized drug discovery organization. The group is well-supported with multiple Orbitrap mass spectrometers, including an Orbitrap Fusion Lumos, and a high-performance cluster for data analysis. A dedicated computational biologist will support proteomics data analysis, curation and management through automated pipelines and through maintenance of a proprietary chemoproteomic database facilitating tracking and mining of all internal proteomics data. The group is actively engaged in both drug discovery and basic research at the frontiers of neuroscience and you will have the opportunity to collaborate and publish with world-class academic labs as highlighted in Cell reports, 31(12), 107805.

REQUIRED EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE and SKILLS
Ph.D. OR an accredited Master’s degree with 9+ years’ experience in mass spectrometry-based proteomics, chemical biology, biochemistry, analytical chemistry, or a related life sciences field OR an accredited bachelor’s degree with 12+ years’ experience in mass spectrometry-based proteomics, chemical biology, biochemistry, analytical chemistry, or a related life sciences field
Demonstrated broad knowledge of principles of mass spectrometry-based protein identification and quantification
Extensive hands-on experience with sample preparation (e.g. immuno- or chemical-affinity enrichment, protein- and peptide-level fractionation, stable isotope labeling, etc.) from a variety of biological matrices (tissues, cells and biofluids)
Experience with multiple MS acquisition methods (e.g. DDA, DIA, PRM) and quantitation strategies (e.g. isobaric tagging, isotopic labeling, label-free)
Familiarity with MS-based proteomics data processing tools
Hands-on experience in operation of Orbitrap mass spectrometers and nanoLC systems
Excellent skills in experimental design, implementation, troubleshooting, and data analysis
Excellent collaboration, communication, and presentation skills
Both effective team player and strong individual contributor, flexible, and able to handle multiple tasks and deliver high quality results under tight timelines
PREFERRED EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE and SKILLS
Experience with MS-based PTM analysis techniques
Basic programing skills relevant to proteomics data analysis (e.g. Python, R, Perl) is desirable but not necessary
Experience developing and performing biochemical and cellular assays also desirable, especially models relevant to CNS biology
Lundbeck is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, and any other characteristic protected by law, rule, or regulation. Lundbeck participates in E-Verify.",3.5,"Lundbeck
3.5","San Diego, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1915,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
14,"Sr Director, Data Science - Data Privacy",-1,"Sr. Director, Data Science (Data Privacy)

Location - Blue Bell, PA

Symphony Health Solutions, a wholly-owned subsidiary of PRA Health Sciences, is a leading provider of high-value data, analytics, technology solutions and actionable insights for healthcare and life sciences manufacturers, payers and providers. The company helps clients drive revenue growth and commercial effectiveness, while adapting to the transformation of the healthcare ecosystem, by integrating a broad set of patient, prescriber, payer and clinical data together with primary and secondary health research, analytics and consulting. Symphony delivers a comprehensive perspective on the real dynamics that drive business in the healthcare and life sciences markets.

Responsibilities

Provides leadership, people management, and tactical input on the planning and execution of data science initiatives that drive business results. Establishes performance standards, operations planning and budgets while overseeing project and vendor management.

Primary Responsibilities:

Responsible for strategic design, implementation, integration, testing, validation, documentation, review, maintenance and accessibility of resources which enable effective and reliable data science, data visualization and business intelligence.

Applies knowledge of general business functions and systems to develop strategies, operational plans and standards to support achievement of department, business and corporate goals.

Maintains effective team by recruiting, selecting, orienting, and training employees; maintaining a safe, secure, and legal work environment; and developing employees’ professional growth opportunities.

Achieves staff results by communicating job expectations; planning, monitoring, and appraising job results; coaching, counseling, and disciplining employees; developing, coordinating, and enforcing systems, policies, procedures, and productivity standards.

Manages people, projects, and products supporting department goals to improve company efficiency, compliance, profitability and stakeholder satisfaction.

Specific Responsibilites:

Translates company business objectives and knowledge of data science to create long-term vision for department.

Provides line management to direct reports, including training, performance management, professional development and coaching.

Represents the department on company or division-level process improvement initiatives and may act as sponsor for department-specific initiatives.

Establishes and assures adherence to budgets, schedules, work plans and KPI’s.

Maintains strategies for improving department systems/ processes.

Represents company at relevant industry forums and/or technology groups.

Expertise in machine learning and predictive modeling.

Expertise in relational databases, scripting languages, and statistical computing packages.

Excellent understanding of applied statistics, including regression models.

In-depth knowledge of company people management policies and procedures, including hiring, performance management, corrective action and compensation administration.

Advanced leadership skills including change management, people development, strategic thinking and influencing.

Ability to strategize, communicate internally and with multiple clients.

Ability to resolve complex issues across departments and clients.

Ability to structure a scalable team to promote quality deliverables.

Ability to translate high- level corporate strategy into long-range project plans to gain competitive advantage.

Qualifications
Master’s degree or international equivalent
16 years’ relevant experience including 10 years formal people management experience
Equivalent combination of education, training, and relevant experience may be considered in place of the education and experience stated above. All employees must read, write and speak fluent English and host country language.

PRA is an EEO/AA employer and is committed to providing opportunities to minorities, women, veterans and individuals with disabilities.

Options
Apply for this job onlineApply
Share
Sorry the Share function is not working properly at this moment. Please refresh the page and try again later.
Share on your newsfeed
Connect With Us!",3.8,"PRA Health Sciences
3.8","Blue Bell, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
15,"Scientist I, Analytical Development",$51k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Scientist I, Analytical Development
Location


CORPORATE - Seattle

# of openings

1

Job Posting


Scientist I, Analytical Development

Scientist I, Analytical Development

This position will primarily be responsible for the development, transfer, qualification, and validation of potency bioassays in support of clinical development and commercialization of antibody therapeutics. The Scientist may also contribute to the development, transfer, and qualification / validation of impurity ELISAs and analytical HPLC and/or CE methods to monitor physicochemical quality attributes for both protein and small-molecule therapeutics. The individual will develop and implement methods for characterization, contribute to tech transfer to clinical and commercial stage CROs / CMOs, and provide input to and manage external CROs who may develop and implement methods for characterization, release, and stability testing.

Come join our highly talented CMC Team and help shape the future of Omeros!

Who is Omeros?

Omeros is a commercial-stage biopharmaceutical company committed to discovering, developing and commercializing small-molecule and protein therapeutics for large-market as well as orphan indications targeting inflammation, complement-mediated diseases and disorders of the central nervous system.

The company’s drug product OMIDRIA® (phenylephrine and ketorolac intraocular solution) 1% / 0.3% is marketed in the U.S. for use during cataract surgery or intraocular lens (IOL) replacement to maintain pupil size by preventing intraoperative miosis (pupil constriction) and to reduce postoperative ocular pain. In the European Union, the European Commission has approved OMIDRIA for use in cataract surgery and other IOL replacement procedures to maintain mydriasis (pupil dilation), prevent miosis (pupil constriction), and to reduce postoperative eye pain.

Omeros has multiple Phase 3 and Phase 2 clinical-stage development programs focused on: complement-associated thrombotic microangiopathies; complement-mediated glomerulonephropathies; Huntington’s disease and cognitive impairment; and addictive and compulsive disorders. In addition, Omeros has a diverse group of preclinical programs and a proprietary G protein-coupled receptor (GPCR) platform

What will your responsibilities be?

Your specific job responsibilities will include:
Analytical method development, testing, transfer, qualification, and validation in a GLP and/or GMP environment
Troubleshoot typical method and equipment challenges
Write standard test methods, technical reports summarizing analytical data, and qualification / validation reports
Participate in cross-functional teams as a representative of the Analytical Development group
Assists in trouble-shooting CMC-related problems from CROs / CMOs
Assists in investigations involving data generated internally and by CROs / CMOs
Ensures laboratory equipment is calibrated and maintained in proper working order to enable compliance with GLP and/or GMP environments
Contribute to drafting regulatory submissions
Ensures compliance with all applicable regulatory guidelines
Education and Experience needed:
Demonstrated knowledge and experience developing potency ELISAs for protein therapeutics and interpreting data is required
Knowledge and experience transferring, troubleshooting, and validating assays is required
Knowledge and experience developing HPLC and/or CE based methods is a plus
Small and large molecule experience is desired
Demonstrated problem-solving capabilities
Knowledgeable in global regulatory CMC documents
Familiar with GMPs and qualification / validation practices
(for Ph.D.) or (for B.S.) years of biotechnology and/or pharmaceutical industry experience required
BS, MS or Ph.D. in biology, biochemistry, analytical chemistry, or a related field
Experience with “start-up” biopharma company desirable
Excellent communication, analytical, and organizational skills required
Other Requirements:

Behavioral Competencies Required:
Must have the ability to build and maintain positive and collaborative relationships with management and peers
Excellent written and verbal communication skills required
Must display strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Attention to detail required
Physical Demands Required:
Intermittent physical activity including bending, reaching, pushing, pulling, or lifting up to 40 lbs.
May encounter prolonged periods of sitting
This position requires working with and near hazardous material .
This is an opportunity for you to be a key member of a collaborative group contributing your talent and expertise to a company that has an exciting pipeline. If you have the knowledge, skills and experience we are looking for, we’d love to hear from you!

Omeros is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to status as a protected veteran or a qualified individual with a disability, or other protected status such as race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, marital status, or any other factor determined to be unlawful by federal, state, or local statutes.

It is our policy to provide reasonable accommodation to anyone with a disability who needs assistance completing the job application process. If you need assistance, you can either send an e-mail to hr@omeros.com or contact Omeros, asking for Human Resources, at (206) 676-5000.",3.3,"Omeros
3.3","Seattle, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
16,Genomic Curator Quality Scientist,-1,"Job Title: * Genomic Curator Quality Scientist
Department: *Product
Reports to: *VP Product & Engineering
Position Type: *Full Time Non-Exempt
PRIORITY RESPONSIBILITY*
Expand and maintain Golden Helix’s lead as curators of the largest repository of clinical and research genomic data. Master the capabilities of Golden Helix genomic analysis software to ensure the quality of new and changing features in conjunction with the development efforts of the product team.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES*
Genomic Data Curator *
Understand and make editorial decisions on genomic data source to prepare them for use in clinical genetic testing and research contexts
Wrangle raw genomic data files into forms ready for usage in Golden Helix software
Write one-off scripts to manipulate and harmonize genomic data for product integration
Write code or run existing tools to simulated genomic datasets that exercise the software feature under test
Write blog posts on new capabilities, FAQs and data curation achievements
Product Quality *
Help develop and run a quality process that covers Golden Helix’s products and bundled data
Master the new and changing capabilities of Golden Helix’s software to ensure their quality
Discover edge cases, off-by-one issues, resource limitations, and rare conditions in which the product does not perform nominally.
Prepare technical documentation for genomic scientists and clinical geneticists to perform their duties using Golden Helix software
Work closely with the product team in the entire lifecycle of bugs and issues.
Investigate customer problems referred by Field Application Scientists.
Other duties as directed.
QUALIFICATIONS*
_Must have ability to work for any US employer without restrictions_
PhD or equivalent experience in Molecular Biology, Cancer Biology, Oncological Science, Molecular Genetics or related field. A M.S. in Bioinformatics with hands on research experience and NGS domain expertise also encouraged to apply.
Exquisite attention to detail, with a knack for identifying discrepancies or mistakes
Experience in Python and command line bash shell scripting or equivalent
Track record of written and oral communication experience, such as publications, grant applications and conference presentations
Well organized, task-oriented and willingness to take ownership of the quality of a complex product, including performing manual and hands-on tests.
MEASUREMENTS*
The Genomic Curator Quality Scientist will be measured on:
Correct transformation and representation of curated data sources
Quality of products in versioned releases
Timely completion of tasks in regards to the software release schedule.
Contact Information*
If you are interested in this challenging and rewarding position with a fun and exciting company, please send us your resume and cover letter. We look forward to hearing from you!

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $75,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
data curation: 3 years (Required)
Python programming language: 2 years (Preferred)
Linux: 3 years (Preferred)
Education:
Master's (Required)
Location:
Bozeman, MT 59715 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.goldenhelix.com
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Golden Helix Inc,"Bozeman, MT",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
17,Data Scientist,-1,"At White Ops, we are all about keeping it human. We are the global leader in bot mitigation. We protect more than 200 enterprises—including the largest internet platforms—from sophisticated bots by verifying the humanity of nearly one trillion online interactions every week. The most sophisticated bots look and act like humans when they click on ads, visit websites, fill out forms, take over accounts, and commit payment fraud. We stop them.

Founded in 2012 in a Brooklyn sci-fi bookstore, our Bot Mitigation Platform protects enterprises from the sophisticated bots that threaten them. It's an ongoing war that we fight passionately every day. Join our mission to stop bots, disrupt the economics of cyber crime, and keep it human.

The Data Science team at White Ops is building the algorithms that run behind the scenes and power our bot detection engine. We deploy state-of-the-art statistical and machine learning models at a massive scale that distinguish human activity from automated bots.

What you'll do:
Develop algorithms (i.e. rule based, statistical, machine learning) that automatically detect emerging threats
Evaluate and implement data analysis strategies to improve detection efficacy at internet-scale
Ad hoc investigations to respond to emerging threats with velocity and quality
Collaborate with product, engineering, customer success, to define and develop new product features that will delight our customers
Research for case studies and white papers on bot detection
Contribute to toolkits and platforms that scale detection analytics
Who you are:
You have a strong sense of ownership which drives you to find ways to do things better, faster, and cheaper
You look to find new and innovative ways to solve complex problems through rigorous experimentation, all by yourself
You are open, transparent and work in tight collaboration with anyone
You constantly drive for correctness and performance, in that order
You are a data scientist, analyst, engineer and have solved difficult problems to prove it
You have proficiency with SQL, Python
You have familiarity with tools, libraries and platforms such as Jupyter notebooks, Pandas, NumPy etc
Track record of independent, creative problem solving with large amounts of complex data
Knowledge of how the Internet works
Comfort with ad tech terminology
Background in data science for security is a plus
Knowledge of how web browsers work is a plus
Benefits and Perks
Unlimited vacation policy
Stock options, 401(k), and commuter benefits
Competitive salary and benefits
Medical and dental insurance for all full-time employees
Fully paid parental leave
Professional development fund
Great coaching from senior leaders and challenging development opportunities
Life at White Ops:

Our HQ office is located in the heart of New York City. We are growing the company deliberately with a keen eye towards maintaining a culture that values diversity, lifestyle, and career growth. We are doing meaningful work and we need people to join our mighty team. We are proud of our overwhelmingly positive presence on Glassdoor and Built in NYC. We have offices located in NYC, DC, Victoria, and London.",3.8,"White Ops
3.8",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
18,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"At Sisu, we're building a software platform that empowers people to make better decisions using data. Based on years of cutting-edge research at Stanford, Sisu enables users to quickly and comprehensively understand what’s driving their key metrics, so they never miss a window of opportunity to act.

Sisu leverages the massive amounts of data available within private, first-party data warehouses, which capture a real-time, structured view of organizational behavior. By monitoring the performance of key metrics like revenue, retention, and churn, and their relationships to interactions between key factors like user demographics, campaigns, and acquisition channels, we can help users make better decisions. The key problem Sisu solves is to help identify what’s driving change among this enormous feature and hypothesis space. To do so, we combine statistical analysis and machine learning at scale to provide users personalized, real-time diagnoses of changes in their metrics via an explainable, interpretable user interface.

As a machine learning engineer, you’ll have the opportunity to shape the future of machine learning on massive, structured data. Much like public search engines rely on sophisticated models for ranking and relevance over unstructured text, machine learning is integral to Sisu’s value proposition of ranking and highlighting key drivers behind metrics derived from structured data. These results inform our users on how to take action as their businesses are changing.

You will be responsible for investigating and developing state-of-the-art algorithms in Sisu’s large-scale streaming structured data context. ML engineers at Sisu deliver their features end-to-end, from Jupyter notebook prototypes to production in Rust.
Responsibilities
Deliver state-of-the-art, scalable algorithms to production for forecasting time series, personalized ranking, robust statistical analysis of key customer business metrics
Build and maintain the infrastructure for data and model management
Work closely with the Sisu design and engineering teams for ML-adjacent components, such as viz and data processing
Give talks, write blog posts, and produce peer-reviewed publications
Preferred Qualifications
Either 4+ years of professional experience with ML or quantitative analysis, or Ph.D. in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, Mathematics, or Physics
Proficiency with Python and experience with data processing tools (e.g., scipy, numpy, pandas, Pytorch, and Spark)
Competency with forecasting deadlines, modular design, testing, code review, and working with new codebases
Strong technical communication skills
Please note that this is a full-time, non-remote role based in San Francisco.

Sisu is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.",4.1,"Sisu Data
4.1","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
19,Data Scientist (Federal),$88k-$142k (Glassdoor Est.),"C3.ai is a leading enterprise AI software provider for accelerating digital transformation. The comprehensive and proven C3 AI Suite uses a model-driven abstraction layer to enable organizations to develop, deploy, and operate enterprise scale AI applications 40x to 100x faster than alternative approaches. www.c3.ai

C3.ai is looking for a Data Scientist (Federal) to solve challenging, novel, and large-scale enterprise problems for Federal clients. In this capacity you will represent C3.ai as a technical expert and help our team to frame problems, choose appropriate machine learning algorithms, and identify opportunities to leverage the C3.ai Suite.

Recent examples of successful engagements include predictive maintenance on oil and gas equipment and aircraft subsystems, supply chain optimization, manufacturing yield optimization, chronic disease prevention, customer spend prediction, and equipment lifetime optimization.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve results at large-scale.

This role requires US Citizenship or US Permanent Residence.

Your Responsibilities:
Become an expert in the C3.ai Suite and associated tools to teach, enable, and assist C3.ai customers to build their own applications.
Design and deploy machine learning pipelines for C3.ai's federal customers.
Collaborate with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
US Citizenship or US Permanent Resident
Bachelor's degree
Strong understanding of machine learning algorithms & principles (regression analysis, time series, probabilistic models, supervised classification and unsupervised learning), and their application
Strong background in mathematics, statistics, and computer science
Excellent programming skills in Python
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference
Excellent verbal and written communication
Preferred
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields. Specialization in machine learning preferred.
Active Department of Defense (DoD) security clearance (Secret or higher)
Excellent programming skills in JavaScript. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
Experience with deep learning, natural language processing, computer vision, or reinforcement learning
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.)
C3.ai provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits.

C3.ai is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.",4.5,"C3.ai
4.5","Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
20,"Senior Director, Oncology R&D – Clinical Scientist",$80-$138 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Join a Legacy of Innovation 110 Years and Counting!

Daiichi Sankyo Group is dedicated to the creation and supply of innovative pharmaceutical therapies to improve standards of care and address diversified, unmet medical needs of people globally by leveraging our world-class science and technology. With more than 100 years of scientific expertise and a presence in more than 20 countries, Daiichi Sankyo and its 15,000 employees around the world draw upon a rich legacy of innovation and a robust pipeline of promising new medicines to help people. In addition to a strong portfolio of medicines for cardiovascular diseases, under the Group’s 2025 Vision to become a “Global Pharma Innovator with Competitive Advantage in Oncology,” Daiichi Sankyo is primarily focused on providing novel therapies in oncology, as well as other research areas centered around rare diseases and immune disorders.

Job Summary:

Oversees a number of trials of a multinational program in a specific indication, i.e., multiple multinational phase II/III clinical trials; Reviews regulatory documents from cross functional, holistic perspective; Represents clinical function at meetings with health authorities; Oversees management and performance of CRO. Occasional interactions with CRO senior leadership as needed; Participates in creation of developmental and regulatory strategy in collaboration with Regulatory Affairs; Drafts clinical development plans, protocol profiles and sections of key submission documents; Point of contact for interactions with regulatory-agency clinical reviewing divisions on clinical matters; Supports marketing in developing a commercial strategy include biomarker strategy; Represents Clinical Development as Global Clinical Lead or as Team Leader (ITL-ISTL).

Responsibilities:

Study Strategy: For Phase 2 and Phase 3 registrational studies: Provides the strategic direction to BD&O for EDC, edit checks, data quality listings, SAP, DM plan, Reviews patient population and protocol compliance for consistency with study strategy, Develops biomarker strategy in collaboration with Translational Medicine, Collaborates with external KEEs to refine study plans; Prepares and participate in regulatory agency meetings, if applicable; Defines study strategy across clinical trials within an indication or project; Attends EOP2 meeting and represents clinical/TMCP.

Study Planning and Execution: Clinical Study Lead (CSL) for large Phase 3 registrational study(ies); Develop prospective contingency plans for management of key risks in a large study or project; Clearly define study priorities and high level execution plan, communicate to members of study team within sponsor, CRO and vendors; Ensure clear and effective lines of communication and decision-making process cross-functionally and cross-regionally; Facilitate team coordination.

Study outputs: For Phase 3 studies: Drafts responses to IRBs and HA, Collaborates with Translational Medicine to ensure appropriate biomarker, PK / PD measurements, Reviews emerging clinical data regularly, Leads dose-escalation meetings, Performs quality assessment with delivery lead e.g. review TLG before DBL, and quality check of data, Works with BD&O to ensure SAP updates; Interact with Key External Experts (KEEs) to validate interpretation of study results; Present results to regulatory agencies during pre-submission meetings; Interpret study results in context of other studies in the project and other drugs used for the indication.

External collaboration: Develops and leads Ad-Board with top tier KOLs for project level strategic advice; Develops and leads steering committee for Phase 3 registrational study; Consults with KOLS for advice on complex development or safety issues.

Scientific, Program related: Integrated Study Team (IST) representative or IST leader on study team; Responsible before senior management for the creation and execution of development strategies for program/s under IST; Obtains cross-functional alignment ; Leads development and execution of Product Development Plan and clinical development strategy; Leads Integrated Project Team (IPT) working closely with Global Project Management to ensure cross-functional coordination and focus to agreed strategy; Coordinates clinical activities across the project; Represents IPT to Sr. Management.

Additional non-study related activities: Provides input on KEE selection for Therapeutic Area; Reviews content to be shared with KEEs; Frequent involvement in Business Development activities for late stage compounds; Involvement with in-licensing and acquisitions on due diligence activities; Major contributor to portfolio decisions.

Qualifications: Successful candidates will be able to meet the qualifications below with or without a reasonable accommodation.

Education/Experience:

Master’s degree; PharmD, PhD, or equivalent; Postgraduate training in TA or related specialty, or equivalent, desirable

9+ years with PharmD, PhD and relevant clinical experience
12+ years with Master’s degree and relevant clinical experience

Daiichi Sankyo, Inc. is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",3.2,"Daiichi Sankyo, Inc.
3.2","Basking Ridge, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1899,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
21,Data Engineer,$53k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"Basic Qualifications :

Bachelor’s degree in systems engineering, a related specialized area or field is required (or equivalent experience) plus a minimum of 2 years of relevant experience; or a Master's degree.

CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:

A TS/SCI security clearance with the ability to obtain a Polygraph is required at time of hire. Candidates must be able to obtain the Polygraph within a reasonable amount of time from date of hire. Applicants selected will be subject to a U.S. Government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Due to the nature of work performed within our facilities, U.S. citizenship is required.

Responsibilities for this Position:

Developing mission-critical systems that help keep people safe is what we do. At General Dynamics Mission Systems, you’ll be part of the team that helps heroes make a true impact. The work we do is important. The challenges we face are career-defining. The opportunity we can offer is one-of-a-kind.

We apply advanced technologies such as Artificial Intelligence, Blockchain, AR/VR, Cloud Native and Quantum Physics to solve our customers’ missions in cyber, RF, undersea, interstellar space and everything in between.

As a Data Engineer, you’ll lead model and simulation activities as you participate in requirements analysis and management, functional analysis, performance analysis, system design, trade studies, systems integration and test (verification). It’s your chance to step up to the challenge and prove you’re ready to lead the world.

REPRESENTATIVE DUTIES AND TASKS:

We are seeking a Data Engineer to support the Insider Threat mission. Data Engineers work with various security system data owners to automate data integration and collection strategies. Work closely with the data science team to ensure data cleanliness and accuracy.

Support data science team by designing, developing and implementing scalable ETL process for disparate datasets into a Hadoop infrastructure
Design, develop, implement and maintain data ingestion process from various disparate datasets using StreamSets (experience with StreamSets not mandatory)
Develop processes to identify data drift and malformed records
Develop technical documentation and standard operating procedures
Leads technical tasks for small teams or projects

KNOWLEDGE SKILLS AND ABILITIES:

Working knowledge of entity resolution systems
Experience with messages systems like Kafka
Experience with NoSQL and/or graph databases like MongoDB or ArangoDB
Any of the following databases: SQL, MongoDB, Oracle, Postgres
Working experience with ETL processing
Working experience with data workflow products like StreamSets or NiFi
Working experience with Python RESTful API services, JDBC
Experience with Hadoop and Hive/Impala
Experience with Cloudera Data Science Workbench is a plus
Understanding of pySpark Leadership experience
Creative thinker
Ability to multi-task
Excellent use and understanding of data engineering concepts, principles, and theories

#CJ3

#CB

Company Overview:

General Dynamics Mission Systems (GDMS) engineers a diverse portfolio of high technology solutions, products and services that enable customers to successfully execute missions across all domains of operation. With a global team of 13,000+ top professionals, we partner with the best in industry to expand the bounds of innovation in the defense and scientific arenas. Given the nature of our work and who we are, we value trust, honesty, alignment and transparency. We offer highly competitive benefits and pride ourselves in being a great place to work with a shared sense of purpose. You will also enjoy a flexible work environment where contributions are recognized and rewarded. If who we are and what we do resonates with you, we invite you to join our high performance team!

General Dynamics is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer that is committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/Disability/Veteran",3.6,"General Dynamics Mission Systems, Inc
3.6","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1952,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
22,Senior Big Data Engineer - *Sr. Java Developer,$69k-$138k (Glassdoor Est.),"Integral Ad Science (IAS) is a global technology and data company that builds verification, optimization, and analytics solutions for the advertising industry and we're looking for a Sr. Big Data Engineer to join our Core Data Engineering team. If you are excited by technology that has the power to handle hundreds of thousands of transactions per second; collect tens of billions of events each day; and evaluate thousands of data-points in real-time all while responding in just a few milliseconds, then IAS is the place for you!

What you'll get to do:
Work on Big Data technologies such as Hadoop, MapReduce, Kafka, Spark and MPP columnar databases
Design, code and maintain components aggregating tens of billions of daily transactions
Lead the entire software lifecycle including hands-on development, code reviews, testing, deployment, and documentation for streaming, batch ETL and RESTful API's
Mentor junior team members
*You should apply if you have most of this:
*5+ years of recent hands-on Java experience
Regular use of collections, multi-threading, JVM memory model, etc.
Great understanding of designing for performance, scalability, and reliability
In-depth understanding of algorithms, scalability and various tradeoffs in a Big Data setting
Proficiency with object oriented programming concepts
Experience with Hadoop MapReduce, Spark, Pig
Experience with AWS big data technologies (s3, emr, glue, etc)
Understanding of full software development life cycle, agile development and continuous integration
Good knowledge of Linux command line tools
Solid understanding of database fundamentals, good knowledge of SQL
Interpersonal and communication skills
Bonus points:
Exposure to messaging frameworks like Kafka or RabbitMQ
Experience with Spark streaming or Flink
*Special Note: If you are a solid backend Java developer looking to leap into and learn Big Data, we will consider you!
About Integral Ad Science

Integral Ad Science (IAS) is the global market leader in digital ad verification, offering technologies that drive high-quality advertising media. IAS equips advertisers and publishers with both the insight and technology to protect their advertising investments from fraud and unsafe environments as well as to capture consumer attention, and drive business outcomes. Founded in 2009, IAS is headquartered in New York with global operations in 18 offices across 13 countries. IAS is part of the Vista Equity Partners portfolio of software companies. For more on how IAS is powering great impressions for top publishers and advertisers around the world, visit integralads.com.

Equal Opportunity Employer:

IAS is an equal opportunity employer, committed to our diversity and inclusiveness. We will consider all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, nationality, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, religion, disability or age. We strongly encourage women, people of color, members of the LGBTQIA community, people with disabilities and veterans to apply.

California Applicant Pre-Collection Notice:

We collect personal information (PI) from you in connection with your application for employment or engagement with IAS, including the following categories of PI: identifiers, personal records, commercial information, professional or employment or engagement information, non-public education records, and inferences drawn from your PI. We collect your PI for our purposes, including performing services and operations related to your potential employment or engagement. For additional details or if you have questions, contact us at compliance@integralads.com.

To learn more about us, please visit http://integralads.com/ and https://muse.cm/2t8eGlN

Attention agency/3rd party recruiters: IAS does not accept any unsolicited resumes or candidate profiles. If you are interested in becoming an IAS recruiting partner, please send an email introducing your company to recruitingagencies@integralads.com. We will get back to you if there's interest in a partnership.",3.5,"Integral Ad Science
3.5","Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
23,Product Strategy Leader - Data Science Technologies,$98k-$158k (Glassdoor Est.),"What We'll Bring:

At TransUnion, we have a welcoming and energetic environment that encourages collaboration and innovation. We’re consistently exploring new technologies and tools to be agile. This environment gives our people the opportunity to hone current skills and build new capabilities, while discovering their genius.

Come be a part of our team – you’ll work with great people, pioneering products and cutting-edge technology.

What You'll Bring:

Advanced knowledge of the product management lifecycle management and go to market processes for B2B software in the data science and machine learning platform space
Experience in managing product portfolio of data science platforms, predictive analytic models, and machine learning commercialization in the financial space will be preferred
Minimum of 7 years’ experience from one of the following areas preferred: risk management, B2B data science technology services, financial services, and/or other similar fields
Understanding of how data science and risk analytics teams have implemented data science software and platforms in the risk analytics space
Undergraduate degree in finance, accounting, mathematics, engineering or one of the hard sciences. MA/MS/MBA or equivalent experience is a plus.
Deep knowledge and experience in product strategy and management, preferably in financial services, risk analytics, or data science technology
Strong leadership skills; ability to take initiative and ownership and effectively leverage resources to successful outcomes without constant direction
Strong problem solving skills; ability to break down complex problems into critical parts, identify the key causes and effectively prioritize and execute way forward
Proven ability to quickly grasp industry and business-wide concepts in order to assess implications to drive actions and to capitalize on opportunities
Strong critical thinking skills, ability to assimilate and understand new concepts in short time frames
Exceptional analytical skills; ability to logically and systematically visualize and efficiently tackle tasks
Superior communication skills (verbal and written)
Outstanding interpersonal skills and ability to work across functions and levels of seniority
Highly organized, excellent project management abilities
Advanced fluency in Excel, PowerPoint and Word
Comfort operating in and delivering high-profile results in ambiguous environments

#LI-JD1

Impact You'll Make:

The Product Strategy Leader - Data Science Technologies will work closely with the VP of Analytics Enablement Solutions to provide leadership in defining, developing, launching, and managing the global data science and analytics product portfolio. You will leverage your domain expertise in the data science platform and risk analytics space to drive the business forward with responsibility for all analytic enablement products globally with a focus on our Prama suite of solutions.

Your role will evolve as we form the group and initially, you will:

Work closely with the VP of Analytics Enablement Solutions to develop the vision and roadmap for the analytics suite of solutions
Accountable for the longer-term P&L performance and strategy for your product portfolio
Develop strategic insights based on market assessments grounded in primary and secondary research
Collaborate with Sales, Markets, Regions, Data Science, Global Technology, Marketing, and the broader Global Solutions Team to create and maintain business plans with clear and measurable targets while ensuring cohesive product offerings
Partners with International Product leads to ensure best practice sharing between US and TU International Markets
Develop and deliver senior level presentations to articulate business plans
Review and approve product backlogs
Assist in designing and establishing a process for continuous improvement of our analytics suite of solutions, leveraging a data-driven, hypothesis-test-learn approach
Gather competitive intelligence on an ongoing basis, monitor strategy and competitive response for key competitive solution sets

#LI-JD1

We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability status, veteran status, marital status, citizenship status, sexual orientation, gender identity or any other characteristic protected by law.

TransUnion's Internal Job Title:

Sr Advisor, Product Management",4.0,"TransUnion
4.0","Chicago, IL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1968,Company - Public,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
24,SCIENTIST,$42k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary

The incumbent is responsible for execution of chemistry or microbiology related protocols for instrument qualification, instrument software validation, test method validation, test method verification and test method transfer. Executed protocols shall support implementation of method of analysis for API, raw material, in-process, finished product and stability samples in the Quality Control Chemistry and Microbiology laboratory.
Reports to QC Principal Scientist
Duties are of routine nature following established standard operating procedures. Problem recognition ability is needed. Non-critical functions, and to a lesser degree some critical functions, utilize independent action and decision making with follow-up reporting to supervision.
Supervisor directly responsible for training, assignment of duties and review/approval of work. Direction, training and some day-to-day supervision may also come from a Lead Scientist.
Mentors Associate Scientists and Technicians.
Effectively communicates work and results both orally and in writing
Responsibilities

PRINCIPAL ACTIVITIES PERFORMED BY THE INCUMBENT

Develops new Standard Operating Procedures for laboratory test procedures. Maintains SOPs to assure constant compliance with corporate and regulatory requirements.
Drug product testing experience consisting of Standard Solutions, and ready to administer prefilled syringes (containing controlled substances, Biosimilars, and various injectable products).
Monitors and tracks laboratory test results.
Performs training on laboratory instrumentation for lower level positions and mentors them to further their development.
Schedules, initiates, coordinates, performs routine testing of raw material, in-process, finished product and stability samples, as needed.
Informs supervisory personnel of all relevant events impacting the operations and performance of the department discrepancies and out of limit conditions. Investigates and identifies additional testing to be performed to resolve these issues in a timely manner.
Maintains knowledge of current cGMPs and GLPs. Maintains compliance with current compendial methods.
Provides instrument/software qualification, method validation, method verification and method transfer test support.
Follows safety requirements and maintains good housekeeping of lab areas.
Reviews work performed by department staff for accuracy, completeness and conformance to specifications.
Supports new product development related testing as directed.
Prepares and performs routine analysis by HPLC, GC, AA/ICP or other analytical instrumentation including assay and impurity methods, collects, processes and calculates generated data.
Works with Principal Scientists, Lead Scientists, Supervisors, and/or Managers in development and validation of new laboratory test methods.
Develops protocols for laboratory methods and production process validations. Participates in performing validation work. Performs studies and validations required to support Product Development.
Coordinates the assembling of supplemental information for regulatory submissions.
Makes and implements timely decisions within the established authority and consistent with company policies, procedures and practices.
Performs protocol discrepancy reports as acceptance criteria are not met with associated protocols.
Performs training for QC staff on new instrumentation or new analytical or microbiology related test methods.
Assumes additional duties and responsibilities as assigned by management.

REQUIREMENTS

If Chemistry Related Discipline: B.S. in Chemistry or related field with 3-5 years of experience preferred. Background in analysis on HPLC and other analytical techniques (UPLC, LCMS, Gas Chromatography, Gas Chromatography with Head Space, Coagulation Analyzer, Atomic Absorption Spectroscopy, Automated Pipetting Platform, BET Analyzer, TOC Analyzer, NIR, FT-NIR, RAMAN, MT LabX, Waters Empower 3) desirable.
If Biochemistry Related Discipline: B.S in Biochemistry, Biology or related field with 3-5 years of experience preferred. Background in analysis on Size Exclusion-HPLC and other analytical techniques (UPLC, LCMS, Gas Chromatography, Gas Chromatography with Head Space, Tissue Culture, Capillary Electrophoresis, Solid Phase Extraction, SDS-PAGE, ELISA, Coagulation Analyzer, Atomic Absorption Spectroscopy, Automated Pipetting Platform, NIR, FT-NIR, RAMAN, MT LabX, Waters Empower 3) desirable.
If Microbiology Related Discipline: B.S. in Microbiology or related field with 3-5 years of experience preferred. Background in analysis on Microbiology Instrumentation/Equipment and other microbiology related techniques (LAL Automated Pipetting Platform, BET Analyzer, TOC Analyzer, Particulate Matter Analyzer, MT LabX, Isolator/Biosafety Hood Sterility Development, Bioburden Enhancement/Inhibitory Techniques,) desirable. Excellent verbal and written communication skills are essential.

IND-1

#GD

Additional Information

We offer an excellent salary and benefits package including medical, dental and vision coverage, as well as life insurance, disability, 401K with company match, and wellness program.

Fresenius Kabi is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disabilities, or protected veteran status.",3.5,"Fresenius Kabi
3.5","Wilson, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
25,Medical Laboratory Scientist,-1,"Performs routine and stat laboratory test procedures working as a generalist in Chemistry, Hematology, Blood Bank, Immunology and Microbiology. Ensures the validity of test results by performing quality control, instrument calibration and routine maintenance on all instruments and manual test. Provides excellent customer service to patients, physicians and other hospital staff. Must we able to work alone as well as part of a team. Ability to multitask, prioritize and perform under pressure is essential.

RESPONSIBILITIES:

Collects and processes clinical specimens for routine and stat testing.
Performs reviews, accepts and reports laboratory tests as outlined in the laboratory procedure manual. Adheres to quality assurance and quality control procedures prior preforming all testing.
Maintains and operates laboratory equipment. Has the ability to detect and trouble shoot instrument malfunctions and or failures.
Helps to ensure that proper inventory is maintained for all instruments and other laboratory supplies.
Participates in established Quality Management activities. Collects, evaluates and reports quality management data in order to improve laboratory performance.
Attends and participates in continuing education programs. Monitors, participates and evaluates proficiency testing as well as taking an active role in corrective action.
Participates in job competency evaluation programs and takes an active role in accomplishing laboratory team goals.
Works closely with all laboratory staff to ensure timely client service and accurate test results.
Maintains strict confidentiality in all situations and with all relevant documentation.
Arrives on time, works scheduled hours and takes an equal amount of call.
Performs any and all additional duties assigned by the Laboratory Manager.

Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelor of Science in Medical Laboratory Science or equivalent.
ASCP registration or registry eligibility required.
New graduates are encouraged to apply and must be board certified within six months of hire.
Candidate will be required to relocate.
Willingness to be on call is a must.
Competent phlebotomy skills are required.

Hours: 40/week

Shift: Days, some evenings, weekend, Holidays and call rotation",-1,Franklin County Medical Center,"Preston, ID",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
26,Data Scientist,-1,"About Imperfect

Imperfect Foods was founded in 2015 with a mission to reduce food waste and build a better food system for everyone. We offer imperfect (yet delicious) produce, affordable pantry items, and quality meat and dairy. We deliver them conveniently to our customers’ doorsteps and pride ourselves on offering up to a 30% discount compared to grocery store prices. Our customers can get the healthy, seasonal produce they want alongside the grocery staples they rely on, without having to compromise their budget or values. We’re proving that doing the right thing for the planet doesn’t have to cost more, and that shopping for quality ingredients can support the people and resources that it takes to grow our favorite foods.

We're headquartered in San Francisco with operations all over the country. Check our website to see if there is an Imperfect near you!

We're looking for folks who are positive, motivated, and ready to change the world. If that sounds like you, drop us a line!

How we are protecting employees from COVID-19

At Imperfect Foods, employee health and safety is our top priority. We have implemented processes and precautions to prevent the spread of COVID-19 in our facilities. We provide gloves, masks, and hand sanitizer to all essential employees who must report to work. Before entering our warehouse, employees have their temperatures checked. In addition, we take great care to ensure frequently touched surfaces are sanitized throughout the day and all warehouses are fully sanitized weekly.

We have also implemented an Emergency Sick Leave policy providing full-time and part-time employees 2 additional weeks of paid time off and up to 26 weeks paid leave if they have a confirmed case of COVID-19.

About the Role:

We're looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join our Business Intelligence team. The ideal candidate will develop and automate algorithms that integrate with various parts of the business to better our customer understanding, improve our customer experience, and drive operational efficiency. Our Data Scientist will collaborate with departments across the company, including Marketing, Operations, and Engineering, for a wide and deep impact. Some example projects include demand forecasting to help with warehouse labor and inventory planning, optimizations to improve warehouse efficiency, personalization and recommendation algorithms to enable customers to discover relevant products, and product subscription cadence optimization. As an early member of the data science team, your role will influence the tech stack and frameworks we develop. This role requires analytical horsepower to efficiently analyze, and communication skills to tell a story with data.

If you like the idea of swimming in data, fighting food waste, and working with a cohesive and productive team, we want to hear from you!
Responsibilities:
Build production grade models on large-scale datasets by utilizing sophisticated statistical modeling, machine learning, or data mining techniques
Provide in-depth analyses and insights for strategic and business initiatives, while maintaining analytics roadmap to prioritize initiatives, communicate timelines, and ensure successful, timely completion of projects
Collaborate cross-functionally to identify impactful business problems and translate them into structured analyses, measurable insights, and reports and dashboards
Assist with the development and deployment of analytical tools and develop custom models to observe progress, uncover insights in the data, and automate analyses
Participate in code reviews and software development standard methodologies
Skills and Qualifications:
3+ years of professional experience as a data scientist, including deploying and maintaining code in a production environment
Confident with machine learning techniques and sophisticated analytics (e.g. regression, classification, clustering, time series, econometrics, mathematical optimization)
Highly skilled in SQL and Python. Experience running complex analytics in a scripting language
Bonus: experience using R and other languages
Has a solid grasp of statistical applications and methods (experimentation, probabilities)
Experience with preparing large data sets for analysis
About You:
You're able to clearly and dynamically translate data into a relevant story with initiative partners, including technical and non-technical audiences
You demonstrate intellectual curiosity, and a knack for translating information into impactful insights, with data big, small, structured, and imprecise
You have the insight to take ambiguous problems and tackle them in a structured, hypothesis-driven, data-supported way
You're a self-starter with the ability to prioritize multiple projects at once
You're passionate about our mission to eliminate food waste and create a better food system for all
Details of the Position:
Full-time exempt position reporting to the Director of Business Intelligence
Candidate can be remotely located within the US
Salary and employee stock options commensurate with experienceCompetitive benefits package including health care, paid vacation, 401K, paid parental leave, and recurring credit towards your Imperfect account!
Physical Requirements:
Sedentary work; involves sitting most of the time
Occasional movement around the office may be necessary
Regular work with computers, including keyboards, mouses, and screens
Regular use of mobile devices, including smartphones and tablets
Individuals seeking employment at Imperfect Foods are considered without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, gender, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, or sexual orientation.

U.S. E-Verify Notice: Imperfect Foods participates in E-Verify in the United States. Imperfect will provide the U.S. Social Security Administration (SSA) and, if necessary, the U.S. Department of Homeland Security (DHS), with information from each new employee's Form I-9 to confirm work authorization.",3.4,"Imperfect Foods
3.4",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Stores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
27,Machine Learning Scientists/Engineers,-1,"Machine Learning Scientists/Engineers
Company Name *NovoDynamics, Inc. *

Company Location: Ann Arbor, Michigan

Fast-growing AI company is seeking highly-qualified scientists and engineers with experience in ML
(Machine Learning), DL (Deep Learning) and Computer Vision to address real-world challenges in the
Health Care industry. If you have a successful track record in software development, knowledge of current software technologies and methodologies, and excellent communication and interpersonal skills, we want to talk with you. Experience with image processing technologies is a plus.

Desired skills:

• Experience with data noise removal, data augmentation, dataset truthing and construction
• Expertise in visualizing and manipulating large datasets
• Familiarity with Java and Python a plus
• Proficiency with a deep learning library such as Keras or deeplearning4j a plus

Responsibilities may include:

• Understanding business objectives and developing models that help to achieve them, along with metrics to track progress

• Analyzing DL algorithms that could be used to solve a given problem and ranking them by their success probability

• Exploring and visualizing data to gain an understanding of it, then identifying differences in data distribution that could affect performance when deploying the model in the real world

• Verifying data quality and/or ensuring it via data cleaning
• Defining validation strategies
• Training models and tuning hyperparameters
• Analyzing errors of the model and designing strategies to overcome them

Why work for NovoDynamics?

• Be part of a dynamic team that designs disruptive technologies for the Health Care industry
• Receive great compensation and benefits
• Work in downtown Ann Arbor near the University of Michigan campus
• Enjoy free parking, popcorn, coffee, tea and soft drinks
• Delight in an amazing work environment with interesting and engaged teammates
• Relax with generous and flexible time off
Seniority Level *
Mid-Senior level
Employment Type *
Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $90,000.00 - $170,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Location:
Ann Arbor, MI 48104 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available:
No: Not providing sponsorship for this job
Company's website:
https://www.novodynamics.com and https://www.novohealthdental.com/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.linkedin.com/company/70143/admin/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"NovoDynamics, Inc.
4.0","Ann Arbor, MI",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
28,Geodetic Earth Scientist,$41k-$67k (Glassdoor Est.),"Geodetic Earth Scientists analyze the Earth's gravity and magnetic fields, geophysical structure, material properties, and dynamics for geospatial intelligence and DoD applications. They define and maintain the World Geodetic System (WGS), perform datum transformations between WGS 84 and local datums, and develop spatial and temporal models defining Earth systems. They provide in-depth technical expertise on geodetic and geophysical issues to customers and represent NGA in community forums establishing doctrine and policy.

Additional Job Information
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: 1) NGA is hiring in support of NGA & USSPACECOM's national security missions. It is advertised as an Earth Scientist until a SPACE work role is developed. This position drives SPACE-based derivative requirements / application, & SPACE mission assurance. Contributions will solidify resiliency of national Positioning, Navigation & Timing (PNT). 2) This program lead oversees a team of scientists addressing Geodesy & Geophysics (G&G) challenges related to a PNT SPACE environment. Must have an advanced understanding of DoD/IC processes, activities, standards, & GEOINT operations. Must demonstrate familiarity with SPACE doctrine, strategy, domain & application of Geomatics to understand, prioritize & communicate architecture, production methods & reference systems. Will determine & define distinct deliverables required for specific projects & initiatives with clear alignment to DoD/IC requirements & familiarity with acquisition & Planning, Programming, & Budgeting Execution (PPBE) Process. 3) Must be fluent in DoD program management to define, plan, develop, implement, deliver & maintain alternative positional reference systems to support SPACE PNT beyond the current capabilities of the World Geodetic System (WGS) & associated models. Demonstrate experience in managing stakeholders, scope, budget, risk & schedule in successful delivery of complex geospatial related projects. Develop plans, schedules, project estimates, resource demands, & status reports. Adhere to quality standards & review project deliverables. Excellent written/verbal communication skills & exceptional emotional intelligence. Ability to influence/motivate people across a broad variety of job functions. 4) As senior program manager, will make recommendations to leadership/staff on strategic direction of the Program. Will collaborate with policy, research, product, engineering & operations teams to orchestrate end-to-end policies, practices, procedures & address information & capability gaps. Employ analytical, quantitative & data visualization skills to use data & metrics to back up assumptions, recommendations & drive program decisions. Engage with stakeholders to orchestrate projects, tailor expert advice & discussions to convey the proposed method, data, & results to a large non-technical audience. Provide recommendations on G&G issues to internal / external stakeholders & attend community forums as necessary. 5) Support team, program & cross-functional initiatives to continuously improve processes to increase effectiveness & provide suggestions for best practices. Superintend analysis, including the conceptualization, creation, delivery of new products, tools, services, platforms, & technical solutions & identify full lifecycle requirements. Manage acquisition / mission assurance for geospatial data supporting SPACE, studies potential applications of geomatics tradecraft, & methods / production in a SPACE-based environment. Embed feasibility, sustainability, interoperability, resiliency, situational awareness, contingency, security & readiness in program planning. 6) Experience managing enterprise level projects in the following areas or processes: reference frame transformations, geocentric / lunar-centric systems, developing methodologies, procedures & production in support of SPACE, navigation, & operations, Earth / SPACE-based collection systems, & mission assurance. 7) Desired credentials: Defense Acquisition Workforce Improvement Act (DAWIA) level III, Six Sigma and/or Project Management Professional (PMP) 8) Exhibit technical knowledge, enable healthy partnerships & balance between the mission & employee development. He/she establishes & maintains open / ongoing dialogue with team members, assists performance expectations for direct-report employees & establishes a team who upholds to NGA core values; Excellence, Accountability, Respect, Teamwork, Honesty. 9) Applicants currently with a Top Secret security clearance are desired but is not mandatory to apply for this position. Additional Application Requirement: You may be asked to complete one or more assessments in addition to the application you submit on this website as part of your application to NGA. These assessments may include but are not limited to: 1) Online questionnaires or assessments that require you to describe your job-related knowledge, skills, abilities, or other characteristics that are aligned with the mandatory and desirable qualifications of this job posting. The information you provide in the application you submit must support the response you provide to this questionnaire. You will receive an email to describe any additional assessments required. Please monitor your emails and complete any required assessments as soon as possible.

Mandatory Qualifications
MANDATORY QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: For this particular job, applicants must meet all competencies reflected under the Mandatory Qualification Criteria to include education (if required). Online applications must demonstrate qualification by providing specific examples and associated results, in response to the announcement's mandatory criteria specified in this vacancy announcement: 1. Previous experience extracting and analyzing information from various sources and briefing the results to an audience 2. Documented experience of problem identification, analysis and resolution 3. Experience working in groups to develop solutions to problems and deliver those solutions to a customer 4. Demonstrated experience in technical program management (Astrophysics, Astrodynamics, Physics, Geophysics, Geodesy, Geosciences, or Orbital Mechanics) 5. Experience in Reference Frame Transformations and Coordinate Systems EDUCATION REQUIREMENT: A. Education: Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in Geodesy, Mathematics, Physical Science, or a related discipline that includes at least 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework in any combination of Astronomy, Cartography, Computer Science, Engineering Science, Geodesy, Geology, Geomatics, Geophysics, Mathematics, Meteorology, Orbital Mechanics, Photogrammetry, Physical Science, Physics, Remote Sensing, or Surveying. Coursework must include differential and integral calculus. -OR- B. Combination of Education and Experience: A minimum of 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework in any area listed in option A, plus experience in conducting work related to Civil Engineering, Geodesy, Geophysics, Geotechnical Analysis, Geodetic Surveying, or a related field that demonstrates the ability to successfully perform the duties associated with this work. As a rule, every 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework is equivalent to one year of experience. Candidates should show that their combination of education and experience totals 4 years. PHYSICAL REQUIREMENT: Distinguish principal colors and shades/hues of principal colors; Near visual acuity of 20/40 or better with or without corrective lenses; Far visual acuity of 20/60 or better binocular with or without corrective lenses

Highly Desired Qualifications
QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: In addition to the mandatory qualifications, experience in the following is desired: 1. Having achieved an advanced degree (Masters or Masters and PhD) in one or more of the following areas: Geodesy, Mathematics, Physical Science, or a related discipline that includes at least 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework in any combination of Applied Physics, Astronomy, Astrophysics, Astrodynamics, Engineering Science, Geodesy, Geodetic Astronomy, Geomatics, Geophysics, Mathematics, Orbital Mechanics, Physical Science, Physics, Remote Sensing, or Geodetic Surveying. Coursework would include differential equations and integral calculus. 2. Customer service principles; DoD organizational structure, mission, goals, and priorities; NGA organizational units' missions and functions; decision-making processes; experience and willingness to brief groups; performing scientific analysis; experience/knowledge of computer networking; knowledge of statistical analysis; recent experience in performing scientific analysis; and demonstrated ability to learn new technology. 3. Experience delivering strategic support; develop mission statements, vision statements, operational goals and objectives; integrate doctrine, strategy, concepts, and capability development; broker stakeholder interactions and participate in conferences, panels and policy forums. 4. Experience performing program oversight; anchor team activities in well-defined and traceable requirements; develop plans, manage budgets, schedules, risk and performance; track actions, identify milestones, construct and maintain roadmaps, and report progress; lead integration activities and matrix teams; experience and willingness to brief groups.

Additional Job Requirements
You must be able to obtain and retain a Top Secret security clearance with access to Sensitive Compartmented Information. In addition, you are subject to a Counterintelligence Polygraph examination in order to maintain access to Top Secret information. All employees are subject to a periodic examination on a random basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Refusal to take the examination may result in denial of access to Top Secret information, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs. Employees with SCI access and who are under NGA cognizance are required to submit a Security Financial Disclosure Report, SF-714, on an annual basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Failure to comply may negatively impact continued access to Top Secret information, Information Systems, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs.

Pay, Benefits, & Work Schedule
PROMOTION OPPORTUNITY: Promotion opportunities allow applicants at all band levels to be considered. Qualifications for NGA positions do not include specific time-in-band requirements. NGA will emphasize quality of experience, rather than duration, and assess how the quality of the experience demonstrates possession of the knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies necessary for successful job performance in the NGA occupational structure. Band 05 $128,669 - $167,275 PERMANENT CHANGE IN STATION: PCS expenses are not authorized. Pay is only part of the compensation you will earn working for the Federal Government. We offer a broad array of benefits programs and family friendly flexibilities to meet the needs of you and your family. For more information on the array of benefits programs, please visit https://www.intelligencecareers.gov/nga/ngabenefits.html

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $128,669.00 - $167,275.00 per year

Schedule:
Day shift",3.9,"National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency
3.9","Saint Louis, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Government,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
29,LEAD COMPUTER SCIENTIST - LEAD ENGINEER - PRINCIPAL ENGINEER - SPACE AVIONICS,$77k-$150k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are:


As a recognized leader in space systems, SwRI develops avionics, data storage, and on-orbit processing electronics enabling next generation missions throughout the solar system.


Objectives of this Role:

As part of SwRI’s Space Avionics Flight Software Team, you’re work will benefit humankind through enabling scientific discoveries, improved weather forecasting, in-orbit satellite servicing, and revolutionizing on-orbit processing.

Daily and Monthly Responsibilities:


Lead, design, develop, and verify mission, spacecraft and instrument flight software for a variety of space applications applying sound software engineering disciplines and practices.
Perform and direct all phases of the system lifecycle including proposal development, applied research, requirements generation, design, implementation, testing, integration, installation, and documentation.
Perform software project management functions including project planning, cost and schedule development, progress tracking against plans, programmatic and technical reviews, etc.
Support related systems engineering activities and maintain relationships with other technical disciplines and project functional areas.
Interact and interface with clients including developing technical presentations. Travel to client and team organization facilities is required and varies by project.

Requirements:


Requires an Bachelors with a 3.00 GPA in Software Engineering, Software Development, Computer Engineering, Computer Science, or related
At least 8 years of direct experience designing software for high reliability embedded systems. Experience in working with hardware preferred
Must be able to work independently and in project team environments
Must have good organizational skills and attention to detail
Must be an embedded systems software designer/developer, have experience with real time operating systems, and be familiar with the design of real-time systems. Proficiency in C/C++ for embedded systems, including algorithm and data structure design required
Experience with networking/socket programming and Python, as well as, familiarity with VxWorks, embedded Linux, RTEMS OS for embedded systems
Interest and/or experience in working with hardware and direct space flight design experience a plus
Excellent Communication Skills and the ability to thrive in a collaborative team environment
A valid/clear driver's license is required


Special Requirements:


Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas | Austin, Texas


For more information about this division, visit the Space Science & Engineering home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.1,"Southwest Research Institute
4.1","Austin, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
30,Formulation Scientist (Pet Food),-1,"Zenwise Health is a high-growth consumer products company based in Orlando, FL that is fast becoming a leader in supplemental nutrition for both pets (ZestyPaws.com) and people (ZenwiseHealth.com). We are looking for our person to fill our newly created position and for you to join our team of passionate and dedicated individuals who believe nutrition is the foundation of health and happiness for both pets and people.
The Company*
Founded by a team of devoted wellness enthusiasts in 2014, Zenwise provides premium supplements that encourage healthy lifestyles for people and pets of all ages. With a company culture rooted in passion, quality, transparency, and innovation, we are committed to making the journey to wellness a seamless experience that enables people and pets to achieve healthier and happier lives.
What You Will Do: *
The Food Scientist/ Formulation Scientist will assist the Director of Product Development with the *execution of Zesty Paws’ extensive and dynamic Pet product development pipeline.* The Scientist must be an extremely detail-oriented leader capable of working cross-functionally in a fast-paced environment with both internal and external stakeholders. This role is responsible for all aspects of formula development from pre-formulation to commercialization to achieve new product development goals. The Scientist reports to the Director of Product Development.

Job Responsibilities:
Research, develop, create, and commercialize formulations to support the development of new and novel products and/or optimization of existing products.
Investigate and translate research results and scientific data into engaging narratives to support product development efforts.
Coordinate the execution of bench-top, pilot, and manufacturing scale-up and verification batches with speed and robustness.
Troubleshoot and solve complex formulations and technical challenges with speed and robustness.
Manage and organize substantiation files for product claims.
Work with regulatory to transfer over supported and allowable claims.
Review packaging to confirm allowable claims and correct formula and panel information.
Develop prototypes in a test kitchen.
Oversee receipt and organization of prototype samples.
Oversee sample testing, palatability testing (internal and with external labs).
Work with Supply Chain Procurement Manager to ensure Zesty supplied ingredients are procured for samples and production.
Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:
Four-year college degree in Chemistry, Food Science, Chemical Engineering, or another relevant science degree.
*At least 1 year of relevant experience (3 years preferred) in product development in the Pet or Nutraceutical industry.*
Direct knowledge or experience within the Pet industry.
In-depth knowledge of formula development with pet products, including developing pet dosage form products or supplements in various formats.
Successful track record of robustly developing and commercializing new products in manufacturing.
Comprehensive knowledge and practical experience in product/process development, laboratory techniques, and regulatory requirements and a firm foundation in basic sciences.
Excellent communication skills, written and verbal.
We offer very competitive pay and top of the line benefits and everyone is eligible for a 10% bonus. The position is located in Orlando, FL.

Orlando Office Address:
12141 High Tech Avenue; **Orlando**, **FL**32887*
www.zenwisehealth.com

www.zestypaws.com

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $70,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Product development in the Pet or Nutraceutical industry: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Orlando, FL 32817 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
Company's website:
www.zestypaws.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Zenwise Health/Zesty Paws,"Orlando, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
31,Data Scientist,$57k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"We Are Hiring

Data Scientist

Full-Time, Days

Ascension Via Christi Health - Wichita, KS

Schedule: 8AM-5PM, Monday-Friday

Why Join Ascension?

Ascension Via Christi health has a rich history of serving the people of Kansas. Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, especially to those most in need. We provide care in 22 cities; and employ approximately 6,300 employees.

Working for Ascension is more than just a job. It’s a career where your talent and passion for delivering quality healthcare can make a difference for patients, team members, and the community. Ascension associates are leaders who follow their heart. We give, grow, connect and provide care; together as a team we are committed to our mission of serving the poor and vulnerable.

Our benefits and culture are two aspects of Via Christi that we feel set us apart. We offer tuition reimbursement that is available to both part-time and full-time associates in any position. In Wichita, we also offer child care for day shift workers through our Child Development Center. We also offer a unique program, Breaking Bread, that allows employees to join senior leaders for a meal and conversation about what is working well and ways we can work together to improve. It’s one small way we give employees a voice and work together to offer the best care possible for our patients.

Other reasons to join the Ascension Via Christi team include:
Medical, Dental, Vision, Retirement, PTO, and more!
Tuition Reimbursement
As a non-profit organization, we are a qualified employer for the Public Loan Forgiveness Program
Opportunities to impact your local community
What You Will Do

We are looking for someone who:
Has strong critical thinking skills, decisive judgment, and the ability to work with minimal supervision.
Is able to work in a stressful environment.
Has experience with complex data analysis and modeling.
Has experience designing, developing, and implementing data warehouse architecture.
Has competencies in data transformation and normalization.
Has expert level programming experience (SQL, Python) preferred.
Has the ability to research, interpret, clearly communicate, and apply researched information.
Has knowledge of medical terminology, claims, and coding a plus.
Responsibilities:
Integrates data from multiple sources and supports/performs complex statistical data analysis including multivariate statistical analysis, multilevel modeling, dyadic analysis and/or coarsened exact matching analysis.
Analyzes complex business and competitive issues and discerns the implications for systems support. Identifies, defines, directs and preforms project issue analysis to resolve issues, including analysis of technical and economic feasibility of proposed data solution.
Communicates highly technical information to numerous audiences, including senior management, the user community, and less experienced staff.
Presents data to drive business decisions.
Proposes and leads projects required to support the development of the organization's data infrastructure needs.
What You Will Need

Licenses/Certifications/Registration:

Required Credential(s):
None Required.
Education:
Diploma
High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required.
Work Experience:
3 years of experience preferred.
Equal Employment Opportunity
Via Christi Health is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) and Affirmative Action employer. Applicants receive fair and impartial consideration without regard to race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, color, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, genetic data, or other legally protected status.
Please see the link below for more information.
http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement
http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/ofccp_eeo_supplement_final_jrf_qa_508c.pdf

Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

Ascension Health - VIA Christi participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify link below for more information.

E-Verify (link to E-verify site)",3.4,"Ascension
3.4","Wichita, KS",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
32,"Patient Insights & Healthcare Data Science Lead, US Oncology BU",-1,"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world. Discover more at takedajobs.com.

As a member of Takeda Oncology, your work will contribute to our bold, inspiring vision: We aspire to cure cancer. Here, you’ll build a career grounded in purpose and be empowered to deliver your best.

OBJECTIVES/PURPOSE

Takeda Oncology is seeking a highly data-driven, passionate and self-motivated individual to join our US Insights & Analytics (I&A) team and provide meaningful patient insights that enable effective, data-driven decision making. This Senior Manager level role is a critical position demanding experience in consultative influence utilizing varied approaches to advanced analytics and data science methods, engaging stakeholders at all levels. This senior manager-level role will report to the Head of Patient Insights & Healthcare Data Science and will partner closely with the US Oncology Business Unit (US OBU) functional leads and business stakeholders.

This role will be responsible for bringing an innovative perspective to advise strategic decision around patient analytics and healthcare data science capabilities, supporting commercial, medical and health economics & outcomes research (HEOR) functions. She/he will facilitate and develop actionable recommendations based on patient insights that address key business needs and objectives. This role will be highly involved in all facets of our analytics strategy, ensuring rigorous approach of measuring business value. This role will guide and execute advanced and predictive analytics to support the US OBU’s goal of delivering differentiating patient engagement through value-added services to support patients in the journey of fighting cancer and position Takeda with an ongoing competitive advantage.

ACCOUNTABILITIES

Provide strategic input to identify and develop key patient insights and analytics capability by analyzing longitudinal health data to characterize patient journey and outcomes.

Identify and implement viable data science and epidemiology use cases to solve problems impacting patient outcomes across multiple franchises leveraging diverse data, ranging from specialty pharmacy to claims to real world evidence.

Develop comprehensive data science strategy and framework that builds out core US OBU data science capability and knowledge management platform.

Act as a thought leader in defining data science and machine learning models ensuring the team continues to apply cutting-edge models across patient adherence, segmentation, etc.

Process analytical models and create or modify patient journeys while activating a brand plan and measurable insights, as well as provide recommendations into strategies and tactics for key products in the market.

Translate insights generated from various models and algorithms into actionable insights via story-telling to brand leadership teams along with corresponding data to substantiate the recommendations.

Drive data science initiatives end-to-end by defining, designing and implementing in close collaboration with IT and external vendor partners.

Support data analysts in identifying the key data requirements and build data cohorts for ad hoc and recurring patient analysis across commercial, medical and HEOR functions.

Apply appropriate methodology based on the use cases – including, but not limited to regression, forecasting, clustering, decision trees, simulation, optimization, and machine learning.

Publish the models and perform reviews on an ongoing basis to ensure that the efficacy of results generated is not diminished over time.

Champion in educating stakeholders on the usage of data science across US OBU by demonstrating value to enable data-driven culture.

EDUCATION, BEHAVIOURAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

Bachelor’s degree with minimum 5 years of experience in an analytical field such as statistics, management science, engineering, economics, math, etc.

Experience in pharmaceutical, healthcare and/or pharma healthcare consulting industry with focus on patient analytics and data science in healthcare.

Experience in the pharmaceutical industry with expert knowledge of secondary data sources and suppliers in the US market, such as IQVIA, Prognos, MMIT, Flatiron, etc.

Deep expertise in external data assets (including specialty pharmacy, claims and real world evidence) to enable brand strategy and insights

Excellent influencing skills, with demonstrated ability to work collaboratively and effectively with key business partners, IT leadership teams, and external service providers

Solid business acumen, understanding of what are the key business drivers that will generate desired results.

Having a “growth mindset” and open to new challenges and constructive feedback. Always learning and turning problems into opportunities.

Familiarity with business intelligence and data warehousing principles and techniques

Strong interpersonal skills as well as excellent verbal, written communication & presentation skills

Learn more at takedajobs.com.

No Phone Calls or Recruiters Please.

#LI-KB1

Locations

Cambridge, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.2,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.2","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
33,Computational Biologist / Bioinformatics Data Scientist,$98k-$155k (Glassdoor Est.),"20-Oct-2020

Job ID
305061BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""#1! That’s the ranking that Fast Company gave Novartis in their 2018 list of ‘The World’s Most Innovative Companies’. The Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research (NIBR) is the innovation engine of Novartis. We collaborate across scientific and organizational boundaries, focusing on powerful new technologies that have the potential to help produce therapeutic breakthroughs for patients.

We seek a creative and collaborative data scientist to develop, evaluate, and apply novel methods of data integration of profiling data to enable translational research for drug discovery and development. In this role you will work at the cutting edge of science to tackle important challenges in biomedical research, assessing, integrating, curating, and mining complex data to drive biological/clinical insights.

Your responsibilities will include:

•Playing a key role in an interdisciplinary team of translational research/medical scientists, biologists and computational scientists
•Developing and employing novel approaches to derive and evaluate inferences across diverse data types to identify novel drug targets, biomarkers and therapeutic mechanisms in hepatology, nephrology and other areas of unmet medical need
•Interrogation of large molecular profiling datasets, including aptamer-based multiplex proteomics, to enable precision medicine
•Combining an understanding of biological sciences with computational techniques in statistics and mathematics
•Participating in alliances with external partners at top healthcare institutions, with the opportunity to publish your work

Posting Title
Computational Biologist / Bioinformatics Data Scientist",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
34,Web Data Analyst,$65k-$79k (Employer Est.),"Web Data Analyst
Corporate Headquarters
12575 Uline Drive, Pleasant Prairie, WI 53158

Our customer promise is worth bragging about. Use your marketing and advertising expertise to spread the word and grow our business.

Better together than apart. This position is on-site, and we are looking for good people who share our passion.

Uline is proud to operate as a drug-free workplace. All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.

Position Responsibilities
Collect web data and statistics for Uline’s various eCommerce websites (Uline.com, Uline.ca and Uline.mx).
Analyze data and provide weekly and monthly reports to management.
Make recommendations to improve website and reduce return rates.
Translate complex and analytical work into easy to understand data points.
Respond to ad hoc reporting requests and maintain relationships with various departments.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor's degree.
Experience using Google Analytics or Adobe Analytics.
Experience using a data visualization tool such as Power BI or Tableau.
2+ years experience in website analysis.
Proficient in Microsoft Excel with some knowledge of SQL and / or Google BigQuery.
Well organized and detail-oriented with an ability to multitask.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.

Benefits
Complete insurance coverage that includes medical, dental, vision and life insurance, Flexible Spending Accounts and wellness programs.
401(k) with 5% employer match.
Paid holidays and generous paid time off.
Bonus programs that include annual performance, sales goals and profit sharing.
Scholarship program for children of employees.

Employee Perks
On-site café with executive chefs and seasonal dinner-to-go options.
First-class fitness center with complimentary personal trainers.
Over four miles of beautifully maintained walking trails.
Numerous employee appreciation events throughout the year.
Professional development classes and monthly in-house speakers.

About Uline

Uline is the leading distributor of shipping, industrial and packaging materials to businesses throughout North America. We're a family-owned company whose incredible service, huge inventory and quality products fuel our ongoing expansion and growth. We offer same-day shipping on over 37,500 products in our 812-page catalog and on our state-of-the-art e-commerce website.

Uline provides the essential supplies needed to keep organizations operational and productive. To protect the health and safety of our employees, we have modified our normal operating policies in response to COVID-19.

Each resume submitted gets individually reviewed by our team and retained for 24 months in case a great opportunity opens for you to join our Uline family.",3.5,"Uline
3.5","Pleasant Prairie, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
35,"Senior Data Analyst, Marketing",$54k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why We Need You

As part of the PEMCO Brand & Communications team, the Senior Data Analyst plays a critical role in making our marketing and communications efforts intelligent, efficient, and competitive. We’re looking for someone who can work with every member of the marketing organization to understand our data and turn raw numbers and research findings into compelling narratives and strategic recommendations.

In this role, you’ll collaborate cross-functionally to identify prospects and customers for targeted campaigns. You’ll conduct competitive research to identify gaps and opportunities in customer experiences, product mix, marketing strategies, and more. And you’ll create and review reports to identify strategic opportunities, monitor our sales funnel and forecast its performance, and own team reports including our comprehensive dashboard.

What You'll Be Doing
Work directly with users to gather requirements, provide status updates, and build relationships
Proactively analyze data to answer key questions from stakeholders or out of self-initiated curiosity with an eye for what drives business performance, investigating and communicating areas for improvement in efficiency and productivity
Identify trends and opportunities for growth through analysis of complex data sets
Evaluate for efficiency, problems, and inaccuracies, developing and maintaining protocols for handling, processing, and cleaning data
Develop, implement, and maintain analytic systems
Develop source-to-target mappings and information-model specification documents for data sets
Define and implement data acquisition and integration logic, selecting appropriate combination of methods and tools within defined technology stack to ensure optimal scalability and performance of the solution
Create and maintain rich interactive visualizations through data interpretation and analysis integrating various reporting components from multiple data sources
Work closely with project managers to understand and maintain focus on their analytical needs, including identifying critical metrics and KPIs, and deliver actionable insights to relevant decision-makers
Demonstrate behaviors consistent with PEMCO's policies, values, code of ethics, and business conduct
Authentically support the PEMCO Brand and constantly are on the lookout for top talent to join us to achieve our Mission to Worry Less and Live More
Other duties as assigned
What You'll Bring
B.A. or B.S. degree or equivalent work experience (Mathematics, Computer Science, Economics, or Statistics) is required
6 years of experience in a data analyst role is required
One (1+) years of experience in working with automated testing tools (Quick Test Professional / Selenium)
MS Office: Skilled proficiency in Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Outlook, Access is required
MS Office: Skilled proficiency in MS Visio is required
Excellent written communications skills sufficient to write systems documentation, reports, and business correspondences in an organized and concise fashion is required
Ability to verbally present complex concepts and technical information to a non-technical audience is required
Communicates clearly and informatively, verbally and in writing, with colleagues, customers, and the community in both technical and non-technical professional language is required
Passionate about working with disparate datasets bringing data together to answer business questions
Collaborates to create, manage, and translate data to meaningful insights. Can work with external vendors to integrate data for analysis; knows how to build efficient and scalable infrastructure and data models
Ability to analyze, diagnose and resolve complex unstructured problems quickly, efficiently, and collaboratively
We've Got You Covered
Competitive salary
200% match on your 401(k) up to 6% of your pay
Generous medical, dental, disability and life insurance plans
A friendly, professional work environment
The opportunity to work at a place of integrity, where customer service is emphasized
At PEMCO, we celebrate and support our differences. We know employing a team rich in diverse thoughts, experiences, and opinions allows our employees, our products and our community to flourish. PEMCO is honored to be an equal opportunity workplace. We are dedicated to equal employment opportunities regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity, sexual orientation or Veteran status.",4.3,"PEMCO Insurance
4.3","Seattle, WA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1949,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
36,"Data Scientist, Senior",$112k-$182k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking a Data Scientist (Senior)) in the role of the Maritime Safety Office.This position is to provide both digital and hardcopy maritime products, services, and data to support worldwide Safety of Navigation. Without accurate and up-to-date nautical products, military platforms are at increased risk when they conduct operations, transport personnel and deliver material. The U.S. Navy has made it clear to NGA that it will continue to require both digital and hard copy maritime products for the foreseeable future. Services procured under this contract will primarily support the production and maintenance of Maritime GEOINT at NCE facilities.

Responsibilities include:
Strong data management skills, including SQL, NoSQL (MongoDB), and triplestore/graph databases
Experience creating and managing ETL processes using Ni-Fi or similar software using both structured and unstructured data
AWS experience, particularly with EC2, S3, Cloudwatch, RDS
Experience with data visualization tools
Experience with or working knowledge of ElasticSearch or similar
Perform ad-hoc analysis and present results in a clear manner
Conduct undirected research and frame open-ended industry/customer questions
Recommend cost-effective changes to existing procedures and strategies
Create/maintain tools to extract features from a variety of sources including raster to vector, vector to vector, text to vector, and text to database
Write/maintain Python Scripts in ARCGIS to improve efficiency of the production process
Support Business Processing Re-Engineering
Perform Data Conversion/migration
Perform Business Analytics
Work with the Government on new production capabilities/services
Strong data management skills, including SQL, NoSQL (MongoDB), and RDF
(triplestore/graph) databases
Linux experience
Basic Qualifications:
Strong data management skills, including SQL, NoSQL (MongoDB), and triplestore/graph databases
Experience creating and managing ETL processes using Ni-Fi or similar software using both structured and unstructured data
AWS experience, particularly with EC2, S3, Cloudwatch, RDS
Experience with data visualization tools
Experience with or working knowledge of ElasticSearch or similar
Perform ad-hoc analysis and present results in a clear manner
Desired Skills:
Experience with combining digital cartography, computer technology, GIS, cartographic and geospatial
production techniques, remote sensing, photogrammetry, and digital data formats
Ability to clean/prune data to discard irrelevant information
Ability to examine data from a variety of angles to determine hidden value, weaknesses, trends, and/or opportunities
Advanced knowledge of ESRI ArcGIS and ArcServer

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.


Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality, and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5","Fort Belvoir, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
37,"Associate Scientist, Clinical Development",-1,"GENEWIZ is a leading global genomics service company and trusted provider for DNA sequencing, gene synthesis, molecular biology, next generation sequencing, bioinformatics, and GLP regulatory services. Our customers depend on GENEWIZ to achieve results in a rapid, cost-effective manner through specialized expertise and customizable, scalable services.

We are seeking an Associate Scientist I to join our Clinical Development Services department. This position will primarily be responsible for nucleic acid extraction, qPCR setup, and next-generation sequencing library preparation and is a great entry-level role with room for growth and advancement. If you have the desire to work in a casual yet results-driven environment that embraces innovation- then you’re just what we’re looking for!

Title: Associate Scientist I

Responsibilities:

Independently carry out nucleic acid extractions from a variety of sample types
Perform quantitative PCR (qPCR) set-up and data analysis
Prepare libraries for high-throughput sequencing
Carry out DNA sequencing on next-generation DNA analyzers
Perform routine maintenance of DNA analyzers and related equipment
Check inventory and replenish consumable sequencing supplies
Communicate with customers by phone and e-mail in a friendly and professional manner
Follow SOPs and guidance of supervisors
Be an effective team-player committed to company goals

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree in Biological Sciences required
1+ years biological lab experience is required
Experience working in a regulatory environment (e.g. CLIA/CAP, GLP, GMP, GCLP, and/or GCP) is highly desirable
Knowledge of standard laboratory processes
Follow and help to develop Standard Operating Protocol (SOP)
Strong communications/interpersonal skills, both verbal and written, and attention to detail are essential.

GENEWIZ is a leading global genomics service company and trusted provider for DNA sequencing, gene synthesis, molecular biology, next generation sequencing, bioinformatics, and GLP regulatory services. Our customers depend on GENEWIZ to achieve results in a rapid, cost-effective manner through specialized expertise and customizable, scalable services that contribute to the advancement of life sciences and technologies.

GENEWIZ employees have a winning attitude and champion innovation, teamwork and accountability through a results-oriented, customer-centric, and fun culture. We offer various health and financial benefits, learning opportunities, competitive compensation, rewarding bonus programs, and a wide range of work/life benefits designed to make your life easier.

EOE M/F/Disabled/VET",2.8,"GENEWIZ, Inc.
2.8","South Plainfield, NJ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1999,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
38,Data Engineer,$65k-$124k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Engineer

Alignment Healthcare was founded with a mission to revolutionize health care with a serving heart culture. Through its unique integrated care delivery models, deep physician partnerships and use of proprietary technologies, Alignment is committed to transforming health care one person at a time.

By becoming a part of the Alignment Healthcare team, you will provide members with the quality of care they truly need and deserve. We believe that great work comes from people who are inspired to be their best. We have built a team of talented and experienced people who are passionate about transforming the lives of the seniors we serve. In this fast-growing company, you will find ample room for growth and innovation alongside the Alignment community.

Position Summary:
Alignment Healthcare is a data and technology driven healthcare company focused partnering with health systems, health plans and provider groups to provide care delivery that is preventive, convenient, coordinated, and that results in improved clinical outcomes for seniors.

We are experiencing rapid growth (backed by top private equity firms), our Data Services and BI team is looking for the best and brightest leaders. Data drives the way we make decisions. We love our customers and understanding them better makes it possible to provide the best clinical outcome and care experience.

This position will play a key role in building and operating a cloud-based data platform and its pipelines using big data technologies.

As a Data Engineer, you will develop a new data engineering platform that leverage a new cloud architecture, and will extend or migrate our existing data pipelines to this architecture as needed. You will also be assisting with integrating the SQL data warehouse platform as our primary processing platform to create the curated enterprise data model for the company to leverage. You will be part of a team building the next generation data platform and to drive the adoption of new technologies and new practices in existing implementations. You will be responsible for designing and implementing the complex ETL pipelines in cloud data platform and other solutions to support the rapidly growing and dynamic business demand for data, and use it to deliver the data as service which will have an immediate influence on day-to-day decision making.

General Duties/Responsibilities:

(May include but are not limited to)
Interfacing with business customers, gathering requirements and developing new datasets in data platform
Building and migrating the complex ETL/EDI pipelines from on premise system to cloud and Hadoop/Spark to make the system grow elastically
Identifying the data quality issues to address them immediately to provide great user experience
Extracting and combining data from various heterogeneous data sources
Designing, implementing and supporting a platform that can provide ad-hoc access to large datasets
Modelling data and metadata to support machine learning and AI
Minimum Requirements:

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Minimum Experience:
3+ years relevant experience in cloud based data engineering.
Demonstrated ability in data modeling, ETL development, EDI Development and data warehousing.
Data Warehousing Experience with SQL Server, Oracle, Redshift, Teradata, etc.
Experience with Big Data Technologies (NoSQL databases, Hadoop, Hive, Hbase, Pig, Spark, Elasticsearch etc.)
Experience in using Python, .net, Java and/or other data engineering languages
Knowledge and experience of SQL Server and SSIS.
Experience with X12(837,834,278) and HL7 transactions
Education/Licensure:
Bachelors or Masters in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, or related field
Other:
Excellent communication, analytical and collaborative problem-solving skills
Requires Spark and Scala
Building and migrating the complex ETL/EDI pipelines from on premise system to cloud and Hadoop/Spark to make the system grow elastically
Preferred
Healthcare domain and data experience
Healthcare EDI experience is a plus
API development experience is a plus
Industry experience as a Data Engineer or related specialty (e.g., Software Engineer, Business Intelligence Engineer, Data Scientist) with a track record of manipulating, processing, and extracting value from large datasets.
Experience building/operating highly available, distributed systems of data extraction, ingestion, and processing of large data sets
Experience building data products incrementally and integrating and managing datasets from multiple sources
Experience leading large-scale data warehousing and analytics projects, including using Azure or AWS technologies – SQL Server, Redshift, S3, EC2, Data-pipeline, Data Lake, Data Factory and other big data technologies
Experience providing technical leadership and mentor other engineers for the best practices on the data engineering space
Linux/UNIX including to process large data sets.
Experience with Azure, AWS or GCP is a plus
Microsoft Azure Certification is a plus
Demonstrable track record dealing well with ambiguity, prioritizing needs, and delivering results in an agile, dynamic startup environment
Problem solving skills and Ability to meet deadlines are a must
Microsoft Azure Certification is a plus
Python and Java are a plus,
Experience with X12(837,834,278) and HL7 transactions preferred
Work Environment
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Essential Physical Functions:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear. The employee regularly is required to stand, walk, sit, use hand to finger, handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; and reach with hands and arms.
The employee frequently lifts and/or moves up to 10 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and the ability to adjust focus.
Alignment Healthcare, LLC is proud to practice Equal Employment Opportunity and Affirmative Action. We are looking for diversity in qualified candidates for employment: Minority/Female/Disable/Protected Veteran.
If you require any reasonable accommodation under the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) in completing the online application, interviewing, completing any pre-employment testing or otherwise participating in the employee selection process, please contact careers@ahcusa.com.
(function() { var ac = document.createElement('script'); ac.type = 'text/javascript'; ac.src = ('https:' == document.location.protocol ? 'https://' : 'http://') + 'click.appcast.io/pixels/grpeople1-1573.js?ent=8&t=' + new Date().getTime(); var s = document.getElementsByTagName('script')[0]; s.parentNode.insertBefore(ac, s); })();",3.5,"Alignment Healthcare
3.5","Orange, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
39,Senior Data Engineer,$76k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Basic Qualifications :

Bachelor’s degree in systems engineering, a related specialized area or field is required (or equivalent experience) plus a minimum of 8 years of relevant experience; or Master's degree plus a minimum of 6 years of relevant experience. Agile experience preferred.

CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:

A TS/SCI security clearance with the ability to obtain a Polygraph is required at time of hire. Candidates must be able to obtain the Polygraph within a reasonable amount of time from date of hire. Applicants selected will be subject to a U.S. Government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Due to the nature of work performed within our facilities, U.S. citizenship is required.

Responsibilities for this Position:

Developing mission-critical systems that help keep people safe is what we do. At General Dynamics Mission Systems, you’ll be part of the team that helps heroes make a true impact. The work we do is important. The challenges we face are career-defining. The opportunity we can offer is one-of-a-kind.

We apply advanced technologies such as Artificial Intelligence, Blockchain, AR/VR, Cloud Native and Quantum Physics to solve our customers’ missions in cyber, RF, undersea, interstellar space and everything in between.

As a Senior Data Engineer, you’ll lead model and simulation activities as you participate in requirements analysis and management, functional analysis, performance analysis, system design, trade studies, systems integration and test (verification). It’s your chance to step up to the challenge and prove you’re ready to lead the world.

REPRESENTATIVE DUTIES AND TASKS:

We are seeking a Senior Data Engineer to support the Insider Threat mission. Data Engineers work with various security system data owners to automate data integration and collection strategies. Work closely with the data science team to ensure data cleanliness and accuracy.

Support data science team by designing, developing and implementing scalable ETL process for disparate datasets into a Hadoop infrastructure
Design, develop, implement and maintain data ingestion process from various disparate datasets using StreamSets (experience with StreamSets not mandatory)
Develop processes to identify data drift and malformed records
Develop technical documentation and standard operating procedures
Mentor new and junior data engineers
Leads technical tasks for small teams or projects

KNOWLEDGE SKILLS AND ABILITIES:

Working knowledge of entity resolution systems
Experience with messages systems like Kafka
Experience with NoSQL and/or graph databases like MongoDB or ArangoDB
Any of the following databases: SQL, MongoDB, Oracle, Postgres
Working experience with ETL processing
Working experience with data workflow products like StreamSets or NiFi
Working experience with Python RESTful API services, JDBC
Experience with Hadoop and Hive/Impala
Experience with Cloudera Data Science Workbench is a plus
Understanding of pySpark Leadership experience
Creative thinker
Ability to multi-task
Excellent use and understanding of data engineering concepts, principles, and theories

#CJ3

#CB

Company Overview:

General Dynamics Mission Systems (GDMS) engineers a diverse portfolio of high technology solutions, products and services that enable customers to successfully execute missions across all domains of operation. With a global team of 13,000+ top professionals, we partner with the best in industry to expand the bounds of innovation in the defense and scientific arenas. Given the nature of our work and who we are, we value trust, honesty, alignment and transparency. We offer highly competitive benefits and pride ourselves in being a great place to work with a shared sense of purpose. You will also enjoy a flexible work environment where contributions are recognized and rewarded. If who we are and what we do resonates with you, we invite you to join our high performance team!

General Dynamics is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer that is committed to hiring a diverse and talented workforce. EOE/Disability/Veteran",3.6,"General Dynamics Mission Systems, Inc
3.6","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1952,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
40,Data Scientist,$97k-$155k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a member of the Data Science team, you will run the development of next-generation platforms for customers micro-segmentation, clusterization, behavior analysis, and prediction as well as building up new improved recommendation systems for the customers.

You will use your expertise to design data science models and frameworks, data processing pipelines, and lead efforts of the ML models productization.

You will use project management skills to manage the deliverables and ensure all stakeholder work is complete on time. You will also manage stakeholder communications and present your project across a wide spectrum of management levels.

Data Scientist is supposed to handle complex problems independently and demonstrate analytical thinking. At this position, you should be able to make judgments and recommendations based on the analysis and interpretation of data.

The position requires excellent communication skills and experience working directly with technical teams as well as with business stakeholders. Being able to present findings in a meaningful and clear way is a must.

Responsibilities:
Design, develop, train, evaluate, tune and support machine learning models for time series analysis, demand forecasting, customer intelligence, recommendation systems, optimization, NLP and image analytics.
Design, implement and support scalable jobs and services for data cleaning, preprocessing, aggregation for model training and model inference data pipelines.
Analyze existing and discover new data sources, perform feature engineering and feature selection
Contribute to the analysis of the business requirements, architecture development and implementation planning
Contribute to the presentation of teams results
Learn & stay current on developments in one or more analytics domains: Optimization, Machine Learning, Deep Learning / AI, Simulation, etc.
Build upon and utilize Amazon Cloud Services and Tools
Requirements:
Good communication and presentation skills
Solid mathematical & computer science background
Relevant software engineering background: VCS(git), CICD, containers (Docker), SQL, agile development practices
Proficiency and practical experience with Python and Python-based ML ecosystem, good coding skills
Proficiency and practical experience with cloud native software architectures, familiarity with AWS ecosystem: Sagemaker, Redshift, Aurora, Redis, EMR, SNS, SQS, DocDB, Cloudwatch, Step Functions, etc...
Strong practical knowledge of classic ML algorithms and experience with modeling tools like scikit-learn, statsmodels, lightgbm, hyperopt
Familiarity with and understanding of time series modeling, response modeling, lift modeling, survival analytics, look-alike modeling, statistical modeling. Ability to quickly ramp up to state-of-the-art in corresponding field.
Nice to Have (Plus):
Familiarity with data engineering and devOps is a plus
Experience with NLP and image analytics is a plus
Experience with recommendation systems (collaborative filtering, content filtering, session-based recommenders is a plus)
Deep learning knowledge and practical experience is a plus (TF, Pytorch, MLPs, RNNs, CNNs, Transformers, etc..)
Experience with retail, online commerce or similar B2C business domain is a plus
Experience in working across different global cultures is a plus

We offer:
Opportunity to work on bleeding-edge projects
Work with a highly motivated and dedicated team
Very competitive salary
Flexible schedule
Medical insurance
Benefits program
Corporate social events
Professional development opportunities
NB:

Placement and Staffing Agencies need not apply. We do not work with C2C at this time. At this moment, we are not able to process H1B transfers. Applicants with CPT and OPT visas are welcome to apply.

About Us:

Grid Dynamics is the engineering services company known for transformative, mission-critical cloud solutions for retail, finance and technology sectors.

We architected some of the busiest e-commerce services on the Internet and have never had an outage during the peak season.

Founded in 2006 and headquartered in San Ramon, California with offices throughout the US and Eastern Europe, we focus on big data analytics, omnichannel services, DevOps, and cloud enablement.",3.9,"Grid Dynamics
3.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
41,"Senior Research Scientist [Sr Manager, Consulting]",-1,"_*Experienced candidates (10+ years) only please.*_
_Summary: _*_The __Senior Research Scientist manages a friendly team of social scientists to design and analyze public health and education research. Help us make a positive impact in the world at our growing statistical research firm in downtown Austin. _
Position Description*
Far Harbor designs and evaluates diverse research initiatives that aim to improve public health and education in the US and the developing world. We seek an experienced applied social science researcher with extensive knowledge of research methods along with excellent project management and consulting skills.

The _*Senior Research Scientist *_coordinates directly with the Principal and manages team members on long-term sponsored research projects. This person mentors scientific staff, consults with clients, produces client deliverables and presentations, oversees project plans and quality checking, contributes to analytic work, edits research products, and participates in authoring of peer-reviewed journal publications.
Experience Required*
PhD (preferred) in sociology, economics, psychology, public health, or related social science (or Masters with strong experience)
*At least* 10+ years of _professional experience_ as an applied researcher (or in a position with significant technical consulting management duties)
Proven track record managing teams and projects
Broad experience in scientific consulting to clients and partners
History of excellent written materials and expertise with the scientific publication process
Experience estimating, developing and managing project plans for research teams
Skills Needed*
Superior project and team management skills
Consulting, communication, and presentation skills
Critical thinking and logical organization of ideas
Strong ability to present to non-technical audiences
Familiarity with various scientific research designs for causal inference
Knowledge of various data analytic and statistical concepts
Understanding of the importance of sampling methods
Expertise in methods of program evaluations and observational studies
Deep knowledge of threats to research designs such as non-random samples, non-equivalent groups, and selection bias
Other desirable skills: survey measurement and survey development
Compensation*
$110k-140k/year (based on experience) with bonuses based on company performance. Vacation, holidays, flex work benefits and company-paid access to the on-site gym.
About the Company*
Far Harbor, LLC (http://farharbor.com) is a statistical consultancy established in 2000 and based in Austin, TX. The firm offers expert research and analysis consulting to a number of federal, state, and international clients. We serve public agencies and philanthropic organizations by assisting in the design and analysis of field research and population studies.
Work Location*
This is a local position in downtown Austin TX; during the pandemic all team members are safely teleworking. Our modern offices include a fitness center with showers for walking/running/biking to work. Flex-hours and Friday telecommuting are available with demonstrated proficiency on client projects. Occasional travel might be required (2-3 trips per year for client meetings). We enjoy a collegial work environment and are motivated to provide excellent scientific work for our clients.
Application requirements*
_Please respond to this posting with the following items: _
a *_well-written cover letter_* referencing this position and your primary qualifications and goals, -and-
a _*detailed CV or resume*_ containing education, experience, and any specialized or technical skills relevant to the position.
Candidates who do not provide the above items or fail to meet the minimum skills/experience requirements will not be contacted. Qualified applicants will receive confirmation of receipt by email, and top candidates will be notified personally.

_EEO Statement: All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. _

_Please no recruiters or contract agencies. Thank you for your interest._

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $110,000.00 - $140,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Relocation assistance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Commission pay
COVID-19 considerations:
We work in public health and strictly follow CDC guidelines. During the pandemic we safely telework and use a reservation system for our downtown suites (one-person-per-office) as needed.

Experience:
Research and Consulting: 10 years (Preferred)
Education:
Doctorate (Preferred)
Location:
Austin, TX 78701 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
farharbor.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,"Far Harbor, LLC","Austin, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
42,AidData Research Scientist OR Senior Research Scientist,-1,"_Application Instructions_*
_For more details and to apply, please visit the position listing at the William & Mary Employment Opportunities portal (https://jobs.wm.edu/postings/39689). There, click Apply for this Job to apply with your resume/curriculum vitae, cover letter, and a peer-reviewed publication that highlights your ability to design and execute policy-relevant, empirical research with rigorous methods. This position closes at 11:59pm on October 15th, 2020._*
_*_
_*_*
_Research Scientist or Senior Research Scientist_*
AidData is currently recruiting for a Research Scientist (U13) OR Senior Research Scientist (U15), depending on the applicant’s qualifications. These positions are based in Williamsburg, VA. As such, applicants will be expected to relocate to the Williamsburg area in 2021.

The Research Scientist will provide intellectual leadership for AidData’s Tracking Under-reported Financial Flows program and work closely with the Director of Policy Analysis to provide technical and management oversight of the grants and contracts that support this program. The Research Scientist will assume the management, fiscal, and research integrity responsibilities of a Co-Principal Investigator on relevant, externally-sponsored research projects. The individual will also contribute to the conceptual development and preparation of grant and contract proposals in line with the mandate of the Tracking Under-reported Financial Flows program and Policy Analysis Unit, represent the program and unit externally in presenting research results to academic and policy audiences, and broker financial and partnership arrangements to advance the program and unit’s research agenda.

The Senior Research Scientist will provide intellectual leadership for AidData’s Tracking Under-reported Financial Flows program and provide technical and management oversight of the grants and contracts that support this program. This is a senior leadership position within AidData. The Senior Research Scientist will assume the management, fiscal, and research integrity responsibilities of a lead Principal Investigator on relevant, externally-sponsored research projects. The individual will lead the conceptual development and preparation of grant and contract proposals in line with the mandate of the Tracking Under-reported Financial Flows program, and represent the program externally to academic and policy audiences. The individual will also be responsible for brokering financial and partnership arrangements to advance the program’s research agenda, while ensuring the long-term health and sustainability of the program area.

Either position may include oversight of staff conducting data collection and analysis related to the nature, scope, distribution, and effects of Chinese, Russian, and Middle Eastern financing. Either role will be responsible for the successful delivery of analysis, datasets and tools related to sponsored research projects, including:
Financial oversight (managing budgets for active grants and contracts, developing proposals for new grants);
External client management (ensuring on-time, high-quality deliverables for external funders);
Personnel oversight (supervision of staff/research assistants);
Project/portfolio management (responsible for direct implementation of projects to produce data and derivative products); and quality assurance.
This position is located at the College of William & Mary in Williamsburg, Virginia. This is a full-time position, and salary is commensurate with experience and qualifications in the U13-15 range (see Salary Structure for University Employees).
Required Qualifications*
Research Scientist: *
A Master’s degree in a relevant discipline such as economics, political science, public policy, public affairs, international relations, international development, or development finance, or comparable education and experience;
Several years of relevant professional experience;
Demonstrated experience leading the design and implementation of externally sponsored research projects;
Experience writing compelling grant proposals and securing external funds for policy research projects;
Track record of submitting high-quality deliverables and progress reports in a timely manner to external research sponsors;
Track record of leading research collaborations;
Established subject matter expert in at least one domain relevant to the Tracking Under-reported Financial Flows program (e.g., China, Russia, Gulf Cooperation Council, development finance, foreign direct investment, blended finance, South-South cooperation, etc.);
Track record of designing and implementing innovative research methods;
Experience leading technical teams and projects and training/mentoring team members;
Experience working with large, complex datasets using one or more of the following: Stata, R, Python, SAS, SPSS;
Strong and effective communication skills;
Ability to work both independently and collaboratively in a demanding and complex work environment; to carry out assignments in a timely manner, and to adapt to changing situations and priorities;
Experience managing small to mid-size project teams and delivery schedules
Senior Research Scientist: *
A terminal degree in a relevant discipline with several years’ experience as a principal investigator or co-principal investigator;
Demonstrated academic rigor to lead the design and implementation of externally sponsored research projects as a Principal Investigator;
Established track record of designing and implementing innovative research methods;
Experience writing compelling grant proposals and securing external funds for policy research projects;
Track record of submitting high-quality deliverables and progress to external research sponsors;
Track record of publishing research in peer-reviewed journals or policy research that meets equivalent standards of scrutiny;
Experience with personnel management and fiscal responsibilities associated with externally-sponsored research projects;
Established track record of leading research collaborations (with and without external collaborators) that result in high-quality and high-profile research outputs;
Established subject matter expert in at least two domains relevant to the program (e.g., China, Russia, Gulf Cooperation Council, development finance, foreign direct investment, blended finance, South-South cooperation, etc.);
Track record of designing and implementing innovative research methods;
Extensive professional network and presence in relevant professional communities, including researchers across multiple domains;
Substantial experience leading large, interdisciplinary teams and technically demanding projects;
Demonstrated experience working with large, complex datasets using one or more of the following: Stata, R, Python, SAS, SPSS;
Strong and effective communication and presentation skills
Preferred Qualifications*
Research Scientist: *
A Master’s degree or Doctorate in a relevant discipline;
Extensive relevant professional experience;
Experience designing and/or managing large-scale data collection and/or research projects in developing country contexts;
Knowledge/experience with qualitative data collection and research methods (FGDs, interviews, Nvivo);
Advanced experience with data science methods (machine learning, web scraping, and text mining);
Demonstrated ability to implement rigorous analysis using experimental methods or quasi-experimental methods, including regression discontinuity, matching, difference-in-differences, instrumental variables estimation, social network analysis, and spatial analysis;
Experience preparing statistical code for reproduction of results by a third party;
Extensive knowledge and experience working with development finance or foreign direct investment data;
Detailed knowledge of aid classification schemes and experience in collecting, standardizing, and publishing data from multiple actors;
Experience delivering datasets and actionable research for policy and academic audiences;
Knowledge of the standards, best practices, and systems related to public service and/or international aid program delivery in developing countries
Senior Research Scientist: *
Doctorate in a relevant discipline such as economics, political science, public policy, public affairs, international relations, international development, or development finance or comparable advanced level experience;
Track record of obtaining research funding from a variety of funders;
Experience designing and/or managing large-scale data collection and/or research in developing country contexts;
Advanced proficiency/experience with data science methods (machine learning, web scraping, and text mining);
Demonstrated ability to implement rigorous analysis using experimental methods or quasi-experimental methods, including regression discontinuity, matching, difference-in-differences, instrumental variables estimation, social network analysis, and spatial analysis;
Demonstrated experience preparing statistical code for reproduction of results by a third party;
Extensive knowledge and experience working with development finance or foreign direct investment data;
Experience delivering datasets and actionable research for policy and academic audiences;
Extensive knowledge of traditional and non-traditional donor classification schemes (with a particular emphasis on Non-DAC donors like China, Russia and the Gulf Cooperation Council countries)
Application Instructions*
For more details and to apply, please visit the position listing at the William & Mary Employment Opportunities portal (https://jobs.wm.edu/postings/39689). There, click Apply for this Job to apply with your resume/curriculum vitae, cover letter, and a peer-reviewed publication that highlights your ability to design and execute policy-relevant, empirical research with rigorous methods. This position closes at 11:59pm on October 15th, 2020.
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement‍*
The College of William & Mary values diversity and invites applications from underrepresented groups who will enrich the research, teaching and service missions of the university. The College is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and encourages applications from women, minorities, protected veterans, and individuals with disabilities.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $87,000.00 - $105,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Writing grant proposals and securing external funding: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Location:
Williamsburg, VA 23185 (Required)
Language:
Russian (Preferred)
Chinese (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Required travel:
25% (Preferred)
Application Question:
Do you have experience leading the design and implementation of the externally sponsored research projects?
Company's website:
https://jobs.wm.edu/postings/39689
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Global Research Institute,"Williamsburg, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
43,Research Molecular Scientist,$28k-$51k (Glassdoor Est.),"Travel Required: None
Public Trust: NACLC (T3)
Requisition Type: Regular

GDIT 's military health team is HIRING a Research Molecular Scientist to support the 59th Medical Wing (MDW), located Keesler Air Force Base in Biloxi, Mississippi.

The 59th Medical Wing Science and Technology (ST) office advises and conducts clinical and translational research on matters pertaining to the medical aspects of the Air Expeditionary Force and the health of Air Force (AF) personnel and beneficiaries. In order to support the required research, ST offices conduct translational research in the areas of emergency medical care, combat casualty care, force health protection, restorative medicine, clinical and rehabilitative medicine and specialty centers.

Learn more about the 59th MDW HERE

What You'll Be Doing:

Be experienced and qualified to do research testing in the field of Molecular Laboratory Science to include but not limited to nucleic acid extraction and quantification, electrophoresis, PCR, rtPCR, Microarray, and Sequencing. Familiarity with various Sequencing techniques to include Pyro-Sequencing, Sanger Sequencing and Next Generation Sequencing (NGS). Experience with multiple library preparation techniques for transcriptome, exome and whole genome NGS.
Develop methods related to their particular field of expertise to support research protocols approved by regulatory oversight committees. Methods must be developed to meet researchers need and be in compliance with Good Laboratory Practice Guidelines. Be able to develop test methods and implement testing independently.
Perform manual and automated testing on multiple body fluids from human research subjects and various species of animal subjects as described in approved research protocols.
Perform all required setup and quality control and quality assurance processes required for equipment used in analyzing specimens for research purposes. Meet all accreditation requirements for Good Laboratory Practices in using manual and automated testing equipment.
Analyze the results of tests and experiments to ensure conformity to specifications, using special mechanical and electrical devices.
Review results of tests and quality control materials to ensure that testing processes were in control and all data produced is accurate and precise.
Analyze and record test data to issue reports that use charts, graphs and narratives.
Enter data into various computer systems to meet research protocol requirements. Follow established procedures in validating and verifying data entered in to computer systems.
Use standard laboratory techniques and follow operating instructions in preparing materials for test procedures (i.e., standards, calibrators, solutions, and reagents). Use standard laboratory procedures to prepare specimens for molecular, chemical or toxicological analysis.
Process and ship all samples according to regulations and protocol requirements.
Document all correspondence and communication pertinent to the research.
Assist in the preparation and analysis of laboratory experiments, as requested.
Maintain and update files of all applicable regulatory documentation for IACUC or IRB (including protocols, approvals, amendments, modifications, etc.) as well as any communications with the sponsor or any other Federal or regulatory office (including prior approvals, change in scope, etc.).
Manage study documentation to include accurate and timely filing.
Adheres to Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA), Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments (CLIA), International Air Transport Association (IATA), Good Laboratory Practices (GLP) and infection control procedures.
Assist in writing method validations, operating procedures, presentations, and publications using provided methodologies and formats.
Collect and process specimens from research subjects for testing purposes. All specimens must be collected, processed and handled as described in approved research protocols.
Assists the PI to refine the specific laboratory requirements to meet the aims, research questions, hypotheses, and/or objectives of the studies.
Conducts laboratory procedures and testing in accordance with the approved protocol. Performs appropriate study specific procedures as outlined in the protocol. Orders study materials, equipment, and/or supplies as specified in the research protocol and in accordance with Clinical Research Division (CRD) policies.
Maintains all protocol binder to include all approved protocols and amendments and all data obtained from laboratory procedures.
Abstracts required research data elements from paper or electronic systems or other existing documents, clinical computer databases such as the AHLTA, CHCS or JPTA, and/or other electronic diagnostic reports in accordance with the research protocol and enter these data into spreadsheets, databases, and/or statistic software as required.
Delivers and receives specimens to internal laboratory and/or ship specimens to a referral laboratory as specified by the protocol.
Works with the statistician to clean and prepare data sets for analyses.
Collects, sorts, files, and maintains all paper and electronic documents related to the protocol. Evaluates proposed amendments of the study to identify any changes in laboratory testing requirements as approved by the IRB, Institutional IACUC.
Maintains complete and accurate drug and equipment accountability at all times for the study.
Identifies delays and other shortcomings in meeting objective and develops a contingency plan as required.
Communicates and provides information during any sponsored Contracting Officer Representative (COR) site visit related to the study.
Assists the PIs to write the final report and submit it to the IRB, IACUC, and study sponsor. Manages all aspects of laboratory experiments while in constant communication with the PIs and CRD leadership.
Actively seeks to learn new laboratory techniques to support new protocol requirements. Manages all laboratory testing requirements to support translational and clinical research projects in concert with the PI.
Arranges learning schedules for Graduate Medical Education (GME) personnel working in the clinical and translational research programs.

What You'll Need (required):

Master’s Degree in Molecular Biology or science-related degree with 2+ years’ experience or minimum of Bachelor’s Degree in Molecular Biology with 5 years of recent experience in a molecular biology laboratory.
Shall have at least 5 years of experience in advanced Molecular Laboratory procedures and experience research laboratory procedures including but not limited to research specimens from various species, experience using basic and advance laboratory instrumentation, using various testing techniques to determine biological activity, metabolic changes, or biology products, experience in the collection and processing of various biological samples for frozen long term storage and the procedures to recover samples from long term storage for analysis.
Experience or knowledge in performing translational biomedical research, and working in a laboratory performing various techniques to include but not limited to: flow Cytometry, research involving the use of specimens, PCR/rtPCR testing, expertise in the use and enzyme immunoassay testing assays, use of laboratory equipment including imaging systems, chemistry equipment (i.e., HPLC, GS-MS, etc.), hematology and clinical chemistry analyzers, coagulation testing, experience in cell culture techniques, and extensive experience in collecting processing and archiving specimens for use in translational biomedical research.
Shall have and maintain a current Basic Life Support (BLS) certification.

#MilitaryHealthGDITJobs

#gditpriority

#gditjobs59thMDW

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Keesler AFB, MS",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
44,Senior Data Scientist,$101k-$163k (Glassdoor Est.),"Klaviyo is looking for Senior Data Scientists to join our team which is still in its early days. You'll have a big impact on our direction and how we operate. You'll be central to upfront research and shipping products that help our customers learn and grow from their data.

The ideal candidate has a background in data science, statistics and machine learning and has done work ranging from exploratory analysis to training and deploying models. We use a wide variety of data mining and machine learning algorithms. The right candidate will have both a solid fundamental understanding and deep practical experience with at least a few modeling and machine learning techniques.

You should have experience building models that are used by people to make better decisions. We're focused on shipping early and often. We prefer iterative solutions that are incrementally better to the perfect solution.

How you will make a difference:


Analyze large data sets (we're collecting billions of individual actions every month).
Build models and ship products that enable businesses to grow faster and communicate with their customers.
Democratize and open up that technology to everyone (Our background as a team is building these models for the Fortune 50).
Match the right assumptions and models to the right problem.
Measure and know what impact your models had on the decisions people made -- e.g. did they outperform the previous best model or a human decision maker?

Who You Are:


Bachelor's or advanced degree in statistics, applied mathematics, computer science or other relevant quantitative discipline, or equivalent industry experience.
Have worked in a data science role for 5+ years professionally or academically and can talk about your projects and the techniques you used.
Have a strong fundamental understanding and deep experience with at least a few machine learning algorithms (e.g. regressions, decision trees, k-means clustering, neural networks).
Understand Bayesian modeling techniques.
Are capable of analyzing data and making rigorous statements about what can or cannot be concluded.
Have experience designing and implementing model performance/validation assessments.
Have a background in statistics and understand different distributions and the conditions under which they're valid.
Know how code and have used data science tools and packages.
Have demonstrated a measurable impact based on the models you've created. It's not always easy getting a model correct and we love talking about places we got stuck and working as a team to think through ideas that could unblock us.
Have a desire to ship features powered by data science (in other words, you're excited by both upfront research and actually getting models into production at cloud scale).

Get to know Klaviyo

Klaviyo is the world's leading owned marketing platform known for accelerating revenue for online businesses using the channels they own like email, web, and mobile. Enabling companies to leverage these owned marketing channels, Klaviyo makes it easy to store, access, analyze and use transactional and behavioral data to power highly-targeted customer and prospect communications. And unlike other marketing platforms, Klaviyo doesn't force companies to compromise between advanced functionality or ease of use - so companies of all sizes are able to maximize their sales quickly. That's why over 50,000 innovative companies like Unilever, Custom Ink and Eventbrite sell more with Klaviyo.",4.8,"Klaviyo
4.8","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
45,Sr Data Engineer,$71k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"Group O is seeking a strong candidate in the job of Senior Data Engineer for a Group O partner in San Antonio, TX. In this role, you will be a valuable expert in data coding and ETL and will lead the development of data models, structures, and data wrangling.

Responsibilities
Implementation including loading from disparate data sets, pre-processing using Hive and Pig
Scope and deliver various Big Data solutions
Design solutions based on high-level architecture
Manage technical communications between clients (technical and non-technical) and internal teams
Building a cloud-based platform that allows easy development of new applications
Collaborate with developers, subject matter experts, and business users in gathering and documenting requirements for data extraction and transformation
Perform code reviews, analyze execution plans, improve ETL jobs efficiencies, correct ETL defects and respond quickly to fixes and enhancement requests
Follow design standards for ETL and ELT processes
Analyze, assess and implement changes to existing solutions in response to business changes
Perform data research and analysis to find insights
Analyze data models to identify variances and discrepancies
Design, update, and maintain data sets
Work with geographically distributed team structure in a fast paced and challenging environment; multi-task and work under pressure
Communicate results with internal and external stakeholders

Qualifications:
An ideal candidate will have experience leading data quality assessment, will be a strong problem-solver and will have excellent interpersonal and communications skills.
Over 5 years of demonstrable experience designing technological solutions to complex data problems, developing & testing modular, reusable, efficient and scalable code to implement those solutions.
Strong understanding and experience in distributed computing frameworks, particularly Apache Hadoop 2.0 (YARN; MR & HDFS) and associated technologies -- one or more of Hive, Sqoop, Avro, Flume, Oozie, Zookeeper, etc.
Strong background with ETL Design and coding for Data loading, Data cleansing, Data Validation
Proficiency in SQL, SAS, R and Python – with preference to SQL
Previous experience designing custom deliverables based on user requirements
Excellent written and verbal communication skills – must be able to communicate fluently in English both verbally and in writing
Strong analytical and statistical analysis skills to extract insights and recommendations
Strong problem-solving skills, and the ability & confidence to hack their way out of tight corners
Insurance domain experience is preferred",3.1,"Group O
3.1","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
46,Data Scientist,$60k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"We have an opportunity for a Data Scientist to join our talented Data Analytics team. The successful candidate will work with customers and the engagement team to support the project management, project data analysis, process improvement, data conversion, and integration needs of our federal customer.

Typical responsibilities include
Collecting large sets of structured and unstructured data from disparate sources.
Cleaning and validating data to ensure accuracy, completeness, and uniformity.
Analyzing data to identify patterns and trends.
Developing solutions and integrating, extending, and contributing to Open Source software
Devising and applying models and algorithms to mine the stores of big data.
Interpreting data to discover solutions and opportunities.
Requirements
Active Secret Clearance
Strong client engagement skills
Experience with languages such as Python, R, SAS, and SQL
Experience with version control systems, including Github or Gitlab
Experience with designing, developing, and deploying analytic software and algorithms
BS degree in Physics, Computer Science, Mathematics, or another quantitative discipline
Desired skills
Experience with open source Big Data tools including Apache Spark or Apache NiFi
Experience with entity resolution
Experience with Natural Language Processing using modern deep learning techniques
Benefits

Perks of working at NetImpact Strategies:
Your health comes first – we offer comprehensive medical, dental, & vision insurance that starts the first of the month after you join the team
Invest in your future – 401(k) Plan – Immediately vested employer contributions; no matching required
Work hard, play hard – we offer a generous Paid Time Off (PTO) policy and observe ALL ten (10) federal holidays
Pawsitively pawesome – Pet Insurance (because our little critters are part of our families, too!)
Invest in your education – Tuition reimbursement, internal training programs, & company-sponsored industry certifications
Be part of a dynamic and collaborative work environment recently ranked by The Washington Post as a Top Work Place in 2019!
Have fun and celebrate and give back – Team building activities, community volunteering, quarterly HQ days, & an offsite annual awards banquet
ABOUT US

NetImpact Strategies specializes in Strategy and Business Transformation, IT Modernization, Data-Driven Intelligence, Cloud Services, and Cybersecurity. We are a team of skilled Consultants who listen to our clients’ needs. We design and implement comprehensive, tailored solutions that are both mindful of the client's culture and organizational dynamics. As mission needs change, new priorities emerge, technologies advance, and methodologies evolve; NetImpact stands out as a trusted advisor that can solve the challenges of today while looking for the opportunities of tomorrow. Our professionals stay abreast of these changes to provide agile, outcome-focused results for federal agency strategic and tactical needs. Approaching engagements as a partner, we provide solutions that empower our clients to achieve results that align with their mission and strategic vision.

ACCESSIBILITY NOTE

NetImpact Strategies is committed to complying with all applicable provisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act, as amended (“ADA”), and applicable state and local laws. It is NetImpact’s policy not to discriminate against any qualified person or applicant with regard to any terms or conditions of employment on the basis of such individual’s disability. Consistent with this policy of non-discrimination, NetImpact will provide reasonable accommodations to an individual with a disability, as defined in the ADA or applicable law, who has made NetImpact aware of his/her disability, unless doing so would cause undue hardship to NetImpact. If you are an applicant and need a reasonable accommodation when applying for job opportunities within NetImpact, or request a reasonable accommodation to utilize NetImpact’s online employment application, please contact careers@netimpactstrategies.com.

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

NetImpact is committed to the development of a creative, diverse, and inclusive work environment. In order to provide equal employment and advancement opportunities to all individuals, employment decisions at NetImpact will be based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. NetImpact does not discriminate against any person because of race, color, creed, religion, sex (including gender identity, sexual orientation, and pregnancy), marital status, national origin, disability, age, veteran status, genetic information or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, and local laws (referred to as ""protected status"").",4.2,"NetImpact Strategies
4.2","Vienna, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
47,Senior Marketing Data Scientist,$100k-$164k (Glassdoor Est.),"National Funding is continuing to grow its Analytics Department and has an exciting opportunity as a Senior Data Scientist. This high-profile role is at the center of activity for the company and is a major driver and contributor to National Funding's core strategy and growth. We are looking for a data-driven individual with excellent analytical skills and experience to work alongside business stakeholders primarily on our Direct Marketing team to deliver insights and make recommendations.

Senior Data Scientist Major Responsibilities

Provides analytic support and strategic thought partnership to Direct Marketing team
The ideal candidate will have the ability to tell stories with the data, communicate effectively and instill confidence in recommendations to motivate stakeholders to take action
Builds recommendations by synthesizing data from multiple sources, developing assumptions where needed, to drive business insights and strategy development
Delivers key insights with interpretation and recommendation, contributes to the development of hypotheses and actions, and presents them to management team
Partners with Marketing leaders to identify key customer segments and contributes to the execution of various campaigns and initiatives
Develop statistical models to aide in selection of prospects for direct mail campaigns
Develops new and better analytics approaches to solve questions in a creative way

The Ideal Candidate

3-5 years of experience in data analysis, preferably in Direct Marketing
Hands-on expertise with data mining and statistical modeling techniques such as clustering, classification, regression, tree-based methods, neural nets, support vector machines, anomaly detection, and natural language processing
Proven leadership within a data-driven organization with the ability to influence decisions
Strong knowledge of SQL and/or SAS
Experience with SAS, R, Python and other data modeling tools
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Experience with Tableau (preferred) or similar BI tools
Experience with A/B testing setup and evaluation preferred
Outstanding communication skills with both technical and non-technical colleagues

Prefer candidates with experience in Finance, Mortgage, Banking",3.4,"National Funding
3.4","San Diego, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
48,Data Scientist III,$78k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Group Highlights

Intelligence

The Intelligence group provides high-end systems engineering and integration products and services, data analytics and software development to national and military intelligence customers. Serving federal agencies and the Intelligence Community for more than 50 years, the Intelligence group helps our clients meet their mission needs by providing trusted advisors, leading-edge technologies, and innovative solutions.

Responsibilities

Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data, including latent semantic indexing (LSI), entity identification and tagging, complex event processing (CEP), and the application of analysis algorithms on distributed, clustered, and cloud-based high-performance infrastructures. Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases visualized through multi-dimensional interfaces. Handle processing and index requests against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams. Has the ability to make discoveries in the world of big data. Requires strong technical and computational skills - engineering, physics, mathematics, coupled with the ability to code design, develop, and deploy sophisticated applications using advanced unstructured and semi-structured data analysis techniques and utilizing high-performance computing environments. Has the ability to utilize advance tools and computational skills to interpret, connect, predict and make discoveries in complex data and deliver recommendations for business and analytic decisions. Experience with Cloud-based data analysis tools. Experience with machine learning, algorithm analysis, and data clustering.

Qualifications

Requires 3 to 8 years with BS/BA or 3 to 5 years with MS/MA or 0 to 2 years with PhD.

TS/SCI with Poly Required
Focus on design, implementation and operation of data management systems. Design how data is stored, consumed, integrated and managed by different entities and systems.
Experience with SQL, Python, Spark
Machine Learning technologies/packages (Sagemaker, DataBricks, PyTorch and the similar)
Statistical techniques for analyzing data and visualization techniques for summarizing complex data analyses.

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
49,Research Scientist,-1,"Description: *
Coastar Therapeutics is seeking a highly-motivated scientist with assay development expertise to join the analytical development team. The successful candidate will be responsible for developing analytical methods in support of the biological membrane coated virus development. Operating in a cross-functional and dynamic environment, the individual will work closely with Product Development and Process Development teams. The ideal candidate should have a proven track record of developing, implementing, and transferring QC-suitable analytical testing methods that are compliant with regulatory requirements.

This is a full-time position reporting to the CSO and is located at our corporate headquarter in San Diego.
Primary Responsibilities: *
• Perform all functions to support bioassay development and assay qualification with exemplary documentation practices

• Perform established in-process control and release assays to support pilot process development

• Detailed record keeping, data interpretation, and presentation to functional and project teams

• Ordering and maintaining stocks of lab reagents and samples
Requirements: *
• Ph.D. or M.S. degree with 3~5 years relevant experience in a related field

• Prior experience with designing and developing cellular/enzyme-based assays is preferred

• Prior experience with bi-specific antibody and virus is strongly preferred

• Prior experience with bioassay / bioanalytical development is strongly preferred

• Prior experience with cell culture, qPCR, flow cytometry, protein purification is a plus

• Excellent communication, time management, record keeping, presentation, and data analysis skills

• The ability to successfully pursue an individual research project and take direction in a group environment
Working Conditions and Physical Requirements: *
• Will require working with blood, tissues, and cell lines of human and animal origin

• On-site work at corporate headquarters in San Diego, CA

• Occasional travelling will be required (< 10%)

The preceding job description indicates the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. Additional and incidental duties related to the primary duties may be required from time to time.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $80,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
COVID-19 considerations:
To keep everyone work safely, we have the work environment redesigned to be compliant with the requirement, including isolated desks and lab benches, mask requirement, etc.

This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
Coastar Therapeutics Inc.
Company's Facebook page:
Coastar Therapeutics Inc.
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Coastar Therapeutics Inc.,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
50,Research Scientist,-1,"Description: *
Coastar Therapeutics is seeking a highly-motivated scientist with assay development expertise to join the analytical development team. The successful candidate will be responsible for developing analytical methods in support of the biological membrane coated virus development. Operating in a cross-functional and dynamic environment, the individual will work closely with Product Development and Process Development teams. The ideal candidate should have a proven track record of developing, implementing, and transferring QC-suitable analytical testing methods that are compliant with regulatory requirements.

This is a full-time position reporting to the CSO and is located at our corporate headquarter in San Diego.
Primary Responsibilities: *
• Perform all functions to support bioassay development and assay qualification with exemplary documentation practices

• Perform established in-process control and release assays to support pilot process development

• Detailed record keeping, data interpretation, and presentation to functional and project teams

• Ordering and maintaining stocks of lab reagents and samples
Requirements: *
• Ph.D. or M.S. degree with 3~5 years relevant experience in a related field

• Prior experience with designing and developing cellular/enzyme-based assays is preferred

• Prior experience with bi-specific antibody and virus is strongly preferred

• Prior experience with bioassay / bioanalytical development is strongly preferred

• Prior experience with cell culture, qPCR, flow cytometry, protein purification is a plus

• Excellent communication, time management, record keeping, presentation, and data analysis skills

• The ability to successfully pursue an individual research project and take direction in a group environment
Working Conditions and Physical Requirements: *
• Will require working with blood, tissues, and cell lines of human and animal origin

• On-site work at corporate headquarters in San Diego, CA

• Occasional travelling will be required (< 10%)

The preceding job description indicates the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. Additional and incidental duties related to the primary duties may be required from time to time.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $80,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
COVID-19 considerations:
To keep everyone work safely, we have the work environment redesigned to be compliant with the requirement, including isolated desks and lab benches, mask requirement, etc.

This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
Coastar Therapeutics Inc.
Company's Facebook page:
Coastar Therapeutics Inc.
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Coastar Therapeutics Inc.,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
51,Research Scientist,-1,"Description: *
Coastar Therapeutics is seeking a highly-motivated scientist with assay development expertise to join the analytical development team. The successful candidate will be responsible for developing analytical methods in support of the biological membrane coated virus development. Operating in a cross-functional and dynamic environment, the individual will work closely with Product Development and Process Development teams. The ideal candidate should have a proven track record of developing, implementing, and transferring QC-suitable analytical testing methods that are compliant with regulatory requirements.

This is a full-time position reporting to the CSO and is located at our corporate headquarter in San Diego.
Primary Responsibilities: *
• Perform all functions to support bioassay development and assay qualification with exemplary documentation practices

• Perform established in-process control and release assays to support pilot process development

• Detailed record keeping, data interpretation, and presentation to functional and project teams

• Ordering and maintaining stocks of lab reagents and samples
Requirements: *
• Ph.D. or M.S. degree with 3~5 years relevant experience in a related field

• Prior experience with designing and developing cellular/enzyme-based assays is preferred

• Prior experience with bi-specific antibody and virus is strongly preferred

• Prior experience with bioassay / bioanalytical development is strongly preferred

• Prior experience with cell culture, qPCR, flow cytometry, protein purification is a plus

• Excellent communication, time management, record keeping, presentation, and data analysis skills

• The ability to successfully pursue an individual research project and take direction in a group environment
Working Conditions and Physical Requirements: *
• Will require working with blood, tissues, and cell lines of human and animal origin

• On-site work at corporate headquarters in San Diego, CA

• Occasional travelling will be required (< 10%)

The preceding job description indicates the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. Additional and incidental duties related to the primary duties may be required from time to time.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $80,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
COVID-19 considerations:
To keep everyone work safely, we have the work environment redesigned to be compliant with the requirement, including isolated desks and lab benches, mask requirement, etc.

This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
Coastar Therapeutics Inc.
Company's Facebook page:
Coastar Therapeutics Inc.
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Coastar Therapeutics Inc.,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
52,"Data Scientist, Product Analytics",$92k-$149k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Product Data Scientist, you will lead the charge on building our product analytical infrastructure and driving insights that lead to step-function improvements in how we operate. We handle millions of tasks for businesses looking to scale their ML development, and we’re looking for a talented product data scientist to help us understand it all in the service of building better products. In this role, you will apply statistical models, design and interpret experiments, build mission-critical dashboards, and help structure and order our data in the pursuit of transparency over how we operate and how we can improve.
You will:
Own end-to-end product analytics workflow including formulating success metrics, socializing them across the organization, and creating dashboards/reports.
Ensure product areas are performing in line with our high expectations and be able to identify, diagnose, and recommend projects to improve our performance.
Influence product teams through presentation of data-based recommendations.
Identify operational efficiencies to the business that will enable Scale to continue growing sustainably.
Design, run, and analyze experiments.
Apply statistical models to identify root causes and predict the future performance of tasks, users, and products.
Conduct statistical and trend analysis to identify opportunities, highlight strengths, and provide recommended corrective actions.
Ideally you'd have:
3+ years of industry experience in product data science broadly
Strong proficiency in writing complex SQL queries
Mastery with data science tools such as R, and/or Python
Experience with statistical modeling and experimental design
A detail-oriented and analytical mindset, with emphasis on accuracy
About Us:
At Scale, our mission is to accelerate the development of Machine Learning and AI applications across multiple markets. Our first product is a suite of APIs that allow AI teams to generate high-quality ground truth data. Our customers include OpenAI, Zoox, Lyft, Pinterest, Airbnb, nuTonomy, and many more.

Scale AI is an equal opportunity employer. We aim for every person at Scale to feel like they matter, belong, and can be their authentic selves so they can do their best work. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.

Scale AI is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodations to applicants with physical and mental disabilities. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation in the application or recruiting process due to a disability, please contact us at accommodations@scale.com. Please see the United States Department of Labor's EEO poster and EEO poster supplement for additional information.",3.4,"Scale AI
3.4","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
53,Data Engineer,$49k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"With our strong investment in research and development and our culture of continuous improvement, Hexcel is the industry leader in the manufacturing of composite materials and industrial fabrics. We invite you to join the Hexcel team at various manufacturing sites, sales offices and R&T centers around the globe. Become a part of the “strength within.”

Hexcel is currently seeking a Data Engineer for our Salt Lake City, UT, USA location.

The selected individual will be responsible for but not limited to the following obligations:

Working with product owners to identify data needs
Working with data owners to identify existing data sources and securing access
Engineering data pipelines to pull data from both on premises and cloud data sources
Create & maintain optimized data pipeline architecture
Extracting data and consolidating with data lakes, data warehouse and data marts
Engineering models to connect different data sources together
Constructing a library of data components that can easily be reused to answer different business questions
Maintaining and updating existing data models
Assist in the development of the Hexcel data infrastructure
Troubleshooting and fixing production issues
You will be a proactive self-improver, continually striving to increase your skill set

Qualifications:

Five plus years of relevant ETL, data engineering or similar experience
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent
Experience with cloud data platforms required
Experience with Azure SQL Server, Azure Synapse, Azure Analysis Services and Azure Data Factory highly desirable, but not essential
Ability to work with remote teams
Strong desire to learn new technologies and methodologies
Strong understanding of Power BI platform and Power BI paginated
Ability to design complex data sets to meet the needs of business requirements
Ability to work with users and/or product owners to assist with data related technical issues
Understanding of modern data platform technologies and methodologies desirable
Ability to troubleshoot and optimize data pipelines
Strong knowledge of SQL required; Understanding of DAX and/or MDX a plus
Experience with Databricks desirable, but not essential
Experience with agile/lean methodologies would be a bonus
Don’t need to be an expert in all technologies, but several would be desired with a curiosity for others – Python, R, Scala, .NET, C#

Eligible candidate must be: U.S. citizen, U.S. national, a person lawfully admitted for permanent residence, a temporary resident under sections 210(a) or 245(A) of the Act, a person admitted in refugee status, a person granted asylum. Hexcel (NYSE: HXL) is a global leader in advanced composites technology, a leading producer of carbon fiber, and the world leader in honeycomb manufacturing for the commercial aerospace industry.

Hexcel is an Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, physical or mental disability, status as protected veteran, or any other protected class.",3.6,"Hexcel Corporation
3.6","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1948,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
54,"Product Sciences, Product Scientist (Lead)",$58k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us as a Senior Manager (Lead), Product Scientist in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

POSITION OBJECTIVES:

Provides technical expertise within the GMSci Drug Product organizations responsible for product knowledge for Takeda's small molecules, biologics and plasma derived therapy portfolio
Serves as the subject matter expert (SME) across multiple products
Provides leadership for regulatory interactions including CMC content for dossiers
Ensures product knowledge is shared and leveraged across sites and functions

POSITION ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Provides strong understanding of product quality, impurities, stability, and characterization as well as structure-function relationships
Responsible for providing rationale for the justification of specifications considering history of the method and the manufacturing process
Reviews and approves non GMP reference standard and reference material qualification protocols and reports
Accountable for non GMP analytical methods
Accountable for one or more products in the portfolio
Accountable for continuity of these aspects across time and sites
Responsible for CMC sections in dossiers related to these aspects
Provides strong leadership and alignment for initiatives and investigations related to these aspects which are complex
Works with Small Molecules Drug Product Process Sciences to conduct Design of Experiment (DoE) studies and implement Quality by Design (QbD) to improve robustness of analytical methods. Analyze statistical data and its impact on manufacturing process

EDUCATION, BEHAVIORAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

Education / Experience

Degree in engineering or life sciences
BS with a minimum of 10 years experience, MS with a minimum of 8 years experience with deep expertise in analytical methods for biologics characterization and commercial release
Experience operating globally in a matrixed organization highly preferred

Highly desired skill

Experience working with pharmaceutical stability studies, analytics and quality control.

Skills

Must be self-motivated, have good interpersonal skills, capable of analyzing and solving complex problems through innovative thought and experience.
Communicates effectively and frequently with supervisor, line function and peers.
Successfully and succinctly conveys complex information in both written and oral forms.

Behaviors

Focusing on the few priorities and provide superior results
Elevating capabilities for now and the future
Being able to work cohesively with different teams
Eagerness to learn and grow

WHAT TAKEDA CAN OFFER YOU:

401(k) with company match and Annual Retirement Contribution Plan
Tuition reimbursement Company match of charitable contributions
Health & Wellness programs including onsite flu shots and health screenings
Generous time off for vacation and the option to purchase additional vacation days
Community Outreach Programs

Empowering Our People to Shine

Discover more at takedajobs.com

No Phone Calls or Recruiters Please.

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
55,Data Platform Architect (EDB) - DAB,$128k-$206k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

For the Takeda global scientific community who aspire to deliver transformative medicines to patients Scientific Informatics is the technology leader, with domain specific expertise, that provides innovative platforms and technologies to improve both operational efficiency and data-driven decision making. As an embedded partner Scientific Informatics is at the leading edge of both science and technology and proactively reacts to the changing scientific environment and needs of researchers in an agile fashion to deliver timely, value-adding solutions.

The Digital Advisory Board programs aim to ensure our growing data is easily accessible to everyone so we can help our patients and HCPs faster and more effectively.

Enterprise Data Backbone

Enterprise Data Backbone - The Enterprise Data Backbone provides the most user-friendly real-time data for all our internal and external stakeholders, accessible through self-service tools.

We will transform the way we gather and use insights by integrating completely new types of data to better support our patient and others in the healthcare system. We will build capabilities to gather real world data outside of clinical trials in ways we have not been able to do so far.

We will make data more easily accessible across Takeda and find a way to share it so that we don’t keep re-inventing the wheel. We will push ourselves to think beyond our normal constructs of clinical trials or today's supply chains.

We will explore a future where we get data from all corners of the world – digital communities, wearable devices, social media, surveys, for a, consumer data combined with hospital, pharmacy and EMR data.

DATA PLATFORM ARCHITECT

OBJECTIVES/PURPOSE:

The Data Platform Architect is an IT partner for the build and delivering of data platforms.

ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Strategic Business Impact – The role is a key enabler for Takeda strategy to become a Data Driven Enterprise. By connecting with TET-1 and their data teams the data platform lead will strategically align data, processes and technology to achieve faster time to market for life saving products
Operational responsibility – the Data platform & Ops delivery lead takes the responsibility of the quality and timeliness of customer project deliveries and internal research and development. Ultimately, help Takeda to make better decisions that improve the quality and efficiency of care for patients.
Delivery Scalability –Oversee and influence the other product leads, demand leads and solution architects to build and deliver data platforms and projects aligned with the new DAB program/initiative.
Develop data driven solutions utilizing current and next generation technologies to meet evolving business needs.
Ability to quickly identify an opportunity and recommend possible technical solutions.
Develop application systems that comply with the standard system development methodology and concepts for design, programming, backup, and recovery to deliver solutions that have superior performance and integrity.
Contribute to determining programming approach, tools, and techniques that best meet the business requirements.
Understand and follow the PDP process to develop, deploy and deliver the solutions.
Be pro-active and diligent in identifying and communicating design and development issues.
Utilize multiple development languages/tools such as Python, SPARK, Hive to build prototypes and evaluate results for effectiveness and feasibility.
Operationalize open source data-analytic tools for enterprise use.
Develop real-time data ingestion and stream-analytic solutions leveraging technologies such as Kafka, Apache Spark, Python and AWS based solutions.
Custom Data pipeline development (Cloud and locally hosted)
Work heavily within the Cloud ecosystem and migrate data
Provide support for deployed data applications and analytical models by being a trusted advisor to Data Scientists and other data consumers by identifying data problems and guiding issue resolution with partner Data Engineers and source data providers.
Provide subject matter expertise in the analysis, preparation of specifications and plans for the development of data processes.
Ensure proper data governance policies are followed by implementing or validating Data Lineage, Quality checks, classification, etc.

EDUCATION, BEHAVIORAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

Bachelor’s degree in engineering or equivalent
8+ years of experience in IT field, with a focus in BI (Business Intelligence and Data Analytics)
Experience as a Sr. Developer in the Healthcare/Life Sciences field a must
Extensive experience with the AWS cloud platform along with technologies including Python, PySpark, KAFKA, SCALA and Databricks
Clinical Trial experience working with patients using IoT devices a must
Significant experience in an analytical role in the healthcare industry
Successfully leading and delivering Big Data programs for a Fortune 500 organization
Experience in a leadership position, including project management and team management
Strong time management and organizational skills
Strong communication and presentation skills
Experience working in a collaborative environment, including supporting and teaching other team members
Very strong customer-facing experience

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
56,Data Engineer,$74k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Group O is seeking a strong candidate with advanced analytics experience to fill an exciting Data Engineer role for an AI partner to Fortune 500 companies. In this role, you will be a valuable in managing large amounts of data and implement loading disparate data sets while managing the technical communication between the team and client.

Implementation including loading from disparate data sets, preprocessing using Hive and Pig.
Manage the technical communication between the team and client
Work with big data team to deliver cutting edge solutions

2-5 years of demonstrable experience designing technological solutions to complex data problems, developing & testing modular, reusable, efficient and scalable code to implement those solutions.
Ideally, this would include work on the following technologies:
Proficiency in at least one of the following: R, C++ or Python (preferred). Scala knowledge a strong advantage.
Strong understanding and experience in distributed computing frameworks, particularly Apache Hadoop 2.0 (YARN; MR & HDFS) and associated technologies -- one or more of Hive, Sqoop, Avro, Flume, Oozie, Zookeeper, etc..
Hands-on experience with Apache Spark and its components (Streaming, SQL, MLLib) is a strong advantage.
Operating knowledge of cloud computing platforms (AWS, especially EMR, EC2, S3, SWF services and the AWS CLI)
Experience working within a Linux computing environment, and use of command line tools including knowledge of shell/Python scripting for automating common tasks
In addition, the ideal candidate would have great problem-solving skills, and the ability & confidence to hack their way out of tight corners.
Education:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related technical degree",3.1,"Group O
3.1","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1974,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
57,"Staff Scientist, Liver Biology, ADME",$58k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: Staff Scientist, Liver Biology, ADME
Req# : 117512BR

When you’re part of the team at Thermo Fisher Scientific, you’ll do important work, like helping customers in finding cures for cancer, protecting the environment or making sure our food is safe. Your work will have real-world impact, and you’ll be supported in achieving your career goals.

Location/Division Specific Information

Frederick, MD | Cell Biology

How will you make an impact?

Looking for a highly skilled and motivated individual to join a team of scientists engaged in the development & commercialization of both new physiologically relevant cell culture systems for studying liver biology and disease, as well as providing high level technical support for our current hepatic ADME-Tox customer base.

What will you do?

The position requires hands on expertise with primary hepatocyte culture and demonstrable knowledge of their use and applications in ADME type applications (DILI, transporter and metabolism, etc.).
The ideal candidate would have experience in a broad range of biochemical, molecular & cellular and metabolic bioactivation pathways used to model key liver functions in vitro.
The R&D Scientist will guide the work of junior staff and working in a team environment with design, execution and analysis of experimental results focused on product development while adhering to project timelines and goals.
Ability to troubleshoot experiments, synthesize results and present data to project teams and management is required.
Other duties include solving complex problems associated with key experimental and project goals, as well as working with our Field Applications Scientists (FAS) to enhance the customer experience with our hepatic product lines and services.
The successful candidate will: contribute ideas and suggestions to improve protocols, processes and approaches, read literature directly associated with assigned project(s) and maintain familiarity with state of the art approaches and competitive products, and comply with all company safety regulations and procedures.
The ability to efficiently handle multiple tasks and learn quickly is highly beneficial.
Effective communication skills and the ability to work in a team environment are essential.
Due to nature of projects, some weekend work will be required in order to maintain these cultures and experimental or project timelines.

How will you get here?

Education
PhD in related Science.

Experience
3+ year’s relevant post-doctoral experience.
Formal training and experience with hepatic biology is required – human is preferred.
Hands on experience with ADME type hepatic applications is highly desired.
Firsthand experience with hepatocyte isolation is preferred.
Experience with isolation and (co) culture with non-parenchymal cells in disease modeling (2D and or 3D) is highly desired.
Effective communication/interpersonal skills.
Use of standard cell and molecular biology techniques.
Fluorescent and phase contrast microscopy and quantitative image analysis.
Experience with Flow Cytometry and FACS.

Knowledge, Skills, Abilities
Experience with laboratory automation desirable.
Experience in industry and or with product development desirable.
Able to design, execute, and analyze experiments with a minimal level of supervision required.
Highly organized, ability to maintain well documented laboratory protocols and notebooks.
Perform other related duties as required and/or assigned.

At Thermo Fisher Scientific, each one of our 70,000 extraordinary minds have a unique story to tell. Join us and contribute to our singular mission—enabling our customers to make the world healthier, cleaner and safer.

Apply today! http://jobs.thermofisher.com

Thermo Fisher Scientific is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, disability or any other legally protected status.",3.6,"Thermo Fisher - America
3.6","Frederick, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1902,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
58,"Manager, Data Science - Data Analytics (Phoenix, AZ)",$76k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Science Manager

Location: PHL or PHX (preferred)

General Summary:

Provides leadership, people management, and tactical input on the planning and execution of data science initiatives that drive business results. Establishes performance standards, operations planning and budgets while overseeing project and vendor management.

Responsibilities

Primary Responsibilities:

Responsible for strategic design, implementation, integration, testing, validation, documentation, review, maintenance and accessibility of resources which enable effective and reliable data science, data visualization and business intelligence.
Applies knowledge of general business functions and systems to develop strategies, operational plans and standards to support achievement of department, business and corporate goals.
Maintains effective team by recruiting, selecting, orienting, and training employees; maintaining a safe, secure, and legal work environment; and developing employees’ professional growth opportunities.
Achieves staff results by communicating job expectations; planning, monitoring, and appraising job results; coaching, counseling, and disciplining employees; developing, coordinating, and enforcing systems, policies, procedures, and productivity standards.
Manages people, projects, and products supporting department goals to improve company efficiency, compliance, profitability and stakeholder satisfaction.

Core Responsibilities:

Plans and manages detailed project timelines; provides reporting on status to key stakeholders.
Provides line management to direct reports, including training, performance management, professional development and coaching.
Proactively raises data science concerns, risks and issues that may delay/ impact the submission and presents risk mitigation strategy.
Keeps abreast of data science requirements to ensure compliance and client success.
Knowledge of machine learning and predictive modeling. • Knowledge of relational databases, scripting languages, and statistical computing packages. • Knowledge of applied statistics, including regression models.
Basic knowledge of company people management policies and procedures, including hiring, performance management, corrective action and compensation administration. • Basic people management skills including coaching, interviewing, and providing feedback and recognition. • Excellent written and oral communication skills. • Ability to manage team resources to ensure attainment of department objectives
Qualifications

Qualifications:

Master’s degree or international equivalent preferred
6 years’ relevant experience including 2 years in a leadership capacity
Equivalent combination of education, training, and relevant experience may be considered in place of the education and experience stated above. All employees must read, write and speak fluent English and host country language.
This job description is intended to present the general content and requirements for the performance of this job. The description is not to be construed as an exhaustive statement of duties, responsibilities or requirements.
Technical Skillset:

Oracle
Coding - navigating coding is key
Hadoop
SAS Data Sets
WPS
Looking for people that know how to code - Python, etc.

Patient Data, Prescription Data, Claims Data, Medical Payers,

PRA is an EEO/AA employer and is committed to providing opportunities to minorities, women, veterans and individuals with disabilities.

Options
Apply for this job onlineApply
Share
Sorry the Share function is not working properly at this moment. Please refresh the page and try again later.
Share on your newsfeed
Connect With Us!",3.8,"PRA Health Sciences
3.8","Philadelphia, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
59,Senior Data Engineer,$99k-$179k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tuesday, August 11, 2020

This position is expected to lead the data architecture and design of the CSBS enterprise data platform. The ideal candidate is self-motivated and enjoys optimizing data systems and building them from the ground up. The Data Engineer will support our software developers, database architects, data analysts and data scientists. They will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. They must be self-directed and comfortable supporting the data needs of multiple teams, systems and products.

They will work with analytical teams to gather technical requirements for both capabilities and tools, as well as, accessing and prioritizing ingest of data assets. They will work with the infrastructure and enterprise architect teams to develop and build out the enterprise platform. The will advise the CDO on technical solutions and tradeoffs, liaise with the Enterprise Architecture to ensure standards are met, and work closely with the Security and Policy teams to ensure the organization is in compliance with their policies. In addition, they will work closely with the modernization product leads to ensure the data needs for the analytical teams is built into the modernized application.

In addition, they will help establish and implement metadata strategy aligned with EA strategy to ensure clear visibility into mapping of data assets to applications, and understanding of impact of changes to data models

Essential Functions

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty and responsibility satisfactorily. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individual with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Other duties may be assigned to meet business needs.

Translate data analytic technical requirements to cloud architects, contractors, business leaders and IT functional leads in security, infrastructure, and application development

Build strong relationships across IT functions and data analytics teams

Oversee the buildout of the enterprise Data Warehouse/API strategy

Work with the analytics teams to prioritize data assets

Manage contractors and oversee solution delivery

Optimizing data ingest and ETL processes to ensure our products have maximum performance

Work with stakeholders including the Executive, Product, Data and Design teams to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs

Navigate conflicting priorities and provide recommendations to the CDO when necessary

Experience building and optimizing ‘big data’ data pipelines, architectures and data sets

Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management

Work with the Enterprise Architect to establish modeling standards, data quality standards, data integration patterns or transactional and analytical systems.

Additional Responsibilities

Prepare polished technical and non-technical status reports and presentations for senior management

Minimum Qualifications

To perform this job successfully, an individual should possess the knowledge, skills, and abilities listed and meet the amount of education, training and/or work experience required.

Education and Experience

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent coursework in data management/computer science

Advanced degree preferred

12+ years of experience in data management or data architecture

Experience managing vendors/contractors

Experience with feature/product ownership

Experience with Agile Scrum methodology

Experience writing clear and effective proposals, policies, research summaries, etc.

Development experience with MuleSoft and Informatica preferred; MicroStrategy a plus

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities

Knowledge of MuleSoft, Informatica, and MicroStrategy

Familiarity with data transformation, warehousing and data modeling

Working knowledge of MySQL and Oracle databases

Understanding of software development protocols

Fluency with AWS cloud storage

Ability to create well-designed, intuitive user interfaces

Skill in communicating with and translating between technical and non-technical people

Knowledge of the financial services industry a plus

Requirements

Must be eligible to obtain or currently possess a U.S. Government clearance at the Public Trust Moderate (NACI) level or higher

Must be a United States citizen or a Legal Permanent Resident (LPR) with at least three (3) years consecutive residence in the United States as indicated on the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services (USCIS) LPR issued card

Values Instilled Behaviors for Excellence

Member/ Customer Service

Capability to build and value relationships

Ability to prioritize work

Advocate and advance member's goals

Teamwork

Ability to give credit to others

Have a “pitch in” attitude

Learns from successes and setbacks

Respect/Trust

Listens and learns from others

Speaks the truth even when uncomfortable

Ability to honor the expertise of others

Collaboration

Recognizes the contributions of others

Ability to consult and communication effectively

Desires to make others successful

Ownership/Engagement

Ability to preserve through adversity

Willingness to experiment and take risks

Plans ahead and is a forward thinking individual

Leadership Competencies

Achievement Oriented Thinking

Has tough conversations and gives feedback to staff

Empowers others

Remains calm under pressure even when presented with unpredictable situations

Change Management

Communicates consistently and effectively with direct reports about the need for, vision for and impact of change.

Manages team through the change

Overcomes obstacles leading to resistance

Self-Awareness

Has knowledge/clarity about “fit” – the type of environment and people that brings out the best in you and your team

Possesses the ability to discern team’s triggers

Knows the consequences of your behaviors

Working Conditions

General office. Travel 3-4 times per year.

Other details
Pay Type
Salary",3.5,"Conference of State Bank Supervisors
3.5","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
60,"Staff Scientist, Liver Biology, ADME",$58k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: Staff Scientist, Liver Biology, ADME
Req# : 117512BR

When you’re part of the team at Thermo Fisher Scientific, you’ll do important work, like helping customers in finding cures for cancer, protecting the environment or making sure our food is safe. Your work will have real-world impact, and you’ll be supported in achieving your career goals.

Location/Division Specific Information

Frederick, MD | Cell Biology

How will you make an impact?

Looking for a highly skilled and motivated individual to join a team of scientists engaged in the development & commercialization of both new physiologically relevant cell culture systems for studying liver biology and disease, as well as providing high level technical support for our current hepatic ADME-Tox customer base.

What will you do?

The position requires hands on expertise with primary hepatocyte culture and demonstrable knowledge of their use and applications in ADME type applications (DILI, transporter and metabolism, etc.).
The ideal candidate would have experience in a broad range of biochemical, molecular & cellular and metabolic bioactivation pathways used to model key liver functions in vitro.
The R&D Scientist will guide the work of junior staff and working in a team environment with design, execution and analysis of experimental results focused on product development while adhering to project timelines and goals.
Ability to troubleshoot experiments, synthesize results and present data to project teams and management is required.
Other duties include solving complex problems associated with key experimental and project goals, as well as working with our Field Applications Scientists (FAS) to enhance the customer experience with our hepatic product lines and services.
The successful candidate will: contribute ideas and suggestions to improve protocols, processes and approaches, read literature directly associated with assigned project(s) and maintain familiarity with state of the art approaches and competitive products, and comply with all company safety regulations and procedures.
The ability to efficiently handle multiple tasks and learn quickly is highly beneficial.
Effective communication skills and the ability to work in a team environment are essential.
Due to nature of projects, some weekend work will be required in order to maintain these cultures and experimental or project timelines.

How will you get here?

Education
PhD in related Science.

Experience
3+ year’s relevant post-doctoral experience.
Formal training and experience with hepatic biology is required – human is preferred.
Hands on experience with ADME type hepatic applications is highly desired.
Firsthand experience with hepatocyte isolation is preferred.
Experience with isolation and (co) culture with non-parenchymal cells in disease modeling (2D and or 3D) is highly desired.
Effective communication/interpersonal skills.
Use of standard cell and molecular biology techniques.
Fluorescent and phase contrast microscopy and quantitative image analysis.
Experience with Flow Cytometry and FACS.

Knowledge, Skills, Abilities
Experience with laboratory automation desirable.
Experience in industry and or with product development desirable.
Able to design, execute, and analyze experiments with a minimal level of supervision required.
Highly organized, ability to maintain well documented laboratory protocols and notebooks.
Perform other related duties as required and/or assigned.

At Thermo Fisher Scientific, each one of our 70,000 extraordinary minds have a unique story to tell. Join us and contribute to our singular mission—enabling our customers to make the world healthier, cleaner and safer.

Apply today! http://jobs.thermofisher.com

Thermo Fisher Scientific is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, disability or any other legally protected status.",3.6,"Thermo Fisher - America
3.6","Frederick, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1902,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
61,Senior Data Engineer,$99k-$179k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tuesday, August 11, 2020

This position is expected to lead the data architecture and design of the CSBS enterprise data platform. The ideal candidate is self-motivated and enjoys optimizing data systems and building them from the ground up. The Data Engineer will support our software developers, database architects, data analysts and data scientists. They will ensure optimal data delivery architecture is consistent throughout ongoing projects. They must be self-directed and comfortable supporting the data needs of multiple teams, systems and products.

They will work with analytical teams to gather technical requirements for both capabilities and tools, as well as, accessing and prioritizing ingest of data assets. They will work with the infrastructure and enterprise architect teams to develop and build out the enterprise platform. The will advise the CDO on technical solutions and tradeoffs, liaise with the Enterprise Architecture to ensure standards are met, and work closely with the Security and Policy teams to ensure the organization is in compliance with their policies. In addition, they will work closely with the modernization product leads to ensure the data needs for the analytical teams is built into the modernized application.

In addition, they will help establish and implement metadata strategy aligned with EA strategy to ensure clear visibility into mapping of data assets to applications, and understanding of impact of changes to data models

Essential Functions

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty and responsibility satisfactorily. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individual with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Other duties may be assigned to meet business needs.

Translate data analytic technical requirements to cloud architects, contractors, business leaders and IT functional leads in security, infrastructure, and application development

Build strong relationships across IT functions and data analytics teams

Oversee the buildout of the enterprise Data Warehouse/API strategy

Work with the analytics teams to prioritize data assets

Manage contractors and oversee solution delivery

Optimizing data ingest and ETL processes to ensure our products have maximum performance

Work with stakeholders including the Executive, Product, Data and Design teams to assist with data-related technical issues and support their data infrastructure needs

Navigate conflicting priorities and provide recommendations to the CDO when necessary

Experience building and optimizing ‘big data’ data pipelines, architectures and data sets

Build processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management

Work with the Enterprise Architect to establish modeling standards, data quality standards, data integration patterns or transactional and analytical systems.

Additional Responsibilities

Prepare polished technical and non-technical status reports and presentations for senior management

Minimum Qualifications

To perform this job successfully, an individual should possess the knowledge, skills, and abilities listed and meet the amount of education, training and/or work experience required.

Education and Experience

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent coursework in data management/computer science

Advanced degree preferred

12+ years of experience in data management or data architecture

Experience managing vendors/contractors

Experience with feature/product ownership

Experience with Agile Scrum methodology

Experience writing clear and effective proposals, policies, research summaries, etc.

Development experience with MuleSoft and Informatica preferred; MicroStrategy a plus

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities

Knowledge of MuleSoft, Informatica, and MicroStrategy

Familiarity with data transformation, warehousing and data modeling

Working knowledge of MySQL and Oracle databases

Understanding of software development protocols

Fluency with AWS cloud storage

Ability to create well-designed, intuitive user interfaces

Skill in communicating with and translating between technical and non-technical people

Knowledge of the financial services industry a plus

Requirements

Must be eligible to obtain or currently possess a U.S. Government clearance at the Public Trust Moderate (NACI) level or higher

Must be a United States citizen or a Legal Permanent Resident (LPR) with at least three (3) years consecutive residence in the United States as indicated on the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services (USCIS) LPR issued card

Values Instilled Behaviors for Excellence

Member/ Customer Service

Capability to build and value relationships

Ability to prioritize work

Advocate and advance member's goals

Teamwork

Ability to give credit to others

Have a “pitch in” attitude

Learns from successes and setbacks

Respect/Trust

Listens and learns from others

Speaks the truth even when uncomfortable

Ability to honor the expertise of others

Collaboration

Recognizes the contributions of others

Ability to consult and communication effectively

Desires to make others successful

Ownership/Engagement

Ability to preserve through adversity

Willingness to experiment and take risks

Plans ahead and is a forward thinking individual

Leadership Competencies

Achievement Oriented Thinking

Has tough conversations and gives feedback to staff

Empowers others

Remains calm under pressure even when presented with unpredictable situations

Change Management

Communicates consistently and effectively with direct reports about the need for, vision for and impact of change.

Manages team through the change

Overcomes obstacles leading to resistance

Self-Awareness

Has knowledge/clarity about “fit” – the type of environment and people that brings out the best in you and your team

Possesses the ability to discern team’s triggers

Knows the consequences of your behaviors

Working Conditions

General office. Travel 3-4 times per year.

Other details
Pay Type
Salary",3.5,"Conference of State Bank Supervisors
3.5","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
62,"Manager, Data Science - Data Analytics (Phoenix, AZ)",$76k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Science Manager

Location: PHL or PHX (preferred)

General Summary:

Provides leadership, people management, and tactical input on the planning and execution of data science initiatives that drive business results. Establishes performance standards, operations planning and budgets while overseeing project and vendor management.

Responsibilities

Primary Responsibilities:

Responsible for strategic design, implementation, integration, testing, validation, documentation, review, maintenance and accessibility of resources which enable effective and reliable data science, data visualization and business intelligence.
Applies knowledge of general business functions and systems to develop strategies, operational plans and standards to support achievement of department, business and corporate goals.
Maintains effective team by recruiting, selecting, orienting, and training employees; maintaining a safe, secure, and legal work environment; and developing employees’ professional growth opportunities.
Achieves staff results by communicating job expectations; planning, monitoring, and appraising job results; coaching, counseling, and disciplining employees; developing, coordinating, and enforcing systems, policies, procedures, and productivity standards.
Manages people, projects, and products supporting department goals to improve company efficiency, compliance, profitability and stakeholder satisfaction.

Core Responsibilities:

Plans and manages detailed project timelines; provides reporting on status to key stakeholders.
Provides line management to direct reports, including training, performance management, professional development and coaching.
Proactively raises data science concerns, risks and issues that may delay/ impact the submission and presents risk mitigation strategy.
Keeps abreast of data science requirements to ensure compliance and client success.
Knowledge of machine learning and predictive modeling. • Knowledge of relational databases, scripting languages, and statistical computing packages. • Knowledge of applied statistics, including regression models.
Basic knowledge of company people management policies and procedures, including hiring, performance management, corrective action and compensation administration. • Basic people management skills including coaching, interviewing, and providing feedback and recognition. • Excellent written and oral communication skills. • Ability to manage team resources to ensure attainment of department objectives
Qualifications

Qualifications:

Master’s degree or international equivalent preferred
6 years’ relevant experience including 2 years in a leadership capacity
Equivalent combination of education, training, and relevant experience may be considered in place of the education and experience stated above. All employees must read, write and speak fluent English and host country language.
This job description is intended to present the general content and requirements for the performance of this job. The description is not to be construed as an exhaustive statement of duties, responsibilities or requirements.
Technical Skillset:

Oracle
Coding - navigating coding is key
Hadoop
SAS Data Sets
WPS
Looking for people that know how to code - Python, etc.

Patient Data, Prescription Data, Claims Data, Medical Payers,

PRA is an EEO/AA employer and is committed to providing opportunities to minorities, women, veterans and individuals with disabilities.

Options
Apply for this job onlineApply
Share
Sorry the Share function is not working properly at this moment. Please refresh the page and try again later.
Share on your newsfeed
Connect With Us!",3.8,"PRA Health Sciences
3.8","Philadelphia, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
63,Data Analyst,$47k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst
Location: Washington, DC
Education Required: Bachelor’s degree required, preferably in math, engineering, business, or the sciences.
Skills Required:

We are seeking highly motivated individuals to support a range of critical and exciting Department of Defense (DoD) and Naval Acquisition projects. Ideal candidates will possess a Bachelor’s degree in business, engineering, or related fields and 3+ years of experience, or a Master’s degree in a related field and at least one year of experience.

Successful candidates will also possess the following qualifications:
24 semester hours of quantitative course work (mathematics, statistics, engineering, physics, chemistry, etc.)
Experience obtaining, integrating, analyzing, and reporting client data, esp. acquisition data
Ability to apply analytic techniques to define project objectives and strategic direction, resolving complex problems using an in-depth knowledge of analytic methodologies and principles
Strong researching, data gathering, and technical reviews needed to produce written deliverables to include reports, spreadsheets, databases, formal process mapping, and technical designs
Microsoft Access experience
Ability to obtain and maintain a security clearance
U.S. Citizenship required
Responsibilities:
Assess requirements, determine necessary resources to accomplish task, hypothesize solutions, develop solution, and report findings to various levels of government leadership
Develop algorithms for data analysis
Plan and conducts work requiring judgment in the evaluation, selection, and adaptation and/or modification of methodologies and tools
Consult with senior consultants or functional specialists on unusual or complex problems
Assess requirements, determine necessary resources to accomplish task, hypothesize solutions, develop solution, and report findings
Benefits:
We offer competitive salaries commensurate with education and experience. We have an excellent benefits package that includes:
Comprehensive health, dental, life, long and short term disability insurance
100% Company funded Retirement Plans
Generous vacation, holiday and sick pay plans
Tuition assistance

Benefits are provided to employees regularly working a minimum of 30 hours per week.

Tecolote Research is a private, employee-owned corporation where people are our primary resource. Our investments in technology and training give our employees the tools to ensure our clients are provided the solutions they need, and our very high employee retention rate and stable workforce is an added value to our customers. Apply now to connect with a company that invests in you.",3.8,"Tecolote Research
3.8","Washington, DC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
64,Data Scientist,$120k-$140k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description:

Quartet is a pioneering healthcare technology company striving to improve the lives of people with mental health conditions. We connect people to a personalized care team to get them the right care at the right time. Our collaborative technology platform and range of services brings together physicians, mental health providers, and insurance companies to effectively improve patient outcomes and drive down healthcare costs. Backed by $153MM in venture funding from top investors like Oak HC/FT, GV (formerly Google Ventures), F-Prime Capital Partners, Polaris Partners, Centene Corporation and Echo Ventures. Quartet is headquartered in NYC and is currently operating in several markets across the United States Pennsylvania, Washington, Northern California, New Jersey, North Carolina, Louisiana, and Illinois.

About the team & opportunity:

As a Data Scientist at Quartet, you will work on a range of projects -- developing statistical analyses to study impact of Quartet interventions; predicting mental health needs among populations; building machine learning models to suggest timely and appropriate behavioral health care interventions for patients. You'll develop a deep understanding of Quartet interventions and the predictive models and algorithms.

You will design and develop effective models, features, and algorithms involving multiple datasets, including user activity, Electronic Health Records (EHR), admissions, discharges and transfers (ADT), medical claims, pharmacy claims, and lab test claims. Leverages knowledge of computer science, machine learning, data mining and software architecture to build high-quality data products. Supports the design of Quartet products, including: an entity resolution and de-duplication library for linking patients and providers data, which is collected from multiple sources; a machine learning application for the detection of opioid use disorder in patients using supervised learning and deep learning; and an optical mark recognition (OMR) computer vision application for transcribing paper assessments.

Accountabilities:
Research and develop machine-learning and statistical models in Quartet Health's platform to improve software personalization and recommendations for users
Drives a data-informed process for experimenting with new products to improve patient outcomes and operational efficiency.
Performing ML research, exploratory data analysis, and computer-vision modeling; developing model evaluation and online maintenance methodologies, including confidence estimation, calibration, and concept drift
Develop general-purpose frameworks to support machine learning applications in production.
Minimum Qualifications:
2-3 years experience as a data scientist.
Formal training in statistics and computer science.
Knowledge of mathematical fundamentals: probability theory, linear algebra and statistics.
Strong data transformation and extraction skills with SQL databases.
Strong statistical programming skills in both Python and R.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with Amazon Web Services infrastructure.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with Linux command line.
Comfort/self-sufficiency with git for version control.
Ability to work on projects from initial to final phase- beginning by defining a problem, developing an implementation plan, and overseeing deployment and maintenance.
Ability to clearly communicate across disciplines and work collaboratively.
Experience with any of the following: Docker, TensorFlow, Keras, Numpy, Scipy, Pandas, Gensim, Scikit-learn, NLKT, Jupyter
Employee Benefits for Quartet include: Unlimited vacation, volunteer opportunities, team events, mental healthcare coverage of 15 free therapy sessions + unlimited copay reimbursements, medical, dental + vision coverage, generous parental and military leave, commuter benefits, 401K, and stock option grants.

Want to know what Quartet life is like? Click here to meet our team.

Quartet is committed to building a diverse team and fostering an inclusive culture, and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We embrace and encourage our employees' differences in race, religion, color, national origin, gender, family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, veteran status, disability, pregnancy, medical conditions, and other characteristics. Headhunters and recruitment agencies may not submit resumes/CVs through this Web site or directly to managers. Quartet does not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes. Quartet will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with Quartet.

Please note: Quartet interview requests and job offers only originate from quartethealth.com email addresses (e.g. jsmith@quartethealth.com). Quartet will also never ask for bank information (e.g. account and routing number), social security numbers, passwords, or other sensitive information to be delivered via email. If you receive a scam email or wish to report a security issue involving Quartet, please notify us at: security@quartethealth.com.

Have someone to refer? Email talent@quartethealth.com to submit their details to us.",3.7,"Quartet Health
3.7","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
65,Data Scientist,$111k-$175k (Glassdoor Est.),"C3.ai is a leading enterprise AI software provider for accelerating digital transformation. The comprehensive and proven C3 AI Suite uses a model-driven abstraction layer to enable organizations to develop, deploy, and operate enterprise scale AI applications 40x to 100x faster than alternative approaches. www.c3.ai

As a Data Scientist, you will participate in the definition of new analytics capabilities able to provide our customers with the information they need to make proper decisions to support our customers in operating the internet of things (IoT). In addition, you will help find the appropriate machine learning / data mining algorithms to answer these questions. Finally, you will be responsible for implementing this into the product and making it available to our customers.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve similar results at large-scale.

Your Responsibilities:
Driving adoption of Deep Learning systems into next-generation of C3.ai products.
Designing and deploying Machine Learning algorithms for industrial applications such as fraud detection and predictive maintenance.
Collaborating with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields.
Applied Machine Learning experience (regression and classification, supervised, and unsupervised learning).
Strong mathematical background (linear algebra, calculus, probability and statistics).
Experience with scalable ML (MapReduce, streaming).
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team.
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Preferred
Experience with JavaScript and prototyping languages such as Python and R. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
Knowledge in electrical engineering and cyber-physical systems is a plus.
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.) is a plus.
C3.ai provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits including:
Competitive salary, generous stock options, 401K, medical, dental, and vision benefits. At the office, we offer a fully stocked kitchen with catered breakfast and lunch, table tennis and pool table, free membership at our on-site gym, Friday evening social hours with food, drink and music and a fun team of great people.
C3.ai is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.",4.5,"C3.ai
4.5","Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
66,Data Scientist-Journeyman,$83k-$135k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

This position is for a large contract for the Army, providing leadership and support existing systems, processes, and policies as well as working to implement new technologies and processes in support of the client’s mission to provide Intelligence training and technologies to military personnel.

Provides data science and data engineering support to targeting activities that bring in large datasets. Data science and data engineering support is needed to help manage and execute the ingest (extract, transform and load (ETL) operations), parsing, data normalizations, database design, as well as performing data analysis at scale and implementing algorithms to find impactful operational and finished intelligence in large data streams. Involved in the analysis of unstructured and semi-structured data. Exercises creativity in applying non-traditional approaches to large-scale analysis of unstructured data in support of high-value use cases. Handles processing against high-volume collections of data and high-velocity data streams. Has the ability to make discoveries in the world of big data. Requires strong technical and computational skills coupled with the ability to code, design, develop, and deploy sophisticated applications using advanced unstructured and semi-structured data analysis techniques. Has the ability to utilize advance tools and computational skills to interpret, connect, predict and make discoveries in complex data and deliver recommendations. Develops documentation to support objectives of operationally-focused team members.

Qualifications

3 to 10 years of experience and a BA/BS or MA/MS degree

Typically performs all functional duties independently.

Current TS/SCI Clearance

Bachelor of Science Degree or higher computer science, statistics, or other related STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering, or Math)

Desired qualifications:

Strong understanding of data engineering, structure, formatting, conditioning and analysis.
Knowledge of database tools and current data science processes.
Full-stack development experience.

Desired Skills:

Thorough/Working knowledge of Python and some of the following software/tools: SQL, R, Hadoop, Spark, Java, C/C++, Git Bash, Tableau, ArcGIS, Unix commands.
Thorough/Working knowledge of research designs.
Thorough/Working knowledge of collection methods, capabilities and tasking process.
Familiarity with project management concepts and principles.
Intellectual curiosity; creativity and innovation to go beyond current tools to deliver the best solution to complex problems.
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
67,Sr. HR Data Analyst,$59k-$100k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who is Cenlar? You are.

Employee-owners have made Cenlar one of the nation’s largest mortgage subservicers. We have achieved success by empowering people with company ownership, real programs that provide avenues for advancement, and a great atmosphere that makes everyone look forward to the workday. Get your share of our success by considering the opportunity to join our team as a Sr. HR Data Analyst.

Job Summary:

The Sr. HR Data Analyst is responsible for working with large and complex data sets (both internal and external) to evaluate, recommend, and support the implementation of business strategies related to Human Resources. This role identifies and aggregates complex dataset using a combination of tools, such as, SQL, VBA, PowerShell, and MS Access. This role should have knowledge of statistical models/algorithms using Python as the primary programming language.

Responsibilities:
Identifies, analyzes, and interprets trends or patterns with HR data sets and makes recommendations for business and process improvement
Analyzes processes and data by extracting data from various data warehouse environments
Develops reports and dashboards using various reporting and visualization tools to meet business needs
Understands ongoing requests and translates them into reports for team members and other stakeholders
Ability to design, develop, and execute ETL pipelines to automate ingestion of structured and unstructured data sources using a combination of PowerShell, SQL, Python, VBA, and other programming languages
Solid understanding of REST API architecture to implement interfaces that allow for the seamless data integration between our vendor systems and our internal databases
Performs data mapping for systems integration, data provisioning, and data consumption
Handles complex requests, data visualizations, forecasting, regression modeling, sequencing and trend analysis
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, mathematics, statistical analysis, Human Resources, or related field, Master’s degree preferred with 5+ years of relevant and/or data engineering analytics experience
Working knowledge of SQL skills to perform complex data manipulation using multiple tables, queries, and subqueries in a database environment (i.e., SQL Server, Oracle, MySQL, DB2, MS Access, et al).
Strong background with at least an object-oriented/functional/scripting language (Python, Java, etc.)
Familiarity with CLI (CMD, bash, PowerShell, etc.)
Expertise with various ETL technologies and tools
Strong understanding of business logic for aggregation and analysis services
Experience with HRMS, such as ADP, ETime, Taleo, and Cornerstone, preferred
Ability to develop capabilities and/ or experiences in partnership with more experienced staff
Exceptional organization and time management skills, with the initiative and the desire to own problems from start to finish
Ability to flex and adapt to changing business needs, and use discretion when dealing with confidential information
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills with ability to work on several projects simultaneously
Passion to have an impact; Pro-active self-starter; Demonstrates a strong sense of urgency and responsiveness; Strong organizational and project management skills
Demonstrated track record of developing and successfully driving new initiatives through an organization to achieve business results
Total Rewards :

Cenlar FSB offers outstanding benefits which may include paid medical/dental/life insurance, 401k, employee ownership, tuition assistance, a supportive work environment, and genuine opportunities for advancement. Cenlar is a Drug Free Workplace and an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer -- M/F/D/V/SO.

Visit www.cenlar.com for more details.

Please apply online .",2.5,"Cenlar
2.5","Yardley, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1958,Company - Private,-1,-1,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
68,Data & Analytics Consultant,$81k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"WHO WE LOOK FOR

An SEI Consultant is a master communicator and active listener who understands how to navigate an audience. Self-aware, almost to a fault, SEI consultants keenly understand how to adjust their approach based on the situation. Following a logical, fact-based approach, our consultants possess the superior ability to see correlations others may not, ask the right questions and drive solutions.

As super-connectors, our consultants connect not only people, but data, trends and experiences. Mature, humble, and genuine, SEI Consultants frequently go above and beyond for both their clients and their colleagues. SEI Consultants are ethical and trustworthy individuals who do what they say. SEI Consultants have an insatiable curiosity and love to learn. These individuals are commonly tech savvy and early adopters. Their passion for learning is infectious and excites others.

As every project is different, an SEI Consultant must be adaptable and comfortable with unexpected situations. An SEI Consultant must be at ease with ambiguity because although a client knows that a problem exists – they need SEI to figure it out and drive a solution. SEI Consultants define ambition differently. SEI Consultants are authentic, low-maintenance individuals who like to hang out with colleagues outside of work. Whether it be cooking, traveling, hiking, or volunteering, SEI Consultants enjoy working with genuine, thoughtful folks who want to steer clear of the traditional grind and share the joy of day-to-day life and activities with colleagues, friends and family.

WHAT WE DO

Our consultants work with clients at all levels of the organization, from the C-suite to the shop floor, helping them to deliver on their most strategic initiatives. We’re known for making realistic, data-driven decisions that deliver value in tangible ways to our clients. Our clients ask for us on projects that require a superior combination of technical and business capabilities, people and management skills, and a collaborative mindset. We excel in understanding complex programs and strategic initiatives and breaking them into actionable pieces.

We are actively looking for professionals in the following areas:
Data Strategy and Governance
Database Architecture and Development
Data Analysis
Reporting and Data Visualization
The ideal candidate will:
Have experience understanding and solving real business problems
Solid writing and speaking skills to support data storytelling
Ideal candidates may call themselves Data Engineers, Data Scientists and Analysts and Data Governance professionals. Experience may include but is not limited to the following:
Experience with statistical and mathematical modeling, artificial intelligence and machine learning software and methods
Specialization in architecting enterprise solutions with visualizations and data-discovery tools such as Tableau, QlikView, Spotfire, Amazon Web Services, Cloud, Salesforce
Technical capabilities that include designing scalable data architectures, solution performance tuning, and hardware sizing
Experience and knowledge of programming and scripting languages, such as , Python, Java, C#, PL/SQL, R and SAS
Experience and knowledge of relational and dimensional database structures, theories, principles, and practice used in data warehousing and analytics solutions
Experience managing, populating, and querying database technologies including RDBMS, NOSQL, and big data platforms and experience working with these technologies' ecosystems
QUALIFICATIONS

Required
Demonstrated business and technology acumen
Proven track record of delivering results
Experience working with and/or leading a team
Ability to work independently
Ability to work across industries, roles, functions & technologies
Positive can-do attitude
A curiosity for new technology
Authorization for permanent employment in the United States (this position is not eligible for immigration sponsorship)
Preferred
Bachelor’s degree (Mathematics, Computer Science, or related field preferred)
8+ years professional experience
Consulting experience
Experience across our service offerings",4.6,"SEI
4.6","Cincinnati, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1992,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
69,Senior Digital Analytics Consultant,$74k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"PK is looking for a Sr. Digital Analytics Consultant with demonstrated experience with Adobe Analytics, Adobe Launch, Target, Tealium, Google Analytics within a healthcare vertical to join our fast-growing team.
We’re looking for someone who can serve as the primary point of contact and subject matter expert for all analytics and optimization workstreams. The person is responsible for coordination and execution of projects in the following areas:
Digital marketing analytics
Analytics measurement strategy (web, mobile app, additional data sources)
Web analytics audits (tagging issues, reporting anomalies, recommendations)
Marketing campaign performance measurement and proscriptive analytics
Dashboarding, reporting, visualization
Web analytics tagging (strategy and technical requirements)
Ongoing performance management consulting and client education
Conversion optimization & Martech
CRO / conversion improvement (audit, opportunities, test plans, execution, analytics)
Personalization – martech, strategy, and tactics

The Senior Digital Analytics Consultant provides thought leadership for industry best practices, technologies, and solutions that reveal data-driven insights for our clients and provide measurable ROI. He/she works closely with subject matter experts, group leaders, and developers within the organization to scope and execute value-adding projects, as well as to lead key audits, analysis, and tasks critical to the success of the team. This position reports to the Director of Data and Analytics.
Client facing
Plan, create, and execute workshops and structured meetings to develop a clear understanding of clients’ business objectives and challenges.
Understand their business requirements and translate them into strategic roadmap and technical requirements.
Manage a group of clients with multiple cross channel digital strategies
Maintain regular contact with clients, keeping in mind their level of maturity, capabilities, constraints, pain points, and providing timely and effective responses to all customer questions
Keep abreast of industry developments and recommend new tactics, tools, methods and regulatory compliance efforts (GDPR, CCPA, etc.)
Provide day-to-day support in execution in measurement strategies, implementation projects, executing deliverables, managing budgets, analyzing results, and reporting and communicating to clients
Prepare and deliver top quality proposals and presentations to clients to demonstrate progress, ensuring that documentation and presentation material follows all company guidelines
Prospect Facing
Support new client acquisition efforts with high-level analysis, implementation roadmaps, management estimates, and case studies
Active participation in business development efforts is expected.
Seek out and execute on opportunities to promote thought leadership - case studies, white papers, blog posts, speaking at conferences/events, award submissions, etc.
Business Facing
Ensure account processes and documentation are developed and maintained for each client to support team transitions and backup, and client transitions
Provide ongoing feedback to team members and participate in annual performance reviews
Identify growth needs in team members and help develop professional development plans
Assist with planning team size and operating budget; work with recruiters to target candidates for open positions; interview and help onboard
With the group manager, help shape practice offering to ensure it has market value and competitiveness

5-7 years of experience in digital marketing and analytics
Experience in healthcare vertical
Demonstrated experience with Adobe Analytics & Adobe Launch, Google Analytics (advanced level)
Hands on expert level of at least one industry standard A/B testing tool (Google Optimize, Adobe Target, Evergage, Monetate, etc.)
Understanding of Tag Management Systems, such as Google Tag Manager, Tealium, or Adobe Launch
Understanding of key measures of website engagement and how to identify issues within business context
Demonstrated experience automating and visualizing data analysis and recurring reporting using Tableau, Microsoft Power BI, or similar tool
Understanding of different attribution models and methods, their purposes and limitations
Continuous learning mindset, analytical thinker, and problem solver
Ability to build long-term client relationships
Self-motivated individual with strong attention to detail
Excellent communication skills, spoken and written, with demonstrated ability to pull out insights, explain, and build cases in support of strategies, budget allocation, and KPIs
Expert proficiency with MS Office, especially Excel, PowerPoint, and Word
Bachelor’s degree required, Master’s preferred
Additional Preferred Qualifications:
Experience working with remote teams and clients
Marketing Automation experience (Salesforce Marketing Cloud or similar)
Google Analytics certification (will be required within first 3 months of employment)
Google Marketing Platform / Adobe Marketing Cloud
Working proficiency and experience with R, Python, or SQL for processing large data sets
Experience with ATV, CDPs, and other new/emerging marketing technologies is a plus
~ In order to provide equal employment and advancement opportunities to all individuals, employment decisions at PK are based exclusively on merit.  PK does not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, including gender identity and identity expression, national origin, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",3.7,"PK
3.7","Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
70,"Scientist/Senior Scientist, Biology",$93k-$178k (Glassdoor Est.),"Scientist/Senior Scientist, Biology

Cambridge, MA

BIO20-903

At Blueprint Medicines, we are creating a blueprint for the future of healthcare. We are a leading company in the personalized medicine revolution by focusing on delivering new medicines that are targeted to the genetic driver of disease. We do this by leveraging our one-of-a-kind drug discovery platform to discover, develop and work to bring highly-selective kinase inhibitors to patients globally. This prolific scientific platform has enabled Blueprint Medicines to build a pipeline of novel therapies that span three distinct areas of medicine; genomically defined cancers, rare diseases and cancer immunotherapy.

Blueprint Medicines is seeking a highly motivated, scientifically creative and collaborative scientist to work in a fast paced environment within a cross-functional drug discovery team. The ideal candidate will have experience interrogating cellular and molecular mechanisms as they relate to kinase target pathway modulation, off-target liabilities and resistance. The candidates primary role will be lab based and include cellular assays to support drug discovery efforts. This position offers the opportunity to impact a growing portfolio of targeted therapies in a fast-paced and innovative research environment.

Responsibilities:
Independently conduct, optimize and proactively troubleshoot cellular screening assays.
Responsible for data processing, interpreting and presenting to cross functional team members.
Proactively employ a breadth of cell and molecular biology techniques, including gene targeting approaches and small molecule inhibition, to dissect mechanism of action.
Design and execute experiments to evaluate target dependency, off target liabilities, phenotypic responses, identifying resistance mechanisms and beneficial drug combination.
Regularly present research to the integrated project team highlighting implications for broader program.
Qualifications:
Minimum requirements, BS/MS in relevant disciplines with 3+ years of experience in a biopharmaceutical industry setting.
Core competence:
Candidate must be skilled in carrying out a wide range of state-of-the-art molecular and cellular biology techniques.
Extensive hands on experience with flow cytometry, cell sorting and state of the art cell-based assays (immune-assays, MSD, AlphaLISA, in cell western etc.).
Experience with standard software analytical tools, xlsx, Prism, Chalice or other synergy software.
Experience with genome editing/KD approaches (CRISPR or si/shRNA) for engineering cell line models (add-back rescue constructs/CRISPR knock-in is also strongly preferred).
Familiar with PK/PD/efficacy relationships and delivering PD readouts by western and plate based assays for in vivo tumor models.
Extensive experience managing cell based and in vivo studies at CROs and with collaborators.
Strong oral and written communication skills, as well as excellent documentation and organizational skills are essential.
A team player, who listens effectively, invites response and discussion
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.

WHO WE ARE:

Blueprint Medicines mission is to dramatically improve the lives of patients with genomically defined diseases. Our singular focus is to use our deep understanding of the genetic blueprint of cancer and other diseases driven by the abnormal activation of kinases to craft highly selective medicines aimed at eradicating these diseases.

We dont think in small steps. We think in giant leaps.

We are driven by the pursuit of new ideas, new innovations, and new ways of thinking.

We know that what each and every one of us does matters and that our success depends on our ability to work together. We believe we are at our best as a company when our employees are thriving and foster a culture that provides opportunities to grow and develop professionally, while also having fun.

Powered by JazzHR",3.5,"Blueprint Medicines
3.5","Cambridge, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
71,HCM Data Analyst,$55k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"Any qualified individual with a disability who is having difficulty in completing an application because of incompatible technology or other disability-related application issues may contact us at the following phone number for assistance: 251-445-1932.

Austal shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR §§ 60-1.4(a), 60-300.5(a) and 60-741.5(a). These regulations prohibit discrimination against qualified individuals based on their status as protected veterans or individuals with disabilities, and prohibit discrimination against all individuals based on their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin. Moreover, these regulations require that covered prime contractors and subcontractors take affirmative action to employ and advance in employment individuals without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status or disability. Austal’s commitment to equal employment opportunity applies at all levels of employment, in all job titles, including the executive level, and to all employment actions, including but not limited to decisions concerning recruitment, hiring, training, and promotion.

REPORTS TO: HCM Coordinator

SUPERVISES: N/A

AUTHORITIES / RESPONSIBILITIES:

The HCM data analyst plays a crucial role in collecting, structuring, analyzing, and reporting on HR processes and data. Supports business with key HR insights reporting (manning levels, hires; retention, turnover), talent metrics (promotion reporting; learning and development tracking; performance management insights), benefits reporting (billing invoices, participation census) as well as ad hoc reporting and data analysis as needed.

Job Description

Utilizes Workday systems and analytical tools to develop, analyze and interpret HR workforce data.
Partners with stakeholders across business units to build and implement reporting and analytic solutions that provide leaders with information necessary to achieve business goals and objectives.
Develop and maintain standardized dashboards and other related metrics reports for organization-wide and HR department evaluation.
Maintains common HR data repository
Monitors effectiveness of reporting and analytics products to ensure optimal value to the business, modifying or operationalizing new metrics and dashboard products as needed.
Creates scheduled reports and respond to ad-hoc queries from senior management and other areas of the company.
Leverages data extraction tools and approaches to perform complex data analysis and formulate new meaningful insights.
Reviews new reporting requests to be sure the request is consistent with HR systems and data strategies.
Creates, maintains, and ensures quality assurance of human resources data sets, reports, and metrics.
Recommends process and system improvements, follow up on recommendations.
Assist in the identification of data integrity problems and recommend solutions.
Other special projects, as needed.
Other duties as assigned;

QUALIFICATIONS / KNOWLEDGE / EXPERIENCE:

Bachelors degree or equivalent.
3-5 Business Analyst experience documenting Business Requirements and conducting data analysis.
Workday experience preferred in one or more modules: HCM, Benefits, Talent/Performance, Security, or Advanced Compensation.
Strong written and verbal communication skills to effectively communicate processes and procedures with managers and employees.
Highly developed ability to provide clear, concise verbal and written explanations for complex concepts so that others see the value add in recommendations and solutions.
Strong computer proficiency and technical aptitude to utilize MSOffice. Expert-level proficiency in Microsoft Excel (PowerPoint a plus).
Strong process orientation, analytical and problem-solving skills
Excellent service orientation skill set, ability to build strong relationships with fellow HR team members.
Must work with a sense of urgency and have the ability to handle confidential information in a professional manner. Can handle demands from multiple customers and has the ability to prioritize.
Ability to work collaboratively with multiple teams/organizations with attention to detail and strong organizational skills.
Flexible and has the capability to deliver results in a fast-paced, and high volume environment.

TOOLS: Not applicable

DIRECTION EXERCISED: Works within established guidelines. Works autonomously and escalates issues to HCM Coordinator as appropriate.

DISCRETION EXERCISED: A degree of creativity and latitude is expected. Relies on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.

LIAISES WITH:

Employees, Department Managers, HR / Benefit Staff, Finance staff and external consultants as assigned.

ADDITIONAL GUIDELINES:

The ability to obtain and maintain a DoD clearance may be required if deemed necessary in the scope of your position responsibilities.
Candidates must meet the following employment eligibility guidelines to be eligible for employment with Austal USA:
18 years or older at time of application
Able to provide proof of US Person status (permanent resident or citizen)
No felony convictions of theft/deception or violent crimes within seven years from disposition date
No felony convictions of drug crimes within three years from disposition date
Willing to submit to a drug screen
Willing to submit to a background check",3.1,"Austal USA
3.1","Mobile, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1988,Company - Public,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
72,"AVP, Data Modeler",$55k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are currently looking to hire a Senior Data Modeler within the Enterprise Data and Information Services team, which is a part of LPLs Technology organization. This position is responsible for establishing and maintaining foundational modeling practices and standards which will enable the company to transform the consumption and usage of data across the enterprise. The individual in this role will promote a deep understanding and awareness of data with a focus on information modeling, serve as a leader and data champion on data projects, and adhere to an enterprise-wide data governance framework to achieve the highest level of consistency, quality, and protection of data. Essential Functions: Represent business concepts, their definitions, properties, and relationships via conceptual and logical models and diagrams. Coordinate discussions and reviews with subject matter experts and stakeholders to confirm key attributes and relationships and to perform model validation. Produce models to support the mapping of data in legacy data formats and data stores to modern formats and enterprise data stores. Facilitate the alignment of models across multiple domains. Create, update, and optimize logical and physical data models along with corresponding metadata. Define and leverage data modeling and design standards, tools, and best practices. Ensure naming convention standards are followed, data proliferation is minimized, and data governance processes are followed. Perform reverse engineering of data models from databases and SQL scripts. Design and implement data technology solutions in the areas of master data, metadata, and reference data. Participate in the evaluation of new tools and techniques to improve data management for the enterprise. Partner with business analysts, data analysts, and other technology resources to interpret business and data requirements and translate into data models. Collaborate with data architects, technical leads, developers, and DBAs to design and implement data solutions. Maintain in-depth knowledge of data across all domains and entities. Provide support for metadata initiatives, including, but not limited to Business Glossary updates Data Dictionaries for physical table structures Data Models and Data Flow Diagrams Data Lineage within metadata repository Other Job Duties: Mentor and provide leadership to more junior members of the team. Qualifications: 7-10 years experience in applying data management principles and industry standards to design, build, and maintain complex data model assets in Transactional/ Operational, ODS, Data Warehouse and Data Mart applications, with a heavy emphasis on transactional data. Bachelors degree in Computer Engineering, Computer Systems, Computer Science, Software Engineering, or related field. Expertise in data modeling principles, including conceptual, logical and physical data models. Mastery of data analysis and modeling tools, such as Power Designer, ERWin, and ER/Studio. Mastery of RDBMS platforms, including SQL Server and Oracle. Mastery of Data Definition Language (DDL) and Data Manipulation Language (DML) SQL commands. Experience maintaining metadata for complex data environments and ensuring data integrity. Demonstrated ability to work as part of a high-performing team and influence others within the technology organization. Flexible and able to successfully navigate ambiguity and succeed in a rapidly-changing, fast-paced, deadline-driven environment with multiple priorities. Highly organized with strong communication, problem-solving, documentation, and presentation skills. Proven ability to be proactive, possess flexible attitude, learn new skills, and manage ambiguity. Experience in financial services. Familiar with EDM Council, Financial Industry Business Ontology (FIBO), and other sources for financial industry models. Additional Requirements: Experience with both waterfall and agile project methodologies. Experience with Big Data technologies such as Hadoop, Python, and Spark are a plus but not required. Why LPL? At LPL, we believe that objective financial guidance is a fundamental need for everyone. As the nations leading independent broker-dealer, we offer an integrated platform of proprietary technology, brokerage, and investment advisor services. We provide you with a work environment that encourages your creativity and growth, a leadership team that is supportive and responsive, and the opportunity to create a career that has no limits, only amazing potential. We are one team on one mission. We take care of our advisors, so they can take care of their clients. Because our company is not too big and not too small, you can seize the opportunity to make a real impact. We are committed to supporting workplace equality, and we embrace the different perspectives and backgrounds of our employees. We also care for our communities, and we encourage our employees to do the same. This creates an environment in which you can do your best work. Want to hear from our employees on what its like to work at LPL? Watch this ! We take social responsibility seriously. Learn more here Want to see info on our benefits? Learn more here Join the LPL team and help us make a difference by turning lifes aspirations into financial realities. Please log in or create an account to apply to this position. Principals only. EOE. Information on Interviews: LPL will only communicate with a job applicant directly from an @lp l.com email address and will never conduct an interview online or in a chatroom forum. During an interview, LPL will not request any form of payment from the applicant, or information regarding an applicants bank or credit card. Should you have any questions regarding the application process, please contact LPLs Human Resources Solutions Center at (800) 877-7210.",3.6,"LPL Financial
3.6","Fort Mill, SC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1968,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
73,Electrochemical Scientist/Engineer,$48k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"KEMET offers our customers the broadest selection of capacitor technologies in the industry, along with an expanding range of electromechanical devices, electromagnetic compatibility solutions and supercapacitors. Our vision is to be the preferred supplier of electronic component solutions demanding the highest standards of quality, delivery and service. Additional information about KEMET can be found at www.kemet.com.

Position Summary:

The Electrochemical Scientist/Engineer conducts anodization research in a laboratory setting, utilizing engineering and scientific research methods for improvement or optimization of the performance of the current products and processes. This position will work with cross functional teams and provide technical direction.

Essential Functions:
Conduct anodization research and development in a laboratory setting
Conduct anodization research utilizing engineering and scientific research methods for improvement or optimization of the performance of the current products and processes
Research and develop new anodization processes and electrolyte formulations
Provide technical direction for existing and new anodization materials and processes regarding material selection, characterization and qualification, with ultimate translation to manufacturing
Utilize advanced chemical and analytical knowledge, data, and statistical tools to solve technical challenges
Work with cross functional teams to support projects by performing laboratory work to improve product performance, troubleshoot and resolve customer issues
Competencies:
Industrial or academic experience in electrochemical processes such as anodization or relevant experience in related electrochemical processes
Experience in electrolyte chemistry including development of new electrolyte formulations for product development, improvement, design, application and production
Industrial or academic experience with anodizing equipment, anodization processes and the related electrical engineering experience to operate anodization equipment
Experience with electrochemical cell design and prototyping
Demonstrated hands-on research and problem-solving with strong analytical skills
Demonstrated skills in major electrochemical and material characterization methods
Knowledge in dielectric development, failure analysis, and manufacturing operations
Knowledge of electrolytic capacitor development and manufacturing is a plus
Education and Experience:
BS/MS/PhD in the area of electrochemistry, electrochemical engineering or alternatively a BS/MS/PhD in Materials Science or Chemistry/Chemical Engineering with strong emphasis in electrochemistry
Physical Requirements:
Up to 25% travel may be required
This job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties, or responsibilities that are required of the employee. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change, or new ones may be assigned at any time with or without notice.

KEMET does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, age, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, ethnicity or national origin, disability, pregnancy, religion, political affiliation, union membership, protected veteran status, protected genetic information, marital status or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law, in making employment decisions including but not limited to hiring, wages, promotions, rewards, and access to training. Qualified applicants and workers shall be provided with reasonable accommodation for disability and religious practices.",4.2,"KEMET
4.2","Simpsonville, SC",-1,10000+ Employees,1919,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
74,Senior Data Scientist,$112k-$182k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking a Senior Data Scientist to develop innovative solutions for customers and internal product teams. We look to rapidly prototype solutions and deploy the most promising of them. We identify and leverage the latest techniques (fast.ai is a team favorite) so that our customers can stay one step ahead. On every project you'll learn something new (and likely teach us something as well).

Responsibilities include:
Develop solutions spanning multiple subject areas, from NLP to image and video.
Maintain awareness of state-of-the-art machine learning and techniques, methods and platforms, including commercial and open source.
Implement, configure and test machine learning and deep learning libraries and platforms (e.g. fast.ai, TensorFlow, Keras, XGBoost, LightGBM).
Test solutions on AWS using services such as SageMaker, EC2, and Snowball Edge.
Write blog posts and presentations that clearly communicate complex machine learning concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Contribute to visually-appealing, web-enabled prototype applications that illustrate relevant machine learning capabilities.
Basic Qualifications:
Experience with Python (2+ years).
Experience with machine learning or statistics (2+ years).
Ability to work both independently and collaboratively.
High levels of curiosity, creativity, and problem-solving capabilities.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Comfortable navigating the command line.
Desired Skills:
Research experience in machine learning specific to natural language processing, computer vision, or deep learning.
Experience with managing data and creating algorithms using AWS.
Experience with R, Java, or other programming languages.
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI with polygraph required.
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5","Herndon, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
75,Data Science Instructor,$121k-$196k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking a skilled Data Science Instructor to support a fast paced, innovative project supporting our client in the field of data science and AI/Machine Learning.

Basic Qualifications:
SME skill level
15+ years of experience in data science or a related field
Ability to become familiar with current client priorities, programs and issues in order to adapt training programs to reflect changes in client mission, structure, regulations, or processes.
Excellent oral, written, and interpersonal communication skills
Outstanding facilitation skills to manage group processes and elicit student participation
Analytic and problem-solving skills
Demonstrated ability to apply structured analysis methods to various types of data to establish trends, determine variability, and diagnose the effect on training curricula.
Ability to work independently and as part of a team
Security Clearance:
An active TS/SCI w/Poly clearance

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.


Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality, and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5","Herndon, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
76,Data Engineer,$50k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

We are expanding our efforts into complementary data technologies for decision support in areas of ingesting and processing large data sets including data commonly referred to as semi-structured or unstructured data. Our interests are in enabling data science and search based applications on large and low latent data sets in both a batch and streaming context for processing. To that end, this role will engage with team counterparts in exploring and deploying technologies for creating data sets using a combination of batch and streaming transformation processes. These data sets support both off-line and in-line machine learning training and model execution. Other data sets support search engine based analytics. Exploration and deployment of technologies activities include identifying opportunities that impact business strategy, collaborating on the selection of data solutions software, and contributing to the identification of hardware requirements based on business requirements. Responsibility also includes coding, testing, and documentation of new or modified scalable analytic data systems including automation for deployment and monitoring. This role participates along with team counterparts to develop solutions in an end-to-end framework on a group of core data technologies.

Responsibilities:

JOB DUTIES

Contribute to the evaluation, research, experimentation efforts with batch and streaming data engineering technologies in a lab to keep pace with industry innovation
Work with data engineering related groups to inform on and showcase capabilities of emerging technologies and to enable the adoption of these new technologies and associated techniques
Contribute to the definition and refinement of processes and procedures for the data engineering practice
Work closely with data scientists, data architects, ETL developers, other IT counterparts, and business partners to identify, capture, collect, and format data from the external sources, internal systems and the data warehouse to extract features of interest
Code, test, deploy, monitor, document and troubleshoot data engineering processing and associated automation
Perform other duties as assigned
Conform with all company policies and procedures

REPORTING RELATIONSHIP

Data Integration Manager US

Qualifications:

Knowledge

Experience with processing large data sets with Kafka, RabbitMQ, Flume, Hadoop, HBase, Cassandra and/or Spark or similar distributed system
Experience with NoSQL data stores such as MongoDB, Cassandra, HBase, Redis, Riak or other technologies that embed NoSQL with search such as MarkLogic or Lily Enterprise
Experience or familiarity with ETL and Business Intelligence technologies such as Informatica, DataStage, Ab Initio, Cognos, BusinessObjects or Oracle Business Intelligence

Skills

Ability to quickly prototype and perform critical analysis and use creative approaches for solving complex problems
Excellent written and verbal communication skills

Education

High School Diploma or equivalent required
Bachelor’s Degree in related field or equivalent work experience preferred

Experience

2-4 years of hands-on experience with SQL, data modeling, and relational databases such as Oracle, DB2 and Postgres required
Minimum of 1 year of experience with software engineering to include Java, Scala and Python required #LI-TS1",3.2,"GM Financial
3.2","Arlington, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1992,Company - Public,Lending,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
77,Research Associate/Associate Scientist/Scientist-Chemical Development,$52k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Dicerna Pharmaceuticals is seeking highly motivated scientists to join its Chemical Development team in Cambridge, Massachusetts. The candidates will be responsible for supporting chemical development of Dicerna's oligonucleotides and contribute to the development of purification technology for Dicerna's GalXC platform. Although the focus of the position will be purification development and support, this position will have the opportunity to contribute across a wide range of chemical development activities including oligonucleotide synthesis and downstream processing. Prior experience in analytical development and/or oligonucleotide purification is desired but not required.

Key Responsibilities:

Primary responsibility is focused on development of new purification methods for development stage oligonucleotides and their raw materials utilizing state of the art techniques including reverse phase, ion-exchange and mixed mode medias.

Execute investigations developing improved methods for scalable synthesis, deprotection and downstream processing of highly modified oligonucleotides and their starting materials.

Works closely with Chemical Development team in support of new manufacturing processes for oligonucleotides and phosphoramidites.

Prep samples, analyze and process data, primarily by HPLC and LC-MS.

Support transfer of new methods internally and to partner CMO's.

Operate, maintain, and troubleshoot lab instruments such as purification and HPLC systems.

Conduct laboratory work in safe, efficient manner that ensures a safe working environment for colleagues.

Ability to complete assignments that meet deadlines and time schedules.

Keep accurate records of the experiments utilizing GDP documentation and summarize the results in written reports.

Possess excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Exercise judgement within broadly defined practices and policies in selecting techniques and evaluation criteria for obtaining results.

Qualifications:

BS/MS/PhD in Chemistry, Biology or related field with 5 years of industrial experience

Experience in a cGMP environment is desired.

Knowledge of nucleic acids purification techniques and/or analytical development of oligonucleotide analysis methods.

Knowledge of nucleoside, nucleic acid chemistry and the synthesis of oligonucleotides is valuable, but not required.

Experience with GE AKTA purification systems is preferred.

Experience with HPLC techniques on multiple platforms (e.g. Waters, Agilent, Thermo)",4.7,"Dicerna
4.7","Boulder, CO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2007,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
78,"Sr. Data Scientist, Pricing",$142k-$223k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

Wish is a mobile e-commerce platform that flips traditional shopping on its head. We connect hundreds of millions of people with the widest selection of delightful, surprising, and—most importantly—affordable products delivered directly to their doors. Each day on Wish, millions of customers in more than 160 countries around the world discover new products. For our over 1 million merchant partners, anyone with a good idea and a mobile phone can instantly tap into a global market.

We're fueled by creating unique products and experiences that give people access to a new type of commerce, where all are welcome. If you’ve been searching for a supportive environment to chase your curiosity and use data to investigate the questions that matter most to you, this is the place.

Job Description

At Wish, our Data Science & Engineering team is composed of Economists, Data Scientists, Data Analysts & Data Engineers who focus on centralizing corporate data in order to gain insights, knowledge and scalability, that empower a proactive and rigorous analysis of key business indicators. Our mission is to derive wisdom from data via the application of Data Science.

Within the DS&E Team, the Pricing Team at Wish is a small but growing, high impact team. We are responsible for the platform’s pricing system and work with stakeholders across the company on related issues. We work to consistently improve the pricing algorithms used to determine the price for items on Wish while working with partners from logistics to user incentives.

Wish’s Pricing Data Science Team has an exciting opportunity for exceptional candidates to innovate at the intersection of pricing and other areas throughout Wish.

Some applied areas the Pricing Team explores are:
Merchants: How do we modify pricing to support a diverse set of merchants while promoting competition?
Logistics & Taxes: How do we adapt pricing when costs change?
Promotions & Incentives: What types of discounts should we offer and how should we adjust pricing for these discounts?
In this role you will:
Translate business questions into actionable research
Provide expert guidance to business stakeholders evaluating model and experimental results
Develop a research agenda/roadmap within your technical area
Apply traditional (neoclassical), behavioral, and experimental approaches to solve complex problems
Work and communicate with stakeholders across the company to accomplish objectives
Be willing to learn, grow, and build - we need someone with a startup mindset that can also operate at the scale of one of the world’s largest e-commerce platforms
#LI-WISHXDS

Qualifications
PhD in Economics, Quantitative Marketing, Operations Research, Management Science, or related field
2+ years of experience in industry, consulting, research, or government
Proficiency in a scripting language such as Python or R
Preferred Qualifications:
Candidates with advanced experience are encouraged to apply
Demonstrated ability to develop a research agenda/roadmap, execute, and deliver impactful results (either based on industry experience or publications beyond your PhD)
Effective verbal and written communication for technical and non-technical audiences
Additional Information

Wish values diversity and is committed to creating an inclusive work environment. We provide equal employment opportunity for all applicants and employees. We do not discriminate based on any legally-protected class or characteristic. Employment decisions are made based on qualifications, merit, and business needs. If you need assistance or accommodation due to a disability, please let your recruiter know. For job positions in San Francisco, CA, and other locations where required, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Individuals applying for positions at Wish, including California residents, can see our privacy policy here.",3.5,"Wish
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Other Retail Stores,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
79,"Research Scientist, Vector Biology",$67k-$140k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

Kite Pharma Santa Monica is building a clinical vector production facility to enhance and broaden its gene therapy platform capabilities for the development of new cellular therapies targeting unmet oncology needs. Kite is seeking a Vector Biology Scientist to take on critical roles to support analytical design and characterization of retroviral and lentiviral vectors to enable vector process design and manufacturing. The person in this role will contribute to team projects, be a role model, mentor to junior staff, and take ownership of important analytical tasks.

Responsibilities and Duties

Establish strategy for vector analytics to follow USP/ICH/EU regulations, GMP/GLP requirements, and industry practices.

Provide technical leadership and expertise for vector method optimization, qualification and routine testing

Develop and mentor direct reports to provide analytical testing including but not limited to cell-based potency assays for the RVV- and LVV-based gene therapy product development and commercialization.

Interface with the process design and manufacturing teams in support of in-process testing and investigations.

Collaborate closely with the method development and quality control groups to support method development/optimization, characterization, troubleshooting, transfer and validation.

Author/review test methods, SOPs and technical protocols/reports.

Provide subject matter expertise into the method performance review.

Attend cross-functional team meetings as needed.

May contribute to the writing and review of regulatory submissions.

Qualifications

BS with 8+ years, or MS with 6+ years, or preferably PhD with 0+ years of industry experience in Cell Biology, Immunology, Molecular Biology, Virology or related fields.
Extensive hands-on experience with development and routine testing assays for vector release and characterization including data analysis.
Strong background in mammalian cell culture, flow cytometry, qPCR/ddPCR, and ELISA-based methods.
Experience with next-generation sequencing platforms, library construction and computational bioinformatics analyses (i.e. Illumina systems).
Familiar with data analysis software, such as MS Excel, PLA, JMP and SoftMax Pro.
Experience and ability to use DOE for assay optimization and robustness.
Knowledge of relevant USP/ICH/EU regulations, GMP/GLP requirements, and industry practices.
Highly collaborative team player who demonstrates open communication.
Strong scientific writing and presentation skills.
Experience with viral particle characterization/physical titer methods is preferred but not required.

Do you want to make a real difference in the world? Come help us in our quest to cure cancer! Everyone at Kite is grounded by this common goal. Every single day, we seek to establish a direct line between that purpose and our day-to-day work. Join us in our mission!

#IND123",3.7,"Kite Pharma
3.7","Santa Monica, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
80,Senior Data Scientist (Remote Option),$70k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions. The Senior Data Scientist work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.

Responsibilities

This is a unique opportunity for a motivated individual to influence Humana’s vision to provide coordinated, integrated care via home care solutions and ECOM (Enterprise Clinical Operating Model). The Senior Data Scientist uses mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions. The work assignments involve moderately complex to complex issues where the analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of variable factors.

Responsibilities

Recommend, design, and develop actionable analytic solutions for key business problems through in-depth investigations of healthcare utilization trends and outcomes
Use advanced analytic techniques like machine learning, predictive modeling to develop sophisticated models to solve the business problem
Use industry leading database systems, clinical decision engines and algorithms to extract meaningful insights from structured and unstructured data by leveraging NLP/ML
Ensure the developed models or statistical tests are reusable and modular for effective transition to cloud in the future
Work directly with aligned business partners and assist in requirements definition, project scoping, timeline management, and results documentation to ensure professional relationship management
Build ‘smart’ systems that learn from health intervention outcomes, clinical programs over time
Collaborate with multiple cross-functional teams to understand the business needs, identify any operational barriers and issues, and facilitate their resolution

In the first year this role will focus on the following

Develop effective partnerships with internal business partners and coworkers
Work in an agile way to produce, interpret and recommend real time optimization opportunities for the business to implement using advanced analytics techniques
Enhance the ability to work in a fast-paced environment, multitask and quickly pivot based on business needs
Develop subject matter expertise in the business needs and serve as a consulting resource for the clinical analytic needs of the stakeholders
Implement real time business feedback of analytics based on the direct needs of internal customers

Required Qualifications

Master’s Degree + 3 years’ experience OR Bachelor’s Degree + 5 years’ experience.
Data Analytics, Computer Science or related quantitative program
Experience in using mathematics, statistics, modeling, business analysis, and technology to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
Experience in working with assignments that involve moderately complex to complex issues using statistical modeling, time-series analysis, and advanced analytics to transform high volumes of complex data into advanced analytic solutions
Experience in working with both structured and unstructured data to create reports, projections, models, and presentations to support business strategy and tactics
Ability to make decisions on moderately complex to complex issues regarding technical approach for project components
Demonstrated problem solving, strategic and analytic thinking capabilities
Experience in working with cross-functional teams, organizing and managing multiple priorities and/or projects
Must be passionate about contributing to an organization focused on continuously improving consumer experiences

Preferred Qualifications

Master's Degree or PhD
Knowledge of healthcare claims, clinical programs and interventions, health outcomes, population health

Additional Information

This position can be located in Boston, Louisville or Work from home (remote)

Scheduled Weekly Hours

40",3.8,"Humana
3.8","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1961,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
81,Application Scientist -- Formulas,$50k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"Role Summary:

As an Application Scientist, you will be responsible for developing and validating new product testing procedures and processes for the Cleaning Formulas Division, refining or modifying existing testing and understanding and establishing industry standards to support new formula development and performance. This team member will also provide technical support to increase the sales of the existing and new product lines through delivering current and compelling technical information to increase the relevancy of these products in the market place.

Essential Responsibilities:
Serve as an application expert working collaboratively to drive the product line development strategy, based on market needs and technical capabilities
Planning and generation of applications data and protocols to support current products and new product development including analysis of competitive products
Design and execute experiments aimed at developing applications for specific end user needs
Coordinate chemical and physical property studies at external labs to generate data needed for global products and registrations
Engage in continuous learning and skill development, including both scientific and laboratory technology education
Serves as a resource and develop technical information for product development on product concepts, labeling claims and other work streams that will ensure a successful launch of the product
Prepare technical reports and other promotional materials to highlight the benefits of cleaning formulas and functional chemicals
Interface with other departments such as Engineering, Manufacturing, Supply Chain, Sales, Marketing and Sourcing
Communicate effectively within a multi-functional team and build strong partnerships both internally and externally
Guide and mentor junior team member's activities as assigned
Qualifications/Requirements:
2-5 years' of professional experience (or advanced degree)
Preferred area of study: Chemistry
Related industry experience preferably in Formulations / Cleaning Industry
Experience with product development from bench to commercialization
Exceptional in independent analytical assessment, problem solving and decision making
Experience with procedures, concepts and principles within product development, formulations, cleaning chemistry, and design of experiments
Good business judgment and ability to align scientific goals with business objectives
Must be adaptable with ability and willingness to independently manage multiple priorities and business demands that continuously shift in a dynamic, fast-paced environment.
Must be hands on with continuous drive for development, improvement and success, in both the product category and personal growth
Strong interpersonal skills with relationship building acumen. Able to work effectively in a highly cross-functional team and with internal and external resources
Strong written and verbal communication skills including effective presentation skills, one-on-one communication, and report writing
Ability and willingness to travel domestically and internationally
Disclaimer

The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work performed by employees assigned to this position. This document is subject to change at any time and is not intended to be exhaustive of all duties, responsibilities, and skills required by employees with this position title. The physical requirements described on the supplemental Occupational Worksheet are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of the job. Reasonable accommodations may be made upon request.

#LI-CC1

Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",3.3,"TTI Floor Care North America Inc.
3.3","Charlotte, NC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
82,Research Scientist/Senior Research Scientist - Surgery and Efficacy Study Directors,$107k-$224k (Glassdoor Est.),"For 70 years, Charles River employees have worked together to assist in the discovery, development and safe manufacture of new drug therapies. When you join our family, you will have a significant impact on the health and well-being of people across the globe. Whether your background is in life sciences, finance, IT, sales or another area, your skills will play an important role in the work we perform. In return, we’ll help you build a career that you can feel passionate about.

Job Summary

We are looking for an expereinced Research Scientist 1/Senior Research Scientist in our Study Directors - Drug Safety Evaluation department on the Surgery and Efficacy team located at our site in Mattawan, MI.

A Research Scientist 1 – Surgery and Efficacy serving as a study director (SD) is responsible for overseeing study conduct of preclinical efficacy and/or toxicology studies within the Surgery and Efficacy product line assigned by test facility management (TFM) within safety assessment; overseeing protocols/study plans; coordinating with technical teams for execution of studies, including establishing study schedules, verifying that standard operating procedures (SOPs) are available and adhered to, overseeing data recording and reporting, and verifying that regulatory requirements/expectations are met. The individual in this role interprets preclinical toxicity studies, evaluates and prepares reports from the data collected during these studies, communicates with sponsor representatives, and initiates contact with potential clients. May be involved with development of new technologies/procedures.

A Senior Research Scientist – Surgery and Efficacy serving as a study director (SD) is additionally an established key scientist in at least one area of expertise, evaluates and prepares reports from the data collected during these studies, communicates with sponsor representatives, and initiates contact with potential clients. Required to manage departmental and procedural projects contributing to company growth (scientific and capabilities).

The following are minimum requirements related to the Research Scientist 1 position:

· Bachelor’s degree or equivalent in Toxicology or a related discipline; Master’s/PhD/PharmD/DVM/MD degree or equivalent preferred; with 2 or more years of related industry experience.

· Expereince working with cardiovascular and/or renal surgical models is preferred.

· An equivalent combination of education and experience may be accepted as a satisfactory substitute for the specific education and experience listed above.

· Success in this role requires familiarity with: study/project costs and impact of changes, local regulations and GLPs as they relate to primary area of focus, study process from proposal to report, quality assurance (QA)/quality control (QC) processes, IACUC process, the SD role in animal welfare, effective communication with veterinary staff and internal/external clients in a manner that generates confidence and builds trust, and communication with technical supervisor and Scientific Manager on issues of staffing and equipment.

· Strong communications skills, verbally and in writing at all levels inside and outside the organization.

· Basic familiarity with Microsoft Office Suite.

· Computer skills, commensurate with Essential Functions, including the ability to learn a validated system.

· Ability to work extended hours beyond normal work schedule to include, but not limited to

evenings, weekends, extended shifts, and/or extra shifts; sometimes on short notice.

· Ability to work under specific time constraints.

About Safety Assessment
Charles River is committed to helping our partners expedite their preclinical drug development with exceptional safety assessment services, state-of-the-art facilities and expert regulatory guidance. From individual specialty toxicology and IND enabling studies to tailored packages and total laboratory support, our deeply experienced team can design and execute programs that anticipate challenges and avoid roadblocks for a smooth, efficient journey to market. Each year approximately 300 investigational new drug (IND) programs are conducted in our Safety Assessment facilities.",3.3,"Charles River Laboratories
3.3","Mattawan, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,1947,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
83,SCIENTIST - ANTIBODY DISCOVERY,-1,"*JOB DESCRIPTION* Immunomic Therapeutics is continuing to build the Antibody Discovery team is looking for highly motivated Scientist with experience in antibody discovery and development. The scientist will apply cutting-edge cell biology and bioassay technologies for the development of relevant antibody selection and screening assays and will be involved in all aspects of the implementation including assay design, assay development and optimization, antibody screening, data analysis, and mechanism of action studies for the development of novel biologicals *ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS* * Hybridoma production, antigen preparation, mouse immunization, hybridoma fusions and sub-cloning, maintenance and storage, antibody screening and lead identification. * Developing and conducting screening assays, such as ELISA and cytometry-based assays * Establishing and validating antibody-based functional assays and characterization processes * Ability to independently design experiments, make detailed observations, analyze data, interpret results and deliver timely results. * Excellent presentation and oral and written communication skills. * Proven ability to prepare precise technical summaries and protocols and maintenance of appropriate documentation. * Ability to prioritize and work in a fast-paced and diverse environment. * Strong sense of urgency, initiative, ethics/integrity and innovation is required. * Demonstrated scientific publication work. *ORGANIZATIONAL RELATIONSHIPS* * This position will require interface at all levels throughout R&D and infrequently throughout the rest of the organization. *QUALIFICATIONS: (minimum education level and years of job related knowledge and skills required to meet the expectations of the position): * * Expert understanding of antibody discovery process * Expert in developing end-to-end solutions for novel antibody discovery platform technologies * Ph.D. in appropriate discipline preferred (e.g., molecular biology, biochemistry, immunology) 5+ years Antibody Development experience. * Master’s Degree with 8+ years of Antibody Development experience in appropriate discipline (e.g., molecular biology, biochemistry, immunology) *TECHNICAL/BEHAVIORAL SKILLS/COMPETENCIES* * Customer Focus * Communication/Presentation Skills (spoken, written) * Integrity/Ethics * Initiative * Sense of Urgency * Teamwork * Collaboration Skills * Innovation *PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS* * Requires both office and laboratory work * Able to lift a minimum of 20 lbs. * Exposure to chemicals used in a laboratory environment with proper Personal Protective Equipment *WORK ENVIRONMENT* * This position operates in a professional laboratory and office work environment * This role requires hands-on laboratory work employing aseptic technique, standard molecular and microbial process with limited exposure to inorganic and organic compounds * This role routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopiers, filing cabinets and fax machines. *OTHER* * This is a full-time position. Days and hours of work are Monday through Friday, 8:30 a.m. to 5 p.m. Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice. Please visit our careers site at *http://www.immunomix.com/careers/*. Send your cover letter and credentials as described on the Careers page along with the *Job Code: 2020 RD003* in the subject line. Equal Opportunity Employer Job Type: Full-time Benefits: * 401(k) * 401(k) Matching * Dental Insurance * Disability Insurance * Employee Assistance Program * Flexible Schedule * Flexible Spending Account * Health Insurance * Life Insurance * Paid Time Off * Referral Program * Vision Insurance Schedule: * Monday to Friday Company's website: * www.immunomix.com Work Remotely: * No",3.9,"IMMUNOMIC THERAPEUTICS, INC.
3.9","Rockville, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
84,"Director, Data Services Analytics",-1,"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us as a Director, Data Services Analytics in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

POSITION OBJECTIVES:

The director of data services analytics will be responsible for the adoption and utilization of technologies, models and methods for science driven analytics of data services and architectures across R&D. Responsibilities will include:

Shape and assess data architectures and services through data analytics for cell therapies and other current and emerging therapeutic areas across Takeda R&D from multiple dimensions including pre-clinical and discovery data, operational and clinical trial data, clinical production data, real world data, scientific data, and related.
Lead the implementation and operational analytics of data services including performance, usage, governance, and management processes that reveal opportunities, insights, and approaches for data usage.
Drive the definition, design, implementation and validation of cutting-edge algorithms to analyze diverse sources of data to achieve actionable design, planning, and improvement of data services by leveraging new data architectures, complex statistical and predictive modeling concepts, machine-learning approaches, clustering and classification techniques.
Prioritize and oversee a portfolio of projects ensuring alignment of activities and standards.
Measure, monitor, and collaborate with users, partners, and stakeholders on the use and socialization of techniques and new technologies throughout organization.

POSITION ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Oversee the ingestion and classification of diverse data sources, such as performance data, usage, adoption, health and status, and scientific data more broadly for cell therapies and other R&D areas.
Deliver on data-driven projects through organization of team efforts and hands-on approach.
Actively listen, integrate input from diverse sources, and collaboratively translate engineering, scientific, or business questions into data and analysis requirements
Partner with experts to verify and drive model capabilities and translate modeling outputs into functional descriptions and business language.
Partners with IT resources to enable and measure data flow, performance, reliability, development using appropriate tools/technology and rapid prototyping that informs the design of analytical products.
Coach, develop and mentor others on data services analytics, tools and methodologies.
Build external alliances to gain and share new insights from architecture analysis, technical information, and trends both internal and external.

EDUCATION, BEHAVIORAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

Advanced degree or equivalent experience in computer science, mathematics, or a data-related field with a substantial software architecture, design, and scientific rigor emphasis.
Experience working in industrial-scale projects with experience in pharmaceutical / biotechnology / healthcare / health IT industry a desirable.
Demonstrated experience in exploring alternate approaches and novel solutions
Strong management and organizational skills.
Ability to effectively interact with and influence all levels of management.
Seasoned computer scientist or data scientist with experience in large-scale healthcare data analysis and industry models/standards.
Expertise in advanced data architectures and deep knowledge of a wide range of analytic approaches, computing models, and data structures.
Advanced hands-on knowledge of advanced database technologies, graph structures, modern software languages, full stack development, analytic environments, and devops tools.
Experience analyzing data from traditional healthcare databases or similar structured and unstructured datasets.
Experience with big data methodologies and cloud environments.

TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS:

Willingness to travel to various meetings, corporate partners, additional Takeda sites.
Requires approximately 10% travel.

WHAT TAKEDA CAN OFFER YOU:

401(k) with company match and Annual Retirement Contribution Plan
Tuition reimbursement Company match of charitable contributions
Health & Wellness programs including onsite flu shots and health screenings
Generous time off for vacation and the option to purchase additional vacation days
Community Outreach Programs

Empowering Our People to Shine

Discover more at takedajobs.com

No Phone Calls or Recruiters Please.

#LI-SGM

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.2,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.2","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
85,Data Engineer,-1,"The Role:

As the Data Engineer, you will be part of making insights accessible and timely by working closely with our data modelers to populate our data warehouse. In your daily work, you'll be responsible for working with another data engineer in optimizing data sourcing and transformation that create an efficient, effective data organization. You will focus on executing the data warehouse strategy to ensure resiliency, fault tolerance, and scalability, while also establishing best practices. You will also take a hands-on approach to collaborating with analysts and business intelligence to optimize the sourcing and consistency of KPIs, which will ultimately drive informed business decisions across the organization.

Why You'll Love This Role:

This is a rare opportunity to make an impact on how Newsela thinks about data during a critical time in the company's evolution. You will work closely with the Manager of Data Warehouse and other key stakeholders to optimize the most critical enterprise-wide KPIs that drive business growth and engagement. Using cutting-edge cloud technology, your work will combine deep analytics with analysis of user behavior, and will serve as the backbone of business intelligence and decision-making for Sales, Marketing, Product, and Customer Success. These insights will also be leveraged for C-level and Board reporting across Newsela. You will be joining a growing team of Data experts, and will help build the foundation for a product that's helping transform K-12 education.

Why We'll Love You:

You have 4+ years of demonstrated success in sourcing, transforming, and optimizing data from divergent sources. No management experience necessary but a passion for mentoring and learning leadership qualities is desirable. You are an expert in creating an ETL/ELT foundation leveraging best practices for continuous improvement, in addition to possessing expert SQL, DDL, and DML knowledge. You are highly skilled in scheduling, dependency management, and optimization. You are highly advanced with Python or other scripting languages in order to help data analysts and data scientists, among other partners, optimize data models. You will have an acute understanding of data warehouse modeling techniques and some experience using cloud-based data warehouse technologies. Through your work in data engineering, you have expanded and improved either the data warehouse set, utilization, and/or business performance. You do all this, while also contributing to an engaging data team culture

About Newsela:

One of the fastest growing tech companies in K-12 education, Newsela was founded on the principle that while every child learns differently, they all deserve a rich learning experience that ignites a love of learning. We built our platform based on learning science research to deliver the most engaging, authentic content to modernize how teaching happens in the classroom. Along with interactive assessments and tools, we provide teachers with digital content at five reading levels -- from +100 of the best sources -- that is relevant to the diverse backgrounds and interests of their students. Since we started in 2013, we've established a presence in 90% of U.S. K-12 schools and over 2.5M teachers and 37M students have registered with Newsela.",4.0,"Newsela
4.0",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
86,Senior Data Engineer,-1,"About Narrativ

Narrativ is a technology platform for brands to unlock, manage, and grow their share of product reviews on the open web.

Why is this important? We've seen a decade's worth of e-commerce growth in 2020, and the emergence of a smarter consumer who demands a better way to buy than ads. They're turning to expert product reviews on trusted sources ranging from The New York Times to their favorite YouTuber. But only Amazon is reaping the benefits today, commanding a $40B monopoly on product reviews online.

Narrativ's patented technology empowers everyone to win. We build the tech and tools to turn honest reviews that tell the whole story about a product into a multibillion dollar acquisition channel for all brands. Teams at Sephora, Best Buy, L'Oreal and hundreds of others already partner with Narrativ to yield more efficient results than Facebook and Google.

Our work breaking Amazon's monopoly and fixing broken and out-of-stock links on the Internet has gotten us recognized by The World Economic Forum as a Technology Pioneer and by Fast Company as one of the best places to work for innovators.

Why you should work here:
We're growing, fast: Narrativ's platform hosts 50+ partners spending $20mm+ a year including Best Buy, L'Oreal, Sephora, Bed Bath & Beyond, Home Depot, Nordstrom, and Samsung. We've doubled revenue so far in 2020.
We have a talented team: We're a team of 50+ from places like Amazon, Facebook, Google, and Etsy with a female founder that's been awarded by the Financial Times, Forbes, and Inc. We're hiring quickly, with plans to double our team in the next year.
We're challenging the status quo: Breaking monopolies and diversifying industries is in our DNA. Come join us on our mission to democratize product recommendations for all and build a better internet for shoppers.
Come join us on our mission to build a better Internet for shoppers!

The Job:
A data engineer at Narrativ will build and scale a first-class data platform. You understand the history of batch and streaming big data systems, know when awk outperforms Hadoop map-reduce, and have spent a lot of time thinking about the best ways to handle schema drift. You care deeply about making scalable systems from simple, reliable, and correct building blocks. You can explain the advantages and disadvantages of a wide range of data structures depending on the desired use case. You can articulate when a general solution is good enough, and when a specialized solution is necessary.

You are Narrativ's Data Engineer

Mission
Build and maintain batch and streaming data systems
Enable scalability and observability for batch and realtime data streams
Collaborate and build tools so all engineers can easily ""do the right thing"" with regard to scalable batch and streaming data requirements.
Key Results
Merchant product feed can ingest datasets of 10M+
Create performant and straightforward patterns for OLTP, OLAP, streaming ingest and enrichment, creating search indexes, etc
Requirements
5+ years of experience with big data systems such as Hadoop, Spark, Flink, Kafka, Storm, Heron, NiFi, Hive, etc
Understanding of different serialization and storage formats like Avro, Parquet, Thrift, Protocol Buffers, FlatBuffers, JSON, CSV, XML
Working knowledge of relational databases (PostgreSQL, MySQL), non-relational (Redis, Cassandra/Scylla), and warehouses (Snowflake, Redshift, BigQuery
Experience with streaming data technologies and patterns
Experience with orchestration frameworks like Airflow, Oozie
Expertise in a general purpose programming language
Strong experience in SQL

Bonus
Expertise in Scala, Java, or Kotlin
Experience in Elixir
Working knowledge of probabilistic data structures and algorithms like count-min sketch, hyperloglog, bloom filters, reservoir sampling, etc
Important Notice: We are putting the health and safety of our employees first. For the balance of 2020, we'll be working from home. WIth so much uncertainty in the world, this is a decision that helped eliminate the anxiety associated with commuting and gave our teammates one less thing to worry about.

Narrativ is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, or veteran status.",3.6,"Narrativ
3.6","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
87,AWS Data Engineer,-1,"AWS Data Engineer Northern, VA

AWS Data Engineer


Minimum Requirements
Active SECRET clearance preferred; Clearable US Citizen with NAIC (National background check) may also apply
5 years Data Engineering experience AND a BA Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Math, Sciences, or equivalent; 4 years of additional relevant experience may be substituted for education.
Working knowledge of agile software development, DevSecOps, and AWS native solutions including API Gateway, S3, and Lambda is required.
Preferred Experience
Knowledge of several of the following areas is desirable: DevSecOps, Active Server Pages, JavaScript, Python, HTML, and AWS native applications including S3, WAF, API Gateway, Lambda, CloudFront, DynamoDB, Transcribe, Athena, Simple Queue Service, QuikSight, CloudWatch, CloudTrail, KMS, and Cognito.
Job Duties
Provide development support to the Scrum Master in an agile software development environment in AWS.
Works as a key member of an AWS native solution software development team and works to identify risks and bottlenecks associated with big data environments.
About NuWave Solutions

NuWave Solutions is a recognized leader in providing anticipatory intelligence and advanced data analytics to the defense, intelligence, and private sectors for over 20 years. Leveraging artificial intelligence and machine learning methodologies, NuWave Solutions streamlines the Data-to-Decision lifecycle faster than traditional practices allowing clients to take action with confidence.

For more information on how NuWave Solutions supports its clients and builds upon success, please visit https://www.nuwavesolutions.com

Position Details
Location – Arlington, Virginia
Travel Required – N/A
If travel is required, how much? 0%
Work Schedule (Shift etc.): Day Shift
Authorization to work in US required
8570 Requirements: N/A
NuWave Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled
Tagged as: AWS Data Engineer",4.5,"NuWave Solutions
4.5",Virginia,-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
88,Data Analyst,-1,"Veteran Owned Firm Seeking a Senior Data Analyst for Role in Washington, DC

My name is Stephen Hrutka and I am the owner of a Veteran Owned firm in Washington, DC focused on Supply Chain, Strategic Sourcing, and Technical/Cleared Recruiting.

HRUCKUS helps other Veteran Owned businesses recruit for positions across the VA, SBA, HHS, DARPA, and other cutting-edge R&D related defense agencies.

One of my Veteran-owned clients is looking for a Senior Data Analyst to support a Federal Client in Washington, DC. The ideal candidate has Veterans Affairs experience and experience within the financial management office.

If this role is not a fit for you but you may know someone, I am glad to offer a referral bonus for any successful placements.

Thanks,

Stephen M Hrutka
Principal Consultant
HRUCKUS LLC

Executive Summary: HRUCKUS is seeking a Senior Data Analyst with 8 years of experience to support a Federal Client in Washington, DC.

Overall Job Description: This position will provide support services to a Federal Client in their initiative to provide fraud prevention services for the Veterans Benefits Administration in addressing its improper payment and fraud prevention/investigation needs.

Position Responsibilities:
Performs tasks which may include obtaining data through advanced computerized models
Extrapolating data patterns through advanced algorithms
Developing simple graphs and charts to explain how the mathematical information will influence the specific project or business
Presenting to managers how to best alter their business models to generate profitable future trends
Education Requirement: BA/BS degree",5.0,"HRUCKUS
5.0","Washington, DC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
89,Clinical Laboratory Scientist,-1,"Education: *
Bachelor’s degree (BA/BS) in Medical Technology or a biological science required.
Clinical Laboratory Scientist license required (Generalist or Molecular)
Experience Required: *
Minimum 1-2 year’s experience in a clinical molecular laboratory, genetics experience preferred.
Experience with molecular techniques, DNA and RNA based procedures, such as real-time PCR, Genotyping, Sanger and/or Next Generation Sequencing.
Extremely detail-oriented and highly organized.
Proficient using Microsoft Excel, Laboratory Information Systems, other database related software.
Motivated and energetic with extensive laboratory knowledge and experience.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills essential for interaction with laboratory staff and management.
Strong interpersonal skill and ability to work well in a team environment as well as independently.
Prioritize tasks by understanding the relative importance and urgency of each task.
Function at a high level and accomplish tasks that require departmental effort to meet demanding timelines and workloads. Adapt to changing priorities.
Exceptional customer service and listening skills.
Summary: *
The Clinical Laboratory Scientist will perform DNA/RNA isolation, genotyping and sequencing of isolated DNA, data analysis, reagent preparation, instrument calibration, laboratory maintenance and any other necessary laboratory processes according to approved standard operating procedures. Supervisory responsibilities to include supervision of non-licensed laboratory staff as required. The Clinical Laboratory Scientist reports to the Laboratory Operations Manger/Director.
Job Duties/Qualifications: *
Knowledgeable in the handling of patient specimens from accession to storage.
Assist supervisor with day to day administration of PCR Laboratory.
Read and follow technical procedures for the Standard Operating Procedure Manual.
DNA and RNA extraction
Knowledge of nucleic acid technology. Understanding of quality control / quality improvement programs.
Complete PCR testing and PCR product analysis including sequencing, hybridization or fragment analysis
Assist in the administration of all Quality Control Programs.
Assist in the inventory management and ordering
Sample data collecting or accession if necessary
Adherence to workload requirements.
Maintenance of accurate work records (i.e., Maintenance Logs, Temperature Logs, etc.)
Associates or Bachelor’s Degree in science or related field plus one year clinical biological lab experience
Perform complex data analysis of molecular genetic data, including genotyping and DNA sequencing data according to laboratory SOPs
Maintain records of data analysis and monitor results generation using spreadsheets and laboratory information systems.
Track specimen workflow and manage communication of specimen status in the laboratory.
Maintain equipment and quality records.
Reagent preparation and inventory tracking.
Perform specimen processing and laboratory procedures specific to molecular genetic testing technique.
Monitor Quality Assurance and Quality Improvement metrics to improve overall efficiency of laboratory production.
Write, review, and revise Standard Operating Procedures, and associated documents.
Adhere to laboratory policies, safety, and standard operating procedures.
Provide training to personnel as required for proper execution of standard operating procedures.
Function as a data analyst for data analysis of batch and sample genotyping results across different platforms, e.g. Sanger, sequencing, del/dup assays.
Function as a data analyst for releasing sample results.
Other duties as assigned.
Job Type: Full-time

Medical Specialty:
Genetics & Genomics
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://omecare.co/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,OmeCare,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
90,Scientist - Bioengineering and Assay Development,-1,"ArsenalBio’s mission is to develop efficacious and safe cellular therapies for patients with chronic diseases, initially cancer. Our products are being designed to herald the transition of adoptive cell therapy from a hospital based treatment to outpatient therapy, like most other cancer treatments. Our people are our greatest asset, they bring scientific talents in molecular biology, immunology, pharmacology, protein chemistry, computational biology, automation, genome engineering, software and other fields to make the future happen now.


We are seeking an outstanding Assay Development Scientist to join the Technology Development team. The successful candidate is expected to work effectively in cross-functional teams to drive the implementation of advanced immunological assays that are robust and scalable.
What You Will Do
Work with the Discovery and Technology Development teams to define, build, and scale-up advanced immunological assays such as cell killing, cytokine release, cell migration, cell persistence, and transcriptional profiling
Drive the design and implementation of scalable platforms for both 2D and 3D tumor modeling for use within the context of immuno-oncology
Support adoption of lab automation by the Discovery and Development teams
Perform other related duties as assigned and based on company needs
What You Will Bring
REQUIRED
Ph.D. in immunology, cell biology, molecular biology, bioengineering, or a related discipline with 3+ years developing novel assays and assay platforms
Proven ability to perform high-quality experiments using automation
Experience with culturing of mammalian cells in 3D contexts
Experience with at least one of: ELISA or other protein quantitation methods; multidimensional flow cytometry; advanced imaging; or genetically encoded readouts
Working knowledge of experimental design (DOE methodology), bench execution, process optimization, and statistical analysis of biological assays
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, with the ability to work independently and in a multi-team environment, along with a can-do attitude to solve challenging problems in a fast-paced work environment

PREFERRED
Experience in drug screening, oncology, immunology, developmental biology, or similar applied fields
Strong understanding of complexities of the tumor microenvironment
Strong working knowledge of cellular screening technologies, assay development, molecular biology, high content imaging applications (especially confocal imaging), genomics, and NGS
Experience with single-cell technologies
Experience with large-scale data analytics: R or python, AWS, image processing

Plus
Experience in technology transfer, including process documentation, user training, performing IQ/OQ/PQ
Experience working with laboratory information management system and electronic lab notebook
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status

To all recruitment agencies: ArsenalBio does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, or Arsenalbio employees. ArsenalBio is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",5.0,"Arsenal Biosciences
5.0","South San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
91,Big Data Engineer,$108k-$186k (Glassdoor Est.),"ABOUT US
At Revel, we unlock human creative potential so that we can embrace the world’s most thrilling opportunities and conquer the world’s most compelling challenges. We partner with our clients to create substantial value through strategic execution by cultivating an innovative approach that attracts, develops and inspires people to achieve more, together. With empathy as our guiding principle, we are committed to creating powerful human experiences in the digital era and we want you to join us.
THE CHALLENGE
Revel Technology unlocks the latent potential of data to provide the actionable insights needed to make better decisions.
With equal parts expertise, intuition, and creativity, we help clients acquire the right data, find the right signal, and set a long-term course toward an enlightened, mature technology capability.
As a Big Data Engineer Senior Associate in the Technology Community, you will work across industries in a fast-paced, team environment developing data pipelines and data engineering solutions to power the diagnostic and descriptive analytics needed to solve our client’s most difficult problems, as well as work with Revel Data Scientists to feed their machine learning model and unlock predictive and prescriptive analytics. To our clients, you will play the role of trusted advisor, working to transform data into business insights, and describing complex ideas concisely and accurately.
A DAY IN THE LIFE
AS A TEAM, WE:
Pursue business opportunities within Revel’s core offerings
Collaborate with clients and cross-functional teams to align business needs with solutions
Seek opportunities and relationships that leverage our problem-solving capabilities
AS A BI & ANALYTICS SENIOR ASSOCIATE AT REVEL, YOU:
Lean in with current clients; creating (y)our next big opportunity
Continuously strive to convert top clients into advocates
Contribute value through idea flow – collaboration / co-creation & QA activities across projects and accounts
AS A BIG DATA ENGINEER SENIOR ASSOCIATE FOR THE TECHNOLOGY COMMUNITY, YOU:
Deliver digital marketing, commerce, and experience solutions leveraging both proven and emerging technologies, such as Spark, sqoop, Kafka, Databricks, and Azure Data Factory
Communicate effectively with both technical and nontechnical stakeholders
Serve as a subject matter expert in Big Data & Data Engineering – conduct and support white-boarding sessions, workshops, design sessions, and project meetings as needed, playing a key role in client relations
Create thought leadership on latest Big Data & Data Engineering technologies and applications
WORKING TOGETHER, WE WILL:
Opt in – strive to empower and activate, not command and control
See what can be – elevate creativity and uniqueness over scale and repeatability
Lead with empathy, trust, respect, vulnerability and flexibility
Be present – be the change instead of waiting for the change
Say yes, and… provide space to grow and stoke latent potential
Love what we do – treat everyone uniquely the same and support each on our journeys
SET YOURSELF APART:
Understanding of and experience with driving and applying human-centered design processes, working collaboratively with customers and cross-functional teams
Experience in Service and Digital Product Creation
Curiosity about technology and its impact on design solutions
Excellent leadership skills, problem-resolution abilities, and good judgment
Entrepreneurial spirit
WHAT YOU NEED TO SUCCEED
Advanced knowledge of Big Data & Data Engineering, with deep, hands-on technical experience in tools, libraries, and frameworks such as Numba, Numpy, and Pandas in Python, Spark, Snowflake, HBASE, Hadoop, Azure Data Factory, Databricks, AWS Data Pipeline Service, Kafka, sqoop, and/or Flume
Advanced knowledge of relational, dimensional, and tabular data modeling principles and practices
Working knowledge of SQL for the use of data extraction, cleansing, and analysis
Previous experience in consulting a strong plus
Highly refined communication skills, with the ability to speak both to technical engineers and executive stakeholders
Able to work regular business hours (8am - 5pm)",3.7,"Revel Consulting
3.7","Seattle, WA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
92,Senior EO/IR Signal Processing/ Discrimination Modeling Engineer,-1,"*Senior EO/IR Signal Processing/ Discrimination Modeling Engineer – *

*# 0200904-033*

*Security Clearance: * *Active DoD SECRET clearance required*

*Job Description & Position Responsibilities: *

Support a focused development team to build an initial Ground-based Midcourse Defense government owned reference concept interceptor 6DOF simulation. The team will follow an Agile DevSecOps process with engineering releases scheduled periodically using a phased capability approach. This position would focus on the interceptor endgame EO/IR signal processing and discrimination algorithm development. The team will start with an existing government owned interceptor simulation and improve/enhance.

*Basic Qualifications: *

· Bachelor’s degree in computer science, engineering, physics or mathematics

· 10+ years of experience

· General 6DOF interceptor aerospace modeling experience for both kill vehicle and booster

· EO/IR interceptor endgame signal processing and discrimination algorithm development experience

· Missile defense / hit-to-kill interceptor program experience

· C/C++ or FORTRAN programming language

*Preferred Qualifications: *

· EO/IR interceptor seeker modeling experience

· Interceptor GN&C modeling experience

· Agile development process experience

· Risk Management Framework (RMF) and software cyber security controls experience

· Software configuration management or automated testing experience

*Travel Requirement: *

· Position location: Huntsville, AL. There are no travel requirements for this position.

*Keyword Search: *

6DOF, interceptor, kill vehicle, KV, modeling, GMD, GN&C, guidance, navigation, controls, algorithm, development, DevSecOps, discrimination, signal processing

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* 401(k) matching
* Dental insurance
* Disability insurance
* Flexible spending account
* Health insurance
* Life insurance
* Paid time off
* Referral program
* Retirement plan
* Tuition reimbursement
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* 8 hour shift
* Monday to Friday

Experience:
* EO/IR interceptor endgame signal processing: 5 years (Required)
* C/C++ or FORTRAN programming: 5 years (Required)
* related: 10 years (Required)

Education:
* Bachelor's (Required)

Work authorization:
* United States (Required)

Security Clearance Required:
* Secret (Required)",4.5,"Penta Research, Inc.
4.5","Huntsville, AL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Government,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
93,"Scientist, Pharmacometrics",-1,"Janssen Research & Development, L.L.C., a division of Johnson & Johnson's Family of Companies, is recruiting for a Scientist - Pharmacometrics, located in Raritan, New Jersey.

At the Janssen Pharmaceutical Companies of Johnson & Johnson, we are working to create a world without disease. Transforming lives by finding new and better ways to prevent, intercept, treat and cure disease inspires us. We bring together the best minds and pursue the most promising science.

We are Janssen. We collaborate with the world for the health of everyone in it. Learn more at www.janssen.com and follow us @JanssenGlobal. Janssen Research & Development, LLC is part of the Janssen Pharmaceutical Companies.

The position is responsible for the co-development and execution of Pharmacometrics (pharmacokinetic [PK] and pharmacodynamic [PD]) Modeling and Simulation activities related to the research, design, implementation, data analysis, interpretation, reporting, and publication of ClinPharm-sponsored and -supported studies for products in any phase of development. Additional responsibilities include the generation and review of clinical pharmacology documents related to regulatory submissions, preparing responses to Agency questions and preparing for and/or attending meetings with Regulatory Agencies and Advisory Committee Meetings.

Key Responsibilities:
Participates in review and or development of the Case Report Form, Completion Guidelines, Patient Diary, Laboratory Requisition Form to ensure accuracy of information related to clinical pharmacological sampling (blood, plasma, urine, etc.) during study conduct
Program and generate population PK / PKPD ready datasets in an SPLUS, R or SAS software environment in close collaboration with the Pharmacometrics Scientist or Pharmacometrics Leader to perform the population-PK / PKPD modelling. This work includes consistency checks to ensure delivery of high-quality ClinPharm data within a specified time frame.
Coordinate the construction of appropriate database specifications / database structures in order to efficiently outsource the dataset preparation to an external partner if needed.
Help out Pharmacometrics Scientists and Pharmacometrics Leaders in the generation of tables and graphs for Summary Overviews, Study Summary Results, Clinical Study Reports, internal and external departmental data communications and submission-related documents
Performs Pharmacometrics QC checks when applicable
Involved in process development such as PK data flow working groups
In collaboration with Pharmacometrics Scientist or Pharmacometrics Leaders, apply state-of-the-art tools for PK and PK/PD model building or, when appropriate, contribute to specialized analyses, such as allometric scaling, IVIVC, PB/PK modelling (Senior Associate Pharmacometrics Scientist)

Qualifications

Ph.D. Degree OR PharmD Degree is required, OR a M.S. Degree with at least 6 years of relevant experience in the areas of clinical pharmacology, modeling/simulation, statistics, engineering OR other related areas.
Applied working knowledge of non-linear mixed effect modeling is required
Hands-on knowledge of PK & PD Nonlinear Mixed effect modeling software packages is required
A fundamental understanding of clinical PK & PK/PD population PK modeling concepts is required
A fundamental understanding of clinical drug development is preferred
A fundamental understanding of ICH and other relevant regulatory guidelines and regulations is preferred
Excellent communication skills are required
This position is located in Raritan, NJ, and may required up to 10% travel.

Johnson & Johnson is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.

IND7

Primary Location
United States-New Jersey-Raritan-
Organization
Janssen Research & Development, LLC (6084)
Job Function
R&D
Requisition ID
1158200824",2.9,"Johnson & Johnson Family of Companies
2.9","Raritan, NJ",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
94,Data Analyst,-1,"Please do not apply through Glassdoor.
The only way you will be considered is if you follow the link at the bottom of the page and take a very short quiz.
What are we looking for?
We are looking for an Analyst seeking to work with our clients to shape business and data strategy. You are highly analytical and excited about applying a quantitative framework to business problems through performing complex analysis, data mining, predictive modeling, business forecasting, applied statistics, and more. You are comfortable with presenting your approach to Product Manager, Engineers, Marketing, Sales, Finance and working with them to execute a data-driven business process. At Raybeam, we pride ourselves on our pragmatic, engineering approach to making data work for the business.
The ideal candidate will possess:
Build scalable data-driven processes to achieve business outcomes
A vision for ingraining analytics into an organization’s decision making process
Experience in design-and-build innovative data solutions, from discovery to delivery for clients and external stakeholders
Ability to manage a data ecosystem including ETL, data governance, reporting and insights
Ability to take a project from RFP/SOW/BRD to delivery: project management, requirements gathering, data architecture, workflow management, quality assurance, reporting and visualization, presentation
Requirements:
4+ years of applied analytics in sales, finance, marketing, product, engineering; track record of success
4+ years of discovery and assessment of a client’s data portfolio, data tools, and data applications
2+ years of data management and consulting experience
Familiarity with cloud platforms such as AWS, GCP, Azure to use/deploy analytics solutions
Strong working knowledge of SQL. NoSQL is a plus
Proficient in at least one or other language for applied to statistics, data analysis, and machine learning - Python, R, Matlab, SPSS
Strong written communication and presentation
Who are we?
Raybeam, Inc. is a software engineering and consulting company focused on strategic consulting, business intelligence, and online/database marketing for the past fifteen years. We have offices near Boston and San Francisco and support a strong list of clients including Google, Facebook, Microsoft, eBay, Disney, One Kings Lane, Beachbody and Hilton Worldwide.
What do we do?
We provide technology solutions by architecting and developing enterprise systems using a variety of programming languages, tools and platforms. This can range from building data warehouses, to web applications to implementing reporting platforms. We work in small teams, own the projects that we work on, and have direct input into the business decisions of our clients.
If you are interested in applying for the position please click on the link below to take a short quiz.
http://careerseval.raybeam.com/sign_in
Please note that Raybeam, Inc. is currently unable to provide sponsorship and we will only consider local candidates.
COVID-19 considerations:
Due to COVID, all employees are currently working remotely. When it is safe to do so, we will return to the office.",4.7,"Raybeam
4.7","Mountain View, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
95,DATA ENGINEER II,-1,"Description:

About Us

A few years ago, our intrepid team of nurses, doctors, developers, salespeople and data scientists came to a realization: if we can truly put the power of data and technology behind the clinical expertise of nurses and docs, we can transform the future of healthcare. Right now, we’re focused on bridging the silos that afflict the industry with inefficiency, waste, and friction, ultimately refocusing healthcare towards the patient, not the process.

We offer a Software as a Solution (SaaS) platform that connects previously disparate data from within an electronic medical record and transforms it into the type of clinical insight that can help providers determine appropriate care and reimbursement.

Additionally, this platform is used as a conduit to connect the provider to the payer, helping break down the information silos that result in denied claims, administrative burden, and strained relationships.

And to be clear: it’s working! We are expanding to help support our mission, our growth, and our clients. We’re looking for smart, savvy, spirited people like you to join the movement.

About You

Strong Customer Service Ethos

You are proactive in anticipating and resolving problems. You take ownership and initiative for problem resolution, spot potential problem areas, analyze solutions, propose resolution and ensure implementation. You take the term “customer service” to heart.

Strong Communication Skills

Not only do you need to work well with your coworkers, but a major component of your role is communication. Many of the people you assist will not know anywhere near as much as you do about our software nor data engineering processes.

Excellent Organizational Skills

To work efficiently, you will need to organize both your time and your processes properly.

Action Oriented

You must have the ability to maintain a sense of urgency to complete a task and acting decisively to implement solutions and resolve crises.

Building Trust & Personal Accountability

You keep promises and honor commitments, accept responsibility for your own actions, are honest and truthful when communicating information, and assume responsibility for dealing with problems, crises, or issues when they arise.

Critical & Analytical Thinking

You maintain an objective view of situations. You question basic assumptions, apply sound reasoning, understand the complexity of an issue and break it down in to manageable pieces, and understand the implications of data and information.

What You’ll Do

XSOLIS is looking for an exceptional Data Engineer to design scalable, reliable, secure, and extensible data solutions according to our company’s and client’s needs. You will be responsible for developing, testing, improving and maintaining new and existing line of business data platforms, data warehousing, and streaming data solutions to help effectively provide and manage data effectively.

As part of our team, you will work closely with data engineers, software engineers, and quality assurance analysts to ensure system stability, security, and consistency. You will also collaborate with support teams to provide technical support and work with product owners to determine and understand new product requirements. Communication and organizational skills are key to this position along with a problem-solving attitude.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities

The essential functions include, but are not limited to the following:

Build, monitor, and maintain batch and streaming data solutions.
Build, monitor, and maintain RDBMS solutions.
Ensure performance, security, and availability of data solutions.
Architect, Design, develop, and optimize data structures, stored procedures, and functions using T-SQL.
Analyze existing data structures and data solutions to provide suggestions on performance improvements and alternate approaches.
Prepare documentation and specifications.
Effectively collaborate with other team members and stakeholders
. Requirements:

Minimum Qualifications (Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities)

3+ years strong working knowledge and experience with MS SQL Server databases, query authoring (SQL), T-SQL and schema design to optimize performance.

Experience with other RDBMS with platforms such as PostgreSQL, MySQL, Oracle, etc.

Experience ingesting, processing, storing, and querying large datasets.

Experience writing well-abstracted, reusable code components using languages such as python, C#, Go, etc.

Experience with Git and CI/CD tools and paradigms.

Understanding of SDLC and Agile development methodologies.

Strong written and verbal communication skills.

Bachelor’s degree preferred or relevant experience..

Preferred Qualifications (Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities)

Experience with NoSQL/Document Database platforms such as MongoDb, Casandra, Couchbase, DynamoDb, etc.

Experience with stream processing and messaging platforms such as Kafka, Kinesis, SNS/SQS, RabbitMQ, etc.

Cloud experience preferably in AWS or Azure.

Physical Demands & Work Environment

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this position. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the functions.

We’ve Got You Covered On…

Health, Dental and Vision Insurance

Competitive Salary

401(k) with match

Free parking, free coffee, free smiles

A mission-driven, impactful place to work

Where We’ll Go Together

Our company will become the new standard for utilization management. You’ll be a core part of realizing that goal and a valued contributor to the culture and climate we wish to create. Our wins are your wins, and we’re dedicated to making you feel your work matters (it truly does).

If any of this speaks to you, let’s get in touch.

Candidates must successfully pass a background check and drug screen prior to beginning employment with XSOLIS.Xsolis is an equal employment opportunity employer.",4.2,"XSolis
4.2","Nashville, TN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
96,Data Scientist II,$100k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"Grubhub is dedicated to connecting hungry diners with our wide network of restaurants across the country. Our innovative technology, easy-to-use platforms and streamlined delivery capabilities make us an industry leader today, and in the future of online food ordering.
We strive to create a workplace that reflects the diversity of our customers and the communities we serve. When you join our team, you become part of a community that works together to innovate, solve problems, take risks, grow, work hard and have a ton of fun in the process!
Why Work For Us
We have a fast-paced environment and that is what our teams thrive on. Grubhub believes in empowering people and offering opportunities for development, as well as professional growth. We value strong, positive relationships in all areas: with each other, our customers and our greater community. Want to be a part of a team of diverse collaborators in an authentically fun culture? If so, we want to talk to you - and hear what’s your favorite restaurant for food delivery!
Grubhub is looking for an innately curious, business-minded, results-oriented Data Scientist with a focus on predictive modelling, specifically time-series forecasting. In this role, you will build and deploy models predicting the volume of orders needed to be delivered across all of Grubhub’s markets. You will be working with other time series forecasters to help the company improve its delivery experience. Specific responsibilities include, but are not limited to, data analysis, problem solving, development of cutting-edge time-series machine learning models, deployment and maintenance of those models.

Understand the business! Work directly with stakeholders to address their needs.
Build models, from selecting features to optimizing.
Be a stakeholder for our models! Help guide and prioritize development of predictive models to enhance our capabilities.
Question our assumptions! Find new and better ways to do what we’re doing.
Produce novel analysis giving insights into the business
Relentlessly analyze and improve the performance of our business.

MSc or PhD in statistics, mathematics or another quantitative field
2-5+ years of experience in statistical and machine learning modelling
Experience in applying descriptive statistics and visualization to solve real-world problems
Comfort communicating analytical findings to people of diverse backgrounds using statistical libraries and visualization tools in Python
Good programming skills in Python
Data querying capabilities using SQL
Ability to explain technical concepts in simple terms to business stakeholders
Got These? Even Better
Experience in time series forecasting (including classical approaches like ARMA based models, but also modern ones involving deep learning)
Experience deploying models in a production environment
Experience with distributed data and computing tools like Spark, Hive and Presto
Experience using cloud infrastructure like AWS
A knack for analyzing and improving processes using data

Flexible PTO. Grubhub employees are provided a generous amount of time to recharge their batteries.
Health and Wellness. We provide programs that support your overall well-being such as generous medical benefits, employee network groups, company-wide fitness challenges, and a comfortable and casual workplace! We also support our parents by offering 8 weeks of paid parent bonding time, a 4-week returnship program, and 6-8 weeks paid medical leave.
Learning and Career Growth. Your personal and professional development is a priority at Grubhub. From day one, we empower you to lead and be an active participant in your career growth. We provide continuous learning opportunities, training, and coaching and mentorship programs.
MealPerks. Who’s ready for some lunch? We provide our employees with a weekly Grubhub credit to enjoy and support local restaurants. We also offer company-wide meals several times a year to bring our Grubhub family together.
Fun. Every Grubhub office has an employee-led Culture Crew that connects people through fun, meaningful events and initiatives. Some of our popular past events include: Wing-eating contests, Grubtoberfest, 5k Runs, Bring Your Child to Work Day, regular happy hours, and more!
Social Impact. We believe in the importance of serving the communities that support our business. In addition, employees are given paid time off each year to support the causes that are important to them.

Grubhub is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics. The EEO is the Law poster is available here: DOL Poster. If you are applying for a job in the U.S. and need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to TalentAcquisition@grubhub.com and let us know the nature of your request and contact information. Please note that only those inquiries concerning a request for reasonable accommodation will be responded to from this email address.
CA Privacy Notice: If you are a resident of the State of California and would like a copy of our CA privacy notice, please email privacy@grubhub.com.",4.0,"Grubhub
4.0","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
97,Data Service Engagement Lead - DAB,$49k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

For the Takeda global scientific community who aspire to deliver transformative medicines to patients Scientific Informatics is the technology leader, with domain specific expertise, that provides innovative platforms and technologies to improve both operational efficiency and data-driven decision making. As an embedded partner Scientific Informatics is at the leading edge of both science and technology and proactively reacts to the changing scientific environment and needs of researchers in an agile fashion to deliver timely, value-adding solutions.

The Digital Advisory Board programs aim to ensure our growing data is easily accessible to everyone so we can help our patients and HCPs faster and more effectively.

Enterprise Data Backbone

Enterprise Data Backbone - The Enterprise Data Backbone provides the most user-friendly real-time data for all our internal and external stakeholders, accessible through self-service tools.

We will transform the way we gather and use insights by integrating completely new types of data to better support our patient and others in the healthcare system. We will build capabilities to gather real world data outside of clinical trials in ways we have not been able to do so far.

We will make data more easily accessible across Takeda and find a way to share it so that we don’t keep re-inventing the wheel. We will push ourselves to think beyond our normal constructs of clinical trials or today's supply chains.

We will explore a future where we get data from all corners of the world – digital communities, wearable devices, social media, surveys, for a, consumer data combined with hospital, pharmacy and EMR data. We will unlock innovation across the development life cycle supporting accelerated clinical development, reducing clinical trial costs, etc.

OBJECTIVES/PURPOSE

The Head of Service Engagement Management is the backbone the execution of data programs at Takeda and will oversee and develop a service delivery model, on which Takeda can accelerate by aligning the organization to a cost effective and competitive service and solution data strategy. Is a seasoned leader in technical, transformational executions and will advocate and provide the business with answers on technical, operational and functional questions that can be solved using data technologies.

Drive and lead a service delivery strategy on data aligning different approaches for the business aligned to the complexity, scale and re-usability of data combined with an efficient and result driven delivery and implementation.
Shape and design the data frameworks to systematically engage, assess, profile, measure, decide and deliver on the customer needs and priorities.
Shape and lead the design of a data implementation roadmap based on the initial and future data services containing practical and usable framework driven formats; will drive and convince business partners in the value proposition, the approach, the implementation and the efficiencies and effectiveness to be expected.
Proactively aligns with the business, from R&D, PDT, Manufacturing, Commercial and Corporate functions, on potential data product change programs, providing oversight on data impact and highlighting the integrated use of data through a holistic view and drive efficiency in delivering on current work and future pipeline, by harnessing the specialties of data organization to deliver and leading the engagement team to analyze and measure ROI and TCO for the expected service outcomes.
Oversee and monitors data portfolio and program implementations, channel problems in advance and partner with business to solve them and ensuring alignment to customer needs through delivery and customer experience
Lead the development of data implementation skill set and aligned competencies within Takeda to ensure the organization is ready for data implementation programs and projects

ACCOUNTABILITIES

Delivery strategy

Drive and the lead the design of a multi-year data service delivery strategy to drive measurable and repeatable implementations. Determine the investments necessary in terms of people and technology to achieve these objectives.
Lead the design, development and continuously updating of various service data formats to match the business on different levels of complexity and scale and to improve the re-usability towards self-service as an end state.
Determine and lead the development of a broad service and solution vision for Takeda and work with IT business partners to gain alignment.
Design, test and adjust implementations roadmaps for the business to the various needs, lead the use, assessment and optimization of service data formats to accelerate data service implementations and catch momentum to drive a Takeda to a data driven organizations.
Acts as thought leader and content expert for all business functional areas. Presents frequently to senior leadership team on key findings and makes recommendations for business change.
Explore, own and oversee the demand Pipeline for Takeda’s Data Team
Ensures successful delivery and activation by business to achieve planned targets.
Advocate to the business to facilitate answers to technical, operational and functional questions that can be solved using data technologies.
Oversee and align with Business partners to understand their business priorities for the year ahead and partner with them to define the business capabilities and thus the derived data and tech capabilities needed to realize their priorities and thus define the value story.
Lead the partnering with and supporting business partners to shape their ideas to solutions with support from solution management and architecture group of data team. Extend the support to help the business partners to blueprint and roadmap the solution with ROI estimates and get approvals from review boards to get projects started.
Lead the identification of opportunities and partnering with business executives to set priority, manage expectations around delivery, manage change needed to activate insights, and measure impact.
Build and manage strong relations with internal executives and business partners to identify value streams that ladder to analytic vision.
Participates in the capital and expense plan for all areas of Data Team; Forecasts return on capital projects,
Ensure the successful adoption of data products into business through Data team delivery system.
Within Engagement group, define and champion team culture to motivate teams to deliver highly accurate, high value work.
Lead the recruitment, retain, and motivate a highly effective team of engagement leaders and quantitative analysts; Manage their performance and growth in the Data organization, teach executive engagement skills and develop potential successors.

DIMENSIONS AND ASPECTS

Technical/Functional (Line) Expertise

Broad technology skills in data, AI/ML and ability to translate knowledge into solutions which transform the customer’s experience.
Experience socializing and serving as a liaison between the EDPP and business partners to demonstrate the value proposition of the service delivery framework to leadership
Leadership (Vision, strategy and business alignment, people management, communication, influencing others, managing change)
Experience in relationship management / account management roles
Experience of designing, and evaluating organizational transformations and delivering large scale change that adds value from data and information
Proven experience of providing strategic and technical leadership to large complex organizations
Knowledge of the contemporary digital landscape of organizations and experience of bringing leading technology and process optimization practices to an organization to drive sustainable improvements in business performance
Experience leading agile teams leveraging scrum methodology

Decision-making and Autonomy

Proven track record of driving change in processes and organizations, while maintaining working relationships with key business customers.
Versed in Risk management possessing ability to identify, analyze, track, manage and resolve risks issues that impact project

Interaction

Demonstrated success in the areas of IT Business Partnership & Relationship Management, Value Realization, IT Vendor Management/Governance
IT Project/Program Management, IT Service Management
Collaborating and Influencing
Negotiates with a genuine give-and-take approach, where both act as true peers and decisions are shared.
Spends time identifying all stakeholders necessary and meets or connects with all of them, neglecting no one to shape a collective consensus.
Identifies opportunities to build relationships that will help others achieve their objectives and reaches out to those people or new people.
Collaborates and openly debates with the team to manage projects, solve problems, discuss challenging
issues, or learn more about critical issues as a group.
Delegates roles thoughtfully to free self to work at a more strategic level.
Collaborates with each employee to establish clear, challenging performance goals and metrics for the year.
Designs a performance management process to monitor projects and deliver results that exceed expectations.
Periodically reviews team progress against plans, focuses attention beyond the project to the full year

Innovation

Leverage digital technologies to drive business results
Captures voice of the customer and provides operating model which optimizes and socializes service delivery

Complexity

Leads, transforms and deliver functions – finance, resourcing, operations, training, change management etc.
Able to operate in an environment of ambiguity and uncertainty, while continuing to advance goals and objectives based on available information.
Acts to surpass goals, seizing opportunities to push the envelope.
Sets continually higher goals that are ambitious but realistic for self and team, geared to overall organizational objectives.
Focuses on new business opportunities that enable business development targets to be exceeded.
This leader’s primary objective is to unify a talented team of data and data scientists and engineers and focus their efforts on the delivery of productized AI use cases prioritized by critical business needs and the creation of enterprise value. This will be measured by improved business focus, exponentially increased output and specialization, and the creation of natural business demand for shared data and AI capabilities.
Creation of a customer-focused, central hub and service organization for all data science activities, enabling Takeda to leverage its scale and reach.
Establish the cultural footprint for a team that must play a growing and sustainable role in the continued success of Takeda.
Develop and communicate the data science strategy for Takeda, including a vision for tools, processes and technology, self-service capabilities, the productization of analytical tools and services.
Established a functioning environment that allows various Takeda users to embed data and data science capabilities

EDUCATION, BEHAVIOURAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

Essential

A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Accounting, Finance and/or Management Information Systems from an accredited university or college MBA from top US or International business school preferred
10+ years of strategic and operational consulting experience
Must demonstrate the ability to interpret business data and translate into insightful recommendations
Presentation skills and strong executive presence
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Exceptional organizational and interpersonal skills
Previous healthcare / life science / pharmaceutical industry experience preferred
Referenceable leadership, management, or key influencer experiences required
Previous experience managing large programs and budgets preferred
Ability to think outside the box for creative strategies
Tenacity, perseverance, and courage
Experienced within Agile methods and leading Scrum teams

Locations

Cambridge, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
98,Sr Data Science Analyst,$61k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary
The Sr. Data Science Analyst operates as an internal consultant, finding solutions to the most critical organizational challenges in a fast-paced health care environment, leading to improved patient outcomes and performance for our business partners. The challenges that are complex from a methodology or business perspective are frequently the types of projects that this role tackles.
Reponsibilities
Successfully guide Data Science projects from concept to completion as a combination of Data Science subject matter expert, project manager, and business analyst.
Perform Research and Development to generate new products and/or ways to use our data to improve patient outcomes.
Translate identified business challenges or opportunities into actionable project efforts with defined scope and goals.
Create visual concepts/mockups that foster a shared understanding of business challenges or opportunities.
Coalescing stakeholders toward reasonable project objectives that address the most pressing challenges of our business.
Collaborate and coordinate with clinical, business, IT and engineering partners in the design and development of products that address key business challenges using internal and/or external data.
Effectively communicate the practical nature of the results of various analyses to business stakeholders using illustrations and practical language.
Pilot a proposed solution to demonstrate its effectiveness and/or suggest improvements.
Create reports documenting key findings, observations, outcomes, and/or recommendations clearly.
Develop, document and maintain code in a clear and reproducible manner.
Perform other duties and responsibilities as required, assigned, or requested.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Business Information Systems, Mathematics, Economics, Statistics or related technical field required; advanced degree preferred
5+ years of experience in analytics role
3+ years of experience with SQL; fluent in basic operators, joins, date and character functions;
3+ years of experience with R or Python, particularly with ggplot/matplotlib, statistics and analytics packages
3+ years of experience addressing practical business challenges in a Data Science/Analytics role
Professional experience as a project/program manager and/or business analyst preferred
Certifications in Data Science, Health Information Technology, Lean, Six Sigma, project management and/or business analysis a plus
Experience with RegEx, RShiny, R Markdown, Atlassian suite (Jira, Bitbucket, Concurrence), MS Excel (particularly pivot tables) and MS Access (VBA) preferred
Results-oriented mentality, capable of fluidly moving between roles and projects.
Team-first orientation, thriving in a collaborative, team-based work environment.
Self-starter mindset with desire to learn on an ongoing basis.
Problem-solver mentality – one who finds creative solutions instead of accepting obstacles as fixed.
Prioritization skills that allow one to cope well with ambiguity, changing requirements, dynamic scope, competing objectives and changes in direction
Willingness to lead the charge to change assumptions, risks and issues into reasonable project direction
Inquisitive nature and reasonable degree of comfort in asking tough questions when needed
Ability to accept and internalize coaching guidance
Willingness to adapt to approaches that meet stakeholder needs
Solid facilitator skillset – one who can align a room full of stakeholders with competing interests toward a narrow set of key objectives
Ability to tell stories through pictures and whiteboarding, often off-the-cuff
Ability to alter communication styles effectively for stakeholders varying from Specialists to C-Suite
Ability to serve as a liaison between business, clinical and IT professionals
Willingness to unearth, track and resolve the detail-level challenges that frequently derail project efforts
Conceptual understanding of Big Data methods
Ability to identify trends or correlations between factors and responses using methods such as trend analysis, regression modeling, clustering, principal components analysis and various feature engineering methods
Ability to conduct designed experiments to establish cause-effect relationships, as well as optimization experiments
Honesty, integrity, and emotional intelligence
Working knowledge of classical statistical / hypothesis testing techniques.
Experience with geospatial analytics platforms, particularly Esri, a plus
Experience with visualization tools, including Tableau, a plus
Experience with prototype development and/or UI/UX Design a plus
Experience with other programming languages and data exchange formats (Java, C#, XML, JSON) a plus
Experience with deep learning (particularly Tensorflow or other GPU-based) a plus
Experience with Natural Language Processing a plus
Experience with automated machine learning (H20, DataRobot) a plus
Experience with big data environments and methodologies (NoSQL, MongoDB, Spark, Hadoop) a plus",3.7,"naviHealth, Inc.
3.7","Brentwood, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2012,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
99,PMC: Senior Data Analyst,-1,"PMC: Senior Data Analyst

COVID-19 HIRING UPDATE: We have transitioned to a remote work model and are continuing to hire during this time. This role is expected to begin as a remote position. We appreciate this is unprecedented times and will work closely with you, taking into account your individual circumstances.

PMC is seeking a Senior Data Analyst who will turn data into information, information into insight, and insight into business decisions. This role will support the subscription strategy team and work heavily with paywall and engagement tactics to drive revenue growth. This position can be based in our West LA headquarters or can be remote in the following states: Arizona, California, Colorado, Delaware, Idaho, Illinois, Maine, Massachusetts, Nevada, Oregon, New York, Texas.

Responsibilities
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing visualization and reporting;
Develop and implement data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality;
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems;
Process confidential data and information according to guidelines;
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets;
Filter and clean data to ensure accurate analysis;
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs;
Training end users on new reports and dashboards;
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities.
Requirements
Work experience as a senior data analyst or in a related field;
Technical expertise regarding data models, data mining and segmentation techniques;
Experience in handling large data sets and relational databases;
Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages, SQL databases, programming (python, XML, JavaScript);
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (Excel, R or SPSS);
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy;
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings;
Visualization expertise (Looker/Tableau/PowerBI/etc);
Ability to translate business requirements into non-technical, lay terms. High-level written and verbal communication skills. Comfortable presenting analysis.
BS/MS in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics a plus.
About PMC:


Penske Media Corporation (PMC) is a leading digital media and information services company whose award-winning content attracts a monthly audience of more than 180 million and empowers more than 1 million global CEOs and business thought-leaders in markets that impact the world. Our dynamic events, data services, and rich content entertain and educate todays fashion, retail, beauty, entertainment and lifestyle sectors. Headquartered in New York and Los Angeles with additional offices in 11 countries worldwide, Penske Media is the way global influencers are informed, connected, and inspired. To learn more about PMC and its iconic brands, visit www.pmc.com.",4.4,"Penske Media Corporation
4.4",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
100,"Cell Therapy Machine Learning and Manufacturing Data Automation, Scientist / Senior Scientist",$114k-$199k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused company that will inspire you and support your career? If so, be empowered to take charge of your future at Takeda. Join us as a Cell Therapy Machine Learning and Manufacturing Data Automation, (Scientist / Senior Scientist at our Cambridge office.

Here, everyone matters and you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission. As a Scientist, Machine Learning and Data Automation you will be empowered to provide scientific expertise and work with internal stakeholders as well as external Partners across multiple functions at Takeda.

POSITION OBJECTIVES:

The Cell Therapy Pharmaceutical Sciences team is pursuing several programs towards in-human clinical studies, in addition to managing Takeda’s commercial cell therapy assets. The primary focus of this role will be to assist the Cell Therapies automation team in implementing novel ideas and advancing digital initiatives in the areas of bioprocess automation, predictive model and control, Digital Twin, data integration and analytics. At Takeda we are looking for smart, data driven, creative data scientists and machine learning engineers capable for applying artificial intelligence and machine learning in solving problems in drug discovery.

POSITION ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Work with internal resources to integrate and connect data, helping lead to actionable learnings and trends
Develop & support the understanding of the data infrastructure from discovery to clinical, across Cell Therapy functions
Create Data Science Stack (Products): Conceptualize, prototype, and productize massive scale Data Science implementations
Help design and create interactive visualizations that facilitate generation of insights and understanding of complex data correlations
Shape and assess data architectures and services through automation data for cell therapies manufacturing
Implementation and operational analytics of data services, predictive models for process control, and & other problem-solving activities applying Machine/Deep Learning.
Investigate and implement data platforms that integrate & connect clinical, process and manufacturing data
Understand major classes of data analytics, data services, and machine learning

EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE, BEHAVIORAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

Education Requirements:

Bachelors degree in chemistry, biology, pharmacy, or related pharmaceutical science and 5-10+ years relevant experience
Masters degree in chemistry, biology, pharmacy, engineering or related pharmaceutical science; 2-5+ years relevant experience
PhD in chemistry, biology, pharmacy, engineering or related pharmaceutical science; 1-3+ years relevant experience

Technical Requirements:

Proficiency with a deep learning framework such as TensorFlow or Keras,
Proficiency with mathematical modelling
Proficiency with Python and basic libraries for machine learning such as scikit-learn and pandas
Must display advanced knowledge in modeling of biological systems
Solid background in scientific information and capable to implement and execute data science initiatives, analysis, machine learning.
Prior experience in engaging with external partners, particularly with respect to technology evaluations
Experience in multidisciplinary clinical projects and teams with ability to integrate cross-functional information
Experience in working in conjunction with engineering and automation department to deliver phase-appropriate manufacturing solutions (including custom solutions)
Experience in CART, immunology, immune-oncology or vaccines is preferred

Knowledge and Skills:

Knowledge of data/process automation elements such as programming, big data, data science, cloud computing, data management, computer science, machine learning, learning analytics, operations research, SCADA, PLC are a strong plus
Programming knowledge in Python/R/C or similar. Further programming experience is advantageous.
Distributed computing, stochastic modeling, sampling methods, and randomized algorithms
Proficiency in database languages (SQL), understanding of data models and databases
Biotech/pharma experience and dealing with pre-clinical, manufacturing, and clinical data a huge plus
Proficient technically in types of data, databases, data wrangling, data processes and data architecture
Strong communication skills
Team-oriented
Leadership qualities
Superior organizational skills
Self-starter, pro-active, motivated

TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS:

May require approximately up to 10% travel

WHAT TAKEDA CAN OFFER YOU:

401(k) with company match and Annual Retirement Contribution Plan
Tuition reimbursement
Company match of charitable contributions
Health & Wellness programs including onsite flu shots and health screenings
Generous time off for vacation and the option to purchase additional vacation days
Community Outreach Programs
Empowering Our People to Shine

Empowering Our People to Shine

Discover more at takedajobs.com

No Phone Calls or Recruiters Please.

#LI-AA1

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
101,"Quantitative Researcher, Market Simulator",$131k-$261k (Glassdoor Est.),"This person will be part of a centralized team that is responsible for the Market Simulator research tool sets and data sets that are utilized by the Jump trading community. Jump's simulation platform is a unique, high performance system which provides traders a competitive edge to successfully optimize and execute their strategies.

What you'll do:

You will be actively involved in research projects associated with latency and available liquidity prediction as well as algorithmic improvement based on requirements provided by our internal trading teams. You will need to be successful at determining efficient methods to store and analyze very large amounts of data and develop tools to evaluate the large volume of market data to help improve trading strategies performance.
Partner directly with the internal trading teams to build and enhance market prediction models utilizing quantitative problem solving and advanced statistical techniques.
Investigating and designing data mining and machine learning algorithms
Conduct research for the purpose of modeling and forecasting future price actions and volatility.
Responsible for developing and improving scalable quantitative research frameworks using Python, C++, and other software systems.
Research new methods for capturing risk exposure, evaluating risk/reward and performance attribution across multiple asset classes.
Build and expand the current revenue base by developing and exploring new opportunities.
Other duties as assigned or needed.
Skills you will need:
At least 5+ years of experience in Machine Learning and/or Statistics
Strong Python experience
Experience with C++ or another lower level language a plus
Excellent problem solving abilities
Reliable and predictable availability
If you are currently a student or recent graduate, please see our Campus postings which offer both intern and full-time opportunities.",4.2,"Jump Trading
4.2","Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
102,Reporting & Analytics Manager - Device Financing & Consumer Products,$101k-$201k (Glassdoor Est.),"Design and produce standard and ad-hoc reports, invoices, dashboards, cubes, and various data visualization reporting solutions. Gather and document report requirements. Write report specifications to meet business needs. Use reporting tools, applications, and/or queries to create and configure new reports and dashboards. Perform modifications and enhancements on existing reports based on evolving business requirements. Validate and test reports to ensure accuracy and quality. May participate in the design and development of business intelligence reporting tools. May provide support and training to end-users for reporting tools and reports.

Responsibilities
Gather complex data inputs from multiple sources, both internally and externally. Identify new data sources that will enhance business outcomes and support strategic and tactical objectives. Provide insights on trends and drivers behind the results and prepare reports on findings.
Assesses the needs of the business, prioritize projects and drive new reporting requirements to completion. Work cross-functionally as needed to enable data architecture and solutions that best meet the analytics and reporting needs of the business. Drive clarity or requirements and ensure delivery meets agreed-upon requirements.
Identify and communicate key insights to leadership team based on reports and analysis
Work cross-functionally in order to proactively and systematically identify and implement any enhancements to reporting and analytics processes
May assume project/initiative responsibility
Complete complex ad-hoc research, analysis, and reporting. Serves as a subject-matter expert on the team.
May provide guidance to more junior employees or act as a team lead
Also responsible for other Duties/Projects as assigned by business management as needed.

Qualifications
4-7 years of experience mining data and developing reports using a variety of reporting/analytics software packages with an aptitude for learning new reporting software packages.
Proven exp running query from relational databases using SQL and reporting tools, to deliver to decision-makers. Proficient with Excel or like-programs
Bachelor's Degree in business, Finance, Information Management or related field
Ideally having exp working w/ with Supply Chain, Finance, Accounting, and other internal partners, as well as external vendors.
Proven exp with SQL Teradata or Microsoft SQL Server. PowerBI, Tableau, nice to have.
Perform ongoing data QA and address ad hoc data requests including executive escalations.

Company Profile
As America's Un-carrier, T-Mobile USA, Inc. (NASDAQ: ""TMUS"") is redefining the way consumers and businesses buy wireless services through leading product and service innovation. The company's advanced nationwide 4G and 4G LTE network delivers outstanding wireless experiences for customers who are unwilling to compromise on quality and value. Based in Bellevue, Washington, T-Mobile USA. Inc. provides services through its subsidiaries and operates its flagship brands, T-Mobile and Metro by T-Mobile. For more information, please visit http://www.t-mobile.com

Applicant Privacy Policy

We are committed to maintaining your trust by respecting and protecting your privacy. For more information about how T-Mobile processes the personal data of job applicants, please visit Applicant Privacy Policy.

EOE Statement
Equal Employment Opportunity

We take equal opportunity seriously-by choice.

T-Mobile USA, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All decisions concerning the employment relationship will be made without regard to age, race, ethnicity, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, religious affiliation, marital status, citizenship status, veteran status, the presence of any physical or mental disability, or any other status or characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law. Discrimination, retaliation or harassment based upon any of these factors is wholly inconsistent with how we do business and will not be tolerated.",3.9,"T-Mobile
3.9","Bellevue, WA",-1,10000+ Employees,2001,Company - Public,Telecommunications Services,Telecommunications,$10+ billion (USD),-1
103,Analytical Chemist/Scientist for Biologics Group,$36k-$55k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the Opportunity
Are you looking for a fast paced position in a rapidly growing company? We are seeking an Analytical Chemist/Scientist for our Biologics Group in Ann Arbor, Michigan. We are searching for talented and motivated individuals that would enjoy working in a team oriented, entrepreneurial company.
Job Description and Responsibilities
Learn techniques spanning across the entire spectrum of analytical chemistry from wet chemistry to HPLC, NMR, Mass Spectrometry, FTIR, GC and GC-MS
Perform testing using a variety of technologies including HPLC, LC-MS, GC, GC/MS, Microscopy, FTIR and UV
Execute projects in support of client needs including product deformulation and product development, failure analysis and problem solving, impurity identification, extractable and leachable studies, and structural characterization
Follow all safety requirements including wearing appropriate personal protective equipment
Generate supporting laboratory documentation
Ensure compliance with government rules and regulations (FDA, cGMP, DEA, ICH, OSHA, etc.)
Implement new equipment and processes independently, capable of conducting appropriate qualification and validation activities
Execute projects with minimal supervision
Have the ability to analyze data from the qualitative to the rigorously statistical and defend conclusions based on data
Have the ability to demonstrate strong problem-solving and analytical abilities
Requirements
Experience with analytical method development
Experience with protein mass spectrometry, proteomics (LC-MS/MS or LC-QTOF)
Experience with mammalian cell culture
Experience working with proteins and nucleic acids
Experience with HPLC or FPLC
Effective scientific writer (experience with report writing)
Effective oral presenter (experience with scientific presentations)
Effective time management
Must be a flexible, adaptable, self-driven team player with a positive attitude
Preferred
Hands-on experience with AAV or lentivirus
Hands-on experience with viral transduction assays
Experience with capillary electrophoresis
Experience with GC-MS
Experience with method validation
Experience with MALDI or TOF
Experience with QC method development/validation
Bachelor's degree (preferred)
3-7 years’ experience
Why Work for Us?
Avomeen is a full-service laboratory with unique analytical, product testing and formulation development expertise. Each member of the Avomeen team plays a critical and visible role in delivering high-quality scientific solutions, providing them with an opportunity to directly impact Avomeen’s success and advance their career. We make every effort to reward outstanding performance and provide interesting and scientifically challenging work. In order to ensure the success, development, and growth of our employees, we are committed to offering a variety of training opportunities.
Become Part of our Community
We recognize that our single greatest resource is our people, and our team members choose Avomeen not only to join our scientific knowledge-based community, but also to become part of a collaborative team committed to exemplary science and service to our clients. Successful Avomeen employees have a positive, client-centric outlook, and embody principles of integrity and leadership, as well as creativity, flexibility, and perseverance.",3.8,"Avomeen
3.8","Ann Arbor, MI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
104,Data Engineer,$93k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 200 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.
If you have proven experience in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you:
Git / SVN / TFS / VSTS
Jenkins / Travis / Bamboo / Go
Vagrant / Packer / Terraform
GitHub / Bamboo / GitLabs
Chef / Puppet / Ansible / SaltStack
Docker / Docker Swarm
Kubernetes / OpenShift
Power-Shell / Bash
AWS / Azure / GCP / OpenStack
Cloud Formation / Code Deploy
Spring Boot / Tomcat / WebLogic / JBoss
ELK Stack / Splunk
AMQP / RabbitMQ / Active MQ
New Relic / Dynatrace / AppDynamics / Sensu
JIRA / Rally / VersionOne
VMware / VirtualBox
F5 / Citrix / NGINX /Amazon ELB
Pipeline Design & Management
Application Lifecycle Management
Leading Cultural Change
Bonus experience:
Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes
What's in it for you?
Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success. sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology & social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
105,"Scientist, Biologics Fermentation/Cell Culture",$103k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"Scientist, Biologics Fermentation/Cell Culture
Location


San Francisco

Requisition Number

5167-394-2020

Apply Now

Position Overview


Nektar has an exciting opportunity for a Scientist, Biologics Fermentation/Cell Culture to join their External Manufacturing Team.

Responsible for supporting the scale-up and tech-transfer of recombinant protein production processes including the development, optimization, and characterization of microbial fermentation, mammalian cell culture, and primary recovery processes. Designs and executes experiments to characterize manufacturing processes for the production of recombinant proteins. Performs primary recovery. Analyzes quality of expressed proteins using basic analytical techniques, i.e. SDS-PAGE, HPLC, etc. Participates in technology transfer to CRO/CMO and oversee process development, scale-up and/or GMP production activities at CMOs. Reviews and/or authors the CMC sections of regulatory filing documents. This position contributes to and supports the company’s research and development efforts to create high value therapeutics to address unmet medical needs.

Works on problems of diverse scope in which analysis of data requires evaluation of identifiable factors. Exercises judgment within generally defined practices and policies in selecting methods and techniques for obtaining solutions. Normally receives no instructions on routine work, general instructions on new assignments. Synthesizes multiple data sources and draws general, non-obvious conclusions. Defines problems, develops approaches and develops experiments with sound judgment with minimal supervision. Uses professional concepts and scientific knowledge to contribute to the development of company concepts and principles to achieve objectives in creative and effective ways. Develops, optimizes and characterizes of the microbial fermentation, mammalian cell culture and primary recovery process. Designs and executes fermentation and mammalian cell culture process to express recombinant proteins. Performs primary recovery. Analyzes quality of expressed proteins using basic analytical techniques, i.e. SDS-PAGE, HPLC, etc. Performs day-to-day planning, execution and analysis of laboratory experiments independently with minimal supervisions. Defines complex problems, develops approaches and develops experiments with sound judgment. Interfaces with various departments and partners. Plans and coordinates activities with other team members. Writes and/or approves complex reports and protocols. Maintains knowledge of regulatory compliance requirements. May assist with implementing organizational systems, identifying capital equipment, and projecting resource requirements. May mentor or manage staff, provides training as needed, and ensures adherence to company policies and quality requirements.

A PhD in a scientific or engineering discipline is required. Equivalent experience may be accepted. A minimum of 2 years work experience in a biotechnology/pharmaceutical industry, preferably in a process development, is required. Post-doctoral work may serve as experience. Exceptional non-PhDs with demonstrated capabilities and/or significant experience may also be considered. Must be able to demonstrate significant success in technical proficiency, scientific creativity, collaboration with others and independent thought. Must be current and active in field, while able to demonstrate expert knowledge in scientific principles and concepts both internally and externally with sustained performance and accomplishment. Must be able to clearly communicate scientific information both written and oral. Must be able to compose sound written work. Ability to present technical information to both technical and non-technical audiences is required. Must be able to demonstrate sound judgment. Must be able to demonstrate problem solving capabilities. Strong organizational skills are required. Good computer skills are required. Working knowledge of MS word, Excel, Power point is required. Experience working in an FDA regulated environment and knowledge of current GMPs as they apply to laboratory practices are highly desired. Experience with regulatory filings is a plus. Previous management experience is a plus. Must be willing to work as part of a team. Must be able to demonstrate good interpersonal skills.

Performance of tasks essential to the job function may require the employee to work directly with, handle, or otherwise come into contact with chemicals or pharmaceutical agents. Employees may be required to enroll in a medical surveillance program based on the potential exposure to certain health hazards encountered as a result of their job function.
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to race, ethnicity, gender, veteran status, or on the basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class. Nektar Therapeutics will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in the manner proscribed by the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance.",3.3,"Nektar Therapeutics
3.3","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1990,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
106,Sr or Principal Data Scientist,$104k-$167k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are hiring Data Scientists at these levels:
Senior
Lead (Staff or Sr. Staff)
Principal

WHO WE ARE:

Freedom Financial Network is a family of companies that takes a people-first approach to financial services, using technology to empower consumers to overcome debt and create a brighter financial future. The company was founded in 2002 by Brad Stroh and Andrew Housser on the belief that by staying committed to helping people, you can ensure better financial outcomes for both the customer and the business. This Heart/$ philosophy still guides the vision of our growing company, which has helped millions of people find solutions for their financial needs.

What began with 2 people in a spare bedroom has now rapidly expanded to a vibrant business that employs over 2000 employees (known internally as The Freedom Family) in two locations: San Mateo, CA and Tempe, AZ. When you visit either of our offices, you’ll understand why our employees have voted us the Best Place to Work for the last several years. It’s a place where the Heart/$ philosophy continues to thrive, where we believe that success is only achieved by doing what’s right for our customers, our employees, and our communities.

In order to create brighter futures for our clients, employees, and businesses, Freedom Financial Network holds itself to four core values that have grown out of our Heart + $ philosophy: to care for everyone around us, act with integrity every time, collaborate with everybody we work with, and get better at what we do every day.

THE OPPORTUNITY:

The Sr. or Principal Data Scientist will be heavily involved in executing data analysis and modeling tasks for Freedom Financial Asset Management, the lending division of the Freedom Financial Network. The overarching mandate for the Sr. or Principal Data Scientist is to execute on analytic delivery and to develop new analytic capabilities for the company’s mortgage initiative. The position will essentially be to partner with the mortgage division to execute a new analytic vision. Additionally, he/she may collaborate with other team members to assess and develop new analytic opportunities. This role will provide the candidate exposure and visibility into a strategic initiative for the company, and as such, will be a high impact role within the organization.

THE ROLE:

Some of the key responsibilities for the Analytic Scientist will include:

Drive better understanding of FFN customers and prospects. Optimize customer experience and FFN value proposition by leveraging of GLM, supervised and unsupervised ML modeling solutions.
Utilize your technical and analytical skills, while also gaining in-depth exposure to business strategy.
Act as consultant to cross functional teams, advise how to best leverage predictive modeling and data in general.
Responsibility:
Design, build, optimize and maintain customer LTV / lifecycle modeling platforms.
Identify opportunities to apply data science solutions to improve customer experience and FFN value proposition.
Consult with business partners to develop data science strategy to address and influence customer LTV.
Analyze data, build models and assess their quality
Design experiments and evaluate the results
Monitor model performance and make recommendations
Ad-hoc Statistical requests
Communicating results and recommendations to senior management
Identify and apply best practices and innovative solutions for optimization of customer life cycle.
Skillset and Requirements:
Expert knowledge of logistic regression, decision trees, survival analysis, design of experiment and other statistical techniques
Expert knowledge of supervised and unsupervised ML modeling techniques
Communicating clearly and concisely to individuals from various backgrounds
Influencing others in both verbal and written mediums
Leverage data and advanced statistical and machine learning techniques to develop comprehensive customer experience strategy
Qualifications and Experience
Masters or PhD in Statistics or similar quantitative field of study (Math, Economics, Financial Engineering, Physics, Chemical Engineering, Industrial Engineering, Operations Research, etc.)
Hands on expertise in statistical modeling and analysis
Experience with use of credit bureau data for statistical modeling
Experience working with relational databases
Expert SAS/R/Python knowledge
Experience with cloud-based modeling (AI) platforms
0 - 7+ years of total experience. Financial services or mortgage experience, is not required, but is preferred.
Demonstrated experience in statistical modeling and analysis. Expert level skills in Python or R.
Proficiency in qualitative and quantitative data analysis and reporting.
Aptitude working with relational databases and manipulating data from databases for statistical modeling.
Familiarity with UNIX/LINUX environments and BASH/shell scripting is desired.
Very strong analytical skills, combined with an ability to tie analytic results to business implications.
A can do attitude for problem solving.
A keen eye to spot opportunities to automate and streamline analytic processes.
High level of comfort working within the financial services industry, as well as working within a rapidly growing environment in which change is a constant.
An ability to work independently with limited direction but with the judgment to do so within appropriate limits of authority.
Initiative to constructively, but passionately, challenge existing analytic processes.

CULTURAL FIT (Our Core Values):

Care (for everyone): We show compassion and contribute to the well-being and growth of those around us. We only pursue products that improve the financial lives of our clients.
Act with Integrity (every time): We take the right action even when it is hard and even when no one is watching. We treat our employees, clients, and communities the way they wish to be treated.
Get Better (every day): We innovate, iterate, and improve each day. We are creative, take thoughtful risks, and ultimately learn and recover from failures.
COLLABORATE (with everybody): We strive to work together toward a common purpose by proactively sharing information and inviting participation. We recognize the perspective of various groups and embrace healthy, constructive debate.

WHY JOIN THE FREEDOM FAMILY?

Fast, continued growth – there’s a lot of opportunity for advancement
Voted a Best Place to Work multiple times by our employees, most recently #1 in Phoenix for the 2nd year in a row!
Benefits start within 30 days
401k with employer match
3 weeks’ paid vacation (increased with tenure)
9 paid holidays & 5 sick days
Paid time off for volunteer work and on your birthday

This is your opportunity to be part of a growing company where dedicated professionals strive to help customers and each other succeed every day. If that sounds exciting to you, we want to talk to you. Apply today!

Attention Agencies & Search Firms: We do not accept unsolicited candidate resumes or profiles. Please do not reach out to anyone within Freedom Financial Network (FFN) to market your services or candidates. All inquiries should be directed to Talent Acquisition only. We reserve the right to hire any candidates sent unsolicited and will not pay any fees without a contract signed by FFN’s Talent Acquisition leader. Thank you for your consideration.",3.4,"Freedom Financial Network
3.4","San Mateo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
107,Head of Real-World Data Science,-1,"Genesis Research is an international healthcare consultancy providing end-to-end value evidence strategy, development, and communication services to Life Sciences companies. We are looking for an individual with demonstrated leadership, biopharma industry experience, and strong methodological skills to lead a growing team epidemiologists and RWE scientists. Our RWE-S team has seen exceptional growth and success in providing holistic and comprehensive support to Life Science organizations. The professional leading this team must possess and demonstrate a passion for innovative research, maintain accountability for all RWE deliverables, develop RWE scientists and research teams. This person must understand the needs of clients’ internal and external stakeholders and leverage this understanding to suggest and design value-added, fit-for-purpose research approaches. This role reports to the Chief Scientific Officer. Location: Hoboken, NJ, USA, although remote locations may be considered. Local and international travel of up to 20% is required.


Accountabilities within this role:
• Be the Genesis Research Authority on study design, methodology, and result interpretation for all RWE Deliverables
• Lead, manage, and ensure maximum utilization of a team of epidemiologists and health services researchers charged with designing, implementing, and managing a wide range of studies assess the distribution, patterns and determinants of health and disease conditions and examine access to and the use, costs, quality, delivery, organization, and outcomes of health care.
• Create, update, and maintain Methodological and Scientific Standard Operating Procedures (SOP) that RWE teams will follow
• Support Client Managers with execution and delivery of high-priority and highvisibility studies as a Client-facing subject matter expert
• Provide training, oversight, and guidance for new and current members of the Epidemiology team
• Ensure that the Epidemiology team members are aware of and understand RWD data sources, their strengths and limitations, and statistical software when designing studies
• Manage team capacity in concert with Client Management needs
• Motivate teams during periods of high demand

Qualifications:
▪ Master’s degree, MD or PhD within a relevant discipline (Epidemiology, Public Health, Statistics)
▪ 10+ years of consulting, industry, or academic experience
▪ Experience generating and interpreting real-world and observational research required
▪ Excellent verbal and written communication skills
▪ Proficiency in relevant software such as MS office (Word, Excel and PowerPoint) and statistical packages
▪ Exceptional organizational skills and attention to detail
▪ Enthusiasm to learn and motivation to develop oneself and others within Genesis Research
▪ Flexibility to adapt to client project needs in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial workplace

Compensation:
Competitive salary
Performance-related bonus C
ompany-matched 401k plan
Medical/dental benefits

Genesis Research is an equal opportunity employer.",4.6,"Genesis Research
4.6","Hoboken, NJ",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
108,CPC - CODING DATA SPECIALIST -,$30k-$60k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Job Description
Type of Opportunity: Full Time
FTE: 1.000000
Exempt: Yes
Work Schedule: Days

Summary:
This position exists to ensure the oversight and compliance with Health plan coding policies and procedures; compliance to all external regulatory agency coding rules and regulations. Responsibilities include review and recommend compliance of coding policies and procedures for the Health Plan as it pertains to the Coding Editing System. Compliance with all external regulatory agencies (CMS, HSD, etc.), in regards to coding rules and regulations and work directly with the coding rule developer/manager to implement regulatory guidelines into the Coding Editing System; Provides coding specific education to internal workgroups, providers, and clinical personnel in regards to compliance with health plan policies and regulatory agencies; Assisting other Health Plan Departments in answering coding questions.

Responsibilities:
Liaison to the Provider Network, Claims, Health Services, Configuration and Coding Developer/Manager staff and leadership in regards to addressing functional coding issues and problems.
Works closely with Coding Developer/Manager and Claims in order to ensure coding configuration updates are implemented in a timely manner with little to no disruption of daily business operations.
Responsible for reviewing the documentation that supports the application of correct coding edits in the event they are questioned by providers, or if necessary, legal challenges.
Responsible for retrieving, interpreting, maintaining and disseminating up-to-date knowledge of legal and regulatory information from all appropriate jurisdictions concerning the given business area. This includes but is not limited to all ICD-10, CPT-4, HCPCS, APC Local Coverage Determination, and National Coverage Determination and any CMS updates and changes where they pertain to Coding Edits
Researches and responds to inquiries and requests daily regarding coding issues and problems and ad-hoc analysis for the health plan; Maintains up-to-date working knowledge of all Health Plan coding system applications.
Conducts training classes in areas of coding, documentation and compliance for PHP personnel. This includes preparation of training materials, educational audits and answering specific situational questions.
Responsible for reviewing all edits on a monthly, quarterly and yearly basis to determine if edits are still valid and if any updates may be necessary; Attends all meetings where code edits may be impacted and bring all documentation back and make sure the edits get implemented in a timely manner.
Qualifications:

Bachelors degree in business administration or health care field required. 6 years of additional experience can be substituted in lieu of degree. CPC required. CCS, CCS-P, CPC-H, RHIA, or RHIT certification/credential/degree/license preferred, AND three to five years experience in healthcare ICD-10, CPT-4, HCPCS coding, and medical terminology. Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Detail and results oriented. Ability to work within a team and independently Ability to make independent decisions.

Education:
Essential:
Bachelor Degree
Credentials:
Essential:
Certified Professional Coder
Benefits:

Benefits are effective day-one (for .45 FTE and above) and include:

Competitive salaries
Full medical, dental and vision insurance
Flexible spending accounts (FSAs)
Free wellness programs
Paid time off (PTO)
Retirement plans, including matching employer contributions
Continuing education and career development opportunities
Life insurance and short/long term disability programs

About Us
Presbyterian Healthcare Services is a locally owned, not-for-profit healthcare system of nine hospitals, a statewide health plan and a growing multi-specialty medical group. Founded in New Mexico in 1908, it is the state's largest private employer with approximately 11,000 employees.

Presbyterian's story is really the story of the remarkable people who have chosen to work here. Starting with Reverend Cooper who began our journey in 1908, the hard work of thousands of physicians, employees, board members, and other volunteers brought Presbyterian from a tiny tuberculosis sanatorium to a statewide healthcare system, serving more than 700,000 New Mexicans.

We are part of New Mexico's history - and committed to its future. That is why we will continue to work just as hard and care just as deeply to serve New Mexico for years to come.

About New Mexico
New Mexico's unique blend of Spanish, Mexican and Native American influences contribute to a culturally rich lifestyle. Add in Albuquerque's International Balloon Fiesta, Los Alamos' nuclear scientists, Roswell's visitors from outer space, and Santa Fe's artists, and you get an eclectic mix of people, places and experiences that make this state great.

Cities in New Mexico are continually ranked among the nation's best places to work and live by Forbes magazine, Kiplinger's Personal Finance, and other corporate and government relocation managers like Worldwide ERC.

New Mexico offers endless recreational opportunities to explore, and enjoy an active lifestyle. Venture off the beaten path, challenge your body in the elements, or open yourself up to the expansive sky. From hiking, golfing and biking to skiing, snowboarding and boating, it's all available among our beautiful wonders of the west.

AA/EOE/VET/DISABLED. PHS is a drug-free and tobacco-free employer with smoke free campuses.

SS123",3.6,"Rev Hugh Cooper Admin Center
3.6","Albuquerque, NM",-1,10000+ Employees,1908,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
109,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Job Summary*
We are looking for a Machine Learning (ML) Engineer to help us create artificial intelligence products for Research and Development in the Medical Field. ML Engineer responsibilities include creating machine learning models and retraining systems. Transform Data Science prototypes to production-grade solutions. Responsible for implementing various algorithms for automated feature extraction, dataset augmentation, optimizing runtimes of neural network algorithms, and building higher level abstractions for various common AI/ML techniques.
Responsibilities: *
Study and transform data science prototypes
· Design, code and deploy machine learning systems capable of processing large volumes of data
Design and develop machine learning systems to create, train and deploy ML models
Develop machine learning applications according to requirements
Establish reusable data processing pipelines to enable rapid re-training and iteration through different ML methodologies
Select appropriate datasets and data representation methods
Design experiments and analysis methodologies that are statistically rigorous
Run machine learning tests and experiments
Perform statistical analysis and fine-tuning using test results
· Tailor and deploy software tools, processes and metrics

· Serve as a subject matter expert
Requirements: *
· Proven experience as a ML Engineer or similar role

· Experience with supervised, unsupervised, reinforcement learning algorithms

· Understanding of data structures, data modeling and software architecture

· Knowledge of ML frameworks such as Keras/Tensorflow/Theano/PyTorch and libraries (like scikit-learn)
Keep abreast of developments in the field
· Ability but to write robust code in Python, Java or equivalent modern programming language

· Proficiency in SQL, big data technologies and working with large data sets

· Works independently, able to manage multiple projects simultaneously

· Deep curiosity and a demonstrated ability to craft original solutions

· Highly communicative with collaborators and managers

· Proactive in seeking opportunities for innovation

· Ability to deal with ambiguity and deliver results in a fast-paced environment

· Dedicated and Self-Motivated

· Team collaboration and strong written and verbal communication skills

· Ownership and urgency across all responsible projects

· Proficient in Calculus, Statistics, and Linear Algebra

· Ability to work with cross-functional team to turn ideas into working solutions
Education & Experience: *
Requires Master’s Degree in Computer Science or Equivalent
2-5 years verifiable employment using requirements above. May substitute internships and projects for years of experience.
3-5 years Software Development Experience is preferred
1-2 years Networking Experience is preferred
Benefits*
· Competitive Pay

· Health, Dental & Retirement

· Continuing Education available
Salary*
· DOE

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
relevant: 1 year (Preferred)
Machine Learning: 1 year (Preferred)",-1,Ophthalmology Specialists of Texas,"Abilene, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
110,Lead Data Scientist - Ranking,$131k-$206k (Glassdoor Est.),"Faire is an online wholesale marketplace built on the belief that the future is local there are over 1M independent retailers in the U.S. and Canada doing more than twice the revenue of Walmart and Amazon combined. At Faire, we're using the power of tech, data, and machine learning to connect a thriving community of over 100,000 brands and local retailers around the world. Picture your favorite boutique in town we help them discover the best products to sell in their stores. With the right tools and insights, we believe that we can level the playing field so that small businesses can compete with these big box and ecommerce giants. We're looking for smart, resourceful and passionate people to join us as we power the shop local movement.

Lead Data Scientist - Ranking

Faire is using machine learning to change wholesale and help local retailers compete with Amazon and big box stores. Our experienced data scientists and machine learning engineers are developing solutions related to discovery, ranking, search, recommendations, logistics, underwriting, and more - all with the goal of helping local retail thrive.

Job Description

The Data Science team owns a wide variety of algorithms and models that power the marketplace. We care about building machine learning models that help our customers thrive.

As the Lead Data Scientist for our Ranking team you'll be responsible for developing machine learning-powered ranking models and adding personalization to our search and discovery. You'll determine answers to questions like, how relevant is this product to this retailer and how can we infer that in real-time? Can we create real-time embeddings of users' interests and use them to power ranking? How can we improve purchase flow? What techniques can we use to enable our A/B tests to more quickly converge when dealing with low sample sizes?

Our team already includes experienced Data Scientists from Square, Quora, TripAdvisor, Wealthfront and Overstock; and the head of the team is an experienced manager from Airbnb who is also a professor of machine learning at UC Berkeley. Faire will soon be known as a top destination for data scientists and machine learning, and you will help take us there!

You're excited about this role because
You'll be able to work on cutting-edge ranking problems combining a wide variety of data about our retailers, brands and products
You want to use machine learning to help local retailers and independent brands succeed
You want to be a foundational member of a fast growing company
You like to solve challenging problems related to a two-sided marketplace
Qualifications
Several years of industry experience using machine learning to solve real-world problems, and a history of accomplishment and advancement in your Data Science career
Experience with learning to rank (pointwise, pairwise, listwise models and understanding the trade-offs associated with each)
Strong programming skills. The tooling/language isn't important. (e.g., numpy, pandas, scikit-learn, R, Julia, etc.)
An excitement and willingness to learn new tools and techniques
Experience with relational databases and SQL
The ability to contribute to team strategy and to lead model development without supervision
Strong communication skills and the ability to work with others in a closely collaborative team environment
Great to Haves:
Highly recommended: Master's or PhD in Computer Science, Statistics, or related STEM fields
Experience with Neural Network models for ranking
Experience with de-biasing and new learning to rank models
Ability to quickly implement state of the art algorithms from an academic paper
What We Offer:
We're growing fast. You will get in early on something that's going to be special.
We're funded by the best VCs in the world.
Our founding team is experienced and led the development of one of the top 25 apps in the US App Store (Square Cash).
Great technology stack. It's fun to work with the best tools and the latest software.
The business makes sense. It's straightforward and provides clear value to both retailers and brands. You get to help change an entire industry for the better.
It's beautiful. Work on something that's well-designed, following the footsteps of Apple and Square.
Why you'll love working at Faire:
We are entrepreneurs: We believe entrepreneurship is a calling and our mission is to empower entrepreneurs to chase their dreams. Every member of our team is an owner of the business and taking part in the founding process.
We are using tech and machine learning to level the playing field: We are using the power of technology and data to connect brands and boutiques from all over the world, building a thriving community of over 100,000 small business owners.
We build products our customers love: Everything we do is ultimately in the service of helping our customers grow their business because our goal is to grow the pie - not steal a piece from it. Running a small business is hard work, but using Faire makes it easy.
We are curious and resourceful: We always find a way to get the job done and come up with creative solutions to whatever problems are standing in our way. People at Faire are insatiably curious. We lead with curiosity and data in our decision making and reason from a first principles mindset.
Faire was founded in 2017 by a team of early product and engineering leads from Square. We're backed by some of the top investors in retail and tech including: Y Combinator, Lightspeed Venture Partners, Forerunner Ventures, Khosla Ventures, Sequoia Capital, Founders Fund, and DST Global. We have offices in San Francisco, Kitchener-Waterloo, and Salt Lake City. We're looking for smart, resourceful and passionate people to join us as we power the shop local movement. To learn more about Faire and our customers, you can read more on our blog.

Faire is being built for entrepreneurs, by entrepreneurs.

Additional Information

Faire provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, genetics, sexual orientation, gender identity or gender expression.",4.3,"Faire
4.3","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
111,"Associate Director, Oncology R&D – Clinical Scientist",$51-$89 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Join a Legacy of Innovation 110 Years and Counting!

Daiichi Sankyo Group is dedicated to the creation and supply of innovative pharmaceutical therapies to improve standards of care and address diversified, unmet medical needs of people globally by leveraging our world-class science and technology. With more than 100 years of scientific expertise and a presence in more than 20 countries, Daiichi Sankyo and its 15,000 employees around the world draw upon a rich legacy of innovation and a robust pipeline of promising new medicines to help people. In addition to a strong portfolio of medicines for cardiovascular diseases, under the Group’s 2025 Vision to become a “Global Pharma Innovator with Competitive Advantage in Oncology,” Daiichi Sankyo is primarily focused on providing novel therapies in oncology, as well as other research areas centered around rare diseases and immune disorders.

Job Summary:

Oversees typically a single non-pivotal trial (small size, standard complexity in design and geographic scope). Prepares clinical section of regulatory document. Collaborates as team member with AROs/CROs. Drafts development plans, protocol profiles, and sections of submission documents under guidance of higher level. Reviews and oversee completion of clinical trial protocols. Provides medical and/or scientific direction to Clinical Operations. Represents Clinical Development on Project Teams.

Responsibilities:

Study Strategy: Provides the strategic direction to Biostats Data Mgmt & Data Ops for EDC, edit checks, data quality listings, SAP, Data Mgmt plan; Reviews patient population and protocol compliance for consistency with study strategy; Develops biomarker strategy in collaboration with Translational Medicine/Clin Pharm; May act as Clinical study leader (CSL).

Study Planning and Execution: Provides input on major milestones of trial, clinical trial plan and contingency planning; Analyzes and updates management on potential risks to study deliverables; Provides input on ICF creation; Oversees recruitment and retention; establishes and implements contingency plans for shortfalls; Consults & recruits members for DSMB and/or adjudication committee setup.

Study outputs: Draft responses to IRBs and Health Authorities; Collaborates with Translational Medicine and Clinical Pharmacology to ensure appropriate biomarker, PK / PD measurements; Reviews emerging clinical data regularly; Leads dose-escalation meetings; Performs quality assessment with Delivery Lead e.g. review Tables/Listings/Graphs before database lock and quality check of data; Works with BD&O to ensure SAP update.

External collaboration: Consults with internal experts and external KOLs, Ad Boards for protocol development; Provides input on CRO / ARO Statement of Work and Budget; Establishes effective communication between CRO / vendors / ARO.

Additional non-study related activities: Occasional senior management interactions at FIHC, WDC; Initiates contact w/KOL and prepares material for KOL interactions on a program based need; Involvement with in-licensing and acquisitions on individual due diligence activities

Qualifications: Successful candidates will be able to meet the qualifications below with or without a reasonable accommodation.

Education/Experience:

Master’s degree; PharmD, PhD, or equivalent; Postgraduate training in TA or related specialty, or equivalent, desirable

4+ years with PharmD, PhD and relevant clinical experience
7+ years with Master’s degree and relevant clinical experience

Daiichi Sankyo, Inc. is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",3.2,"Daiichi Sankyo, Inc.
3.2","Basking Ridge, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1899,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
112,Data Engineer - Azure,$93k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 400 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.

If you have proven enterprise experience working with Microsoft Azure in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you.

•Design and development of relational and non-relational databases, data warehouses and data lakes
oAzure SQL DB, Azure DB for MySQL, Azure DB for PostgresSQL
oAzure Cosmos DB
oAzure Data Lake Storage, Azure Synapse Analytics
oAzure DB Migration Service
•Development, monitoring and maintenance of data integration and processing tools and pipelines
oAzure Data Factory
•Design and testing of machine learning and data science tools, including the building and deployment of data models
oAzure Databricks, Azure HDInsight
•Implementation of high-capacity, real-time data streaming technologies
oAzure Stream Analytics, Azure Data Lake Analytics
•Data analysis and visualization tools
oAzure PowerBI
oAzure Data Lake Analytics
•Leveraging non-database data storage alternatives to maximize performance, costs and data quality
oAzure Blob Storage
oAzure Cache for Redis
oAzure Search
•Familiarity with security and security policies within Azure

bonus experience

Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes

what's in it for you?

Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success as sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology and social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
113,COMPUTER SCIENTIST - ENGINEER - DECISION TECHNOLOGIES,$43k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:


Join a team that develops creative solutions for a variety of commercial and military applications across the human performance domain; physical, cognitive, and social. Interface with technical clients and colleagues to understand requirements and constraints of the task objectives on a frequent basis. Work in various phases of the system lifecycle, including applied research, requirements generation, design, implementation, testing, integration, installation, and documentation. Apply aspects of systems engineering, an understanding of biomechanical and physiological systems, and the nature and limitations of hardware and software to ensure that the underlying systems work properly. Additional information about the type of work can be found at: https://hpi.swri.org.


Education/Experience:


Requires a BS degree in Software Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Computer Engineering, Computer Science or closely related disciplines with 0-2 years of experience. Must have at least a 3.25 GPA. Must have coursework or experience in more than one of the following: image and video processing, network and routing protocols, and machine learning or neural networks. Strong software skills are required. Experience in C++, C#, and/or Python is preferred. Experience with Linux, real-time operating systems, user interface design, and/or multithreaded programming is a plus. Excellent verbal and written communication skills are required. Must be able to work in project team environments and independently. Must have excellent problem-solving skills, be self-motivated, and be driven by challenging problems. Must have good organizational skills and attention to detail with an aptitude for continuous learning and leadership potential. A valid/clear driver's license is required.


Special Requirements:


Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas


For more information about this division, visit the Intelligent Systems home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.1,"Southwest Research Institute
4.1","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
114,Healthcare Data Analyst - Orthopaedics Administration,$36k-$63k (Glassdoor Est.),"Penn State Health Milton S. Hershey Medical Center

Location: US:PA:Hershey

Work Type: Full Time

FTE: 1.0

Shift: Days
Hours: Monday - Friday ; 8:00 AM - 4:30 PM

Penn State Health Milton S. Hershey Medical Center is searching for an outcome driven Healthcare Data Analyst to support our Orthopaedics Administration team!

The Healthcare Data Analyst, Orthopaedics Administration is responsible for customer-focused reporting, analysis, and data visualization, providing support to the leadership of the Academic Practice Division of the Penn State Health System. In addition, the analyst facilitates the development and maintenance of data collection, analysis, and reporting of internal and external information to assist leadership in making sound business decisions.

The Department of Orthopaedics and Rehabilitation at Penn State Health Milton S. Hershey Medical Center is committed to advancing our field through scientific discovery and education. Our faculty, clinicians, and researchers have been recognized by U.S. News & World Report, ranking as one of the best hospitals in the nation for 2020-21 in orthopedic care.

The Healthcare Data Analyst selected for this vital role will promote data integrity through using and developing standard based measures and will be tasked with data preparation for submission of data to national and specialty registries as well as creating functional department dashboards to present to department leadership.

Penn State Health offers exceptional benefits including healthcare beginning day one, multiple time off programs to ensure that our employees can enjoy strong life/work balance, and tuition programs to ensure that our team members have the resources to grow professionally.

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelor's Degree in Business, Mathematics, Statistics, Applied Science, Healthcare Management, or related field. Three (3) years of experience in data analysis, reporting, and documentation.

Ability to work collaboratively in a team structure.

Strong Excel skills (pivot tables, v-lookups, graphing, macros and VBA scripting). Understanding of relational databases and querying techniques (e.g. SQL).

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

MBA/MHA preferred. Experience with Cerner EMR preferred.

Experience with Qlik (BI Analytics tool) is advantageous.

Experience in and/or understanding of the academic healthcare environment is a plus.

Process improvement experience is desirable.

If chosen for this position, you may be required to pass a Post Offer Employment Physical Exam in accordance with the measurements listed in the Work Task Analysis (WTA) report. This job description is a general outline of duties performed and is not to be misconstrued as encompassing all duties performed within the position. All individuals (including current employees) selected for a position will undergo a background check appropriate for the position's responsibilities.

Penn State Health is fundamentally committed to the diversity of our faculty and staff. We believe diversity is unapologetically expressing itself through every person's perspectives and lived experiences. We are an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, color, disability, gender identity or expression, marital status, national or ethnic origin, political affiliation, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, veteran status, and family medical or genetic information. If you are unable to use our online application process due to an impairment or disability, please call 717-531-8440 between the hours of 8:30 AM and 4:30 PM, Eastern Standard Time, Monday – Friday, email hrsolutions@pennstatehealth.psu.edu or download our Accommodation Instructions for Job Applicants PDF for more detailed steps for assistance.

Union: Non Bargained

IND123

#LI-TB1",3.7,"Penn State Health Milton S. Hershey Medical Center
3.7","Hershey, PA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
115,Scientist,$46k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why Join Revenue Analytics?
Because you have exceptional talents and you want to be part of a fun and highly collaborative team that creates analytical products and solutions to eliminate the unknowns in business problems for world-renowned companies.

What's In It For You?
· Competitive base salary
· 100% paid healthcare including medical, dental, and vision coverage for our employees and their families
· 100% paid life insurance, long and short-term disability coverage for team members
· 401k plan with a generous match and is vested immediately
· Company issued cell phone or phone allowance
· 18 days PTO, 9 paid holidays, and unlimited sick time
· Gym membership reimbursement
· Flexible work arrangements
· Once again voted a Top Workplace in Atlanta in 2020!

Come help us execute the vision and roadmap for our product analytics and hey, while you’re at it…why not give our customers the confidence and trust that they’re making the best pricing decisions possible (all provided by your whip-smart data and analytics chops)?
A Day In the Life
You will develop and implement the predictive analytics models that form the backbone of our products, leveraging Revenue Analytics precedent and Atlas toolkits
Translate business needs and processes into modeling requirements
Do parameter tuning of forecast and/or optimization models to best fit a customer’s data
Deliver analysis and models results that meet key Quality Assurance standards (i.e., reasonability checks, error checks, etc.)
Communicate your analysis, models, and insights effectively in business language to customers and internal Team Members
Effectively explain to customers and prospects how the analytics in our products work and address customer questions about model recommendations
Complete analysis in a repeatable way that can be leveraged across multiple customers and situations
Keep up to speed with data science trends and news so that you can incorporate new methodologies and approaches as appropriate.
Who You Are
Master’s degree or foreign equivalent in Operations Research, Economics, Engineering, or another applied mathematics discipline and at least one year of experience applying research to Revenue or Yield Management issues
In lieu of a master's or the foreign equivalent degree and one year of stated experience, we will accept a Ph.D. or foreign equivalent degree in one of the above specified fields
Must also have experience solving business problems using statistics, machine learning or optimization; and using Python, R, or SQL analytical tools
Who We Are
A pioneer of Revenue Management, Revenue Analytics is an enterprise SaaS company that partners with hospitality, media, and passenger rail companies to solve their most complex pricing challenges. By leveraging powerful analytics and deep strategic experience, Revenue Analytics’ next-generation software delivers intuitive answers to help companies perfect their pricing, reclaim missed revenue, and take back their time. To learn more about how Revenue Analytics is recreating Revenue Management, visit revenueanalytics.com or follow us on Twitter and LinkedIn.

Revenue Analytics embraces diversity and is an equal opportunity. We are committed to building a Team that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, and skills. The more inclusive we are, the better our work will be.",4.1,"Revenue Analytics
4.1","Atlanta, GA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
116,Machine Learning Engineer,$81k-$140k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who we are: Fueled by a fundamental belief that having access to financial services creates opportunity, PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL) is committed to democratizing financial services and empowering people and businesses to join and thrive in the global economy. Our open digital payments platform gives PayPal’s 286 million active account holders the confidence to connect and transact in new and powerful ways, whether they are online, on a mobile device, in an app, or in person. Through a combination of technological innovation and strategic partnerships, PayPal creates better ways to manage and move money, and offers choice and flexibility when sending payments, paying or getting paid. Available in more than 200 markets around the world, the PayPal platform, including Braintree, Venmo and Xoom enables consumers and merchants to receive money in more than 100 currencies, withdraw funds in 56 currencies and hold balances in their PayPal accounts in 25 currencies.

Job Description Summary: PayPal customer success team is looking for a talented and highly motivated senior engineer for a technical domain that comprises of customer data analytics and ML/DL models development to support different business use cases

Job Description:

We are looking for a talented and highly motivated senior engineer for a technical domain that comprises of customer data analytics and ML/DL models development to support different business use cases

5+ Years of Experience Desired
Discovering, analyzing, structuring and mining data
Statistical hypotheses validation and model performance analysis
Developing neural network models supporting business use cases
Design and coordinate implementation of DL based solutions for production usage
Deep understanding of data mining algorithms and statistical methods
Experience in successfully applying machine learning to real-world problems
Strong knowledge of Deep Learning frameworks: Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch, etc
Knowledge in python and packages for data analysis (scipy, numpy, pandas, matplotlib)
Proficient in one or more of programming languages Scala, Java, C++
Strong knowledge of extracting and processing data with RDBMS/NoSQL
Experience with one or more Container-ecosystem (Docker, Mesos, Kubernetes) will be a plus
Good communication skills and team player attitude
Experience in Natural Language Processing/Understanding using deep neural networks ( RNN (LSTM, GRU) / CNN) is a plus
Experience in working with GPU, profiling/low-level optimizations, Cuda/CuDNN is a plus
Experience with BigData ecosystem Hadoop, Hive, Spark/PySpark is a plus

We're a purpose-driven company whose beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We hold ourselves to our One Team Behaviors which demand that we hold the highest ethical standards, to empower an open and diverse workplace, and strive to treat everyone who is touched by our business with dignity and respect. Our employees challenge the status quo, ask questions, and find solutions. We want to break down barriers to financial empowerment. Join us as we change the way the world defines financial freedom.

PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities.",4.0,"PayPal
4.0","Austin, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1998,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
117,IBOP Reporting & Data Analyst,$53k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

WMATA is looking for a Reporting & Data Analyst for our IBOP procurement team. This position is very critical in inventory sourcing day to day functions as it entails validating inventory data and preparing packages for sourcing. The successful candidate will provide very critical data driven decision making support to the Commodity Managers in managing inventory contracts and the inventory sourcing process. In addition to performing extensive inventory data analysis, the successful candidate will create reports for the group on productivity, workload and outstanding issues. The candidate will also provide data analysis support for the procurement team for performance Service Level Agreements (SLAs) for vendors, spend analysis, contract goals and item category enterprise-wide management strategies.

Minimum Qualifications

Education

A Bachelor's degree in Computer Sciences or similar fields of study

Experience

Five (5) years of experience of data mining and analysis experience. Must have experience using Microsoft Access, Visual Studio, SQL and other database reporting tools. Must also include experience performing full analysis of the results reporting summaries, identifying trends and patterns and producing results for actionable management decisions.

Medical Group

Satisfactorily complete the medical examination for this position, if required. The incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of this position either with or without reasonable accommodations.

Job Summary

The IBOP Reporting & Data Analyst functions as an expert for IBOP analytics and proactively analyzes relationships between data. Provides strategic analysis of data from multiple datasets to help drive informed decisions made by IBOP and WMATA management. Acts as a consultant to the department and organization in understanding IBOP data landscape and provides information regarding the location of and how to compile and organize it into actionable data to inform business outcomes.

ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS

Analyzes grievances throughout the various steps of the grievance process providing trends and predictive modeling. Creates efficiencies in work and processes through data mining.
Analyzes metrics throughout IBOP identifying trends and creates predictive modeling that enhances IBOP.Collects, stores, compiles and analyzes data provided by IBOP teams. This data is documentation of IBOP staff interaction with WMATA customers. Monitors and measures activities to understand and meet productivity requirements that align with the GM's customer service goals.
Using data from various systems within IBOP and other departments such as Microsoft Access, Visual Studio and SQL, provides analysis and summaries reporting the effectiveness of IBOP Department for the Executive Vice President of Internal Business Operations (IBOP) staff meetings. Also, provides other performance effectiveness measures and requirements that are based on quantifiable historical data. Ensures that these are aligned with the GM's customer service goals.

The essential duties listed are not intended to limit specific duties and responsibilities of any particular position. Nor is it intended to limit in any way the right of managers and supervisors to assign, direct and control the work of employees under their supervision.

Evaluation Criteria

Consideration will be given to applicants whose resumes demonstrate the required education and experience. Applicants should include all relevant education and work experience.

Evaluation criteria may include one or more of the following:

Skills and/or behavioral assessment
Personal interview
Verification of education and experience (including certifications and licenses)
Criminal Background Check (a criminal conviction is not an automatic bar to employment)
Medical examination including a drug and alcohol screening (for safety sensitive positions)
Review of a current motor vehicle report

Closing

WMATA is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, status as a protected veteran, or any other status protected by applicable federal law.

This posting is an announcement of a vacant position under recruitment. It is not intended to replace the official job description. Job descriptions are available upon confirmation of an interview.",3.6,"Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority
3.6","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,1967,Government,Passenger Rail,Travel & Tourism,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
118,Scientist,-1,"ArsenalBio’s mission is to develop efficacious and safe cellular therapies for patients with chronic diseases, initially cancer. Our products are being designed to herald the transition of adoptive cell therapy from a hospital based treatment to outpatient therapy, like most other cancer treatments. Our people are our greatest asset, they bring scientific talents in molecular biology, immunology, pharmacology, protein chemistry, computational biology, automation, genome engineering, software and other fields to make the future happen now.

We are seeking an outstanding Scientist to lead research efforts in areas of immunology that are key to understanding cancer immunity, including T cell and NK cell biology, as well as components of the tumor microenvironment. Strongest consideration will be given to candidates with demonstrated expertise in molecular or synthetic immunology and whose research interests are relevant to the problem of T cell development, mechanisms of immunosuppression, and next generation adoptive cell therapies. The successful candidate is expected to effectively lead cross-functional teams
What You Will Do:
Lead and drive studies applying cellular immunology, gene editing, single-cell sequencing and mouse modeling to address T cell dysfunction
Discovery and evaluation of novel mechanisms of tumor resistance to innate and adaptive immunity
Design and execution of cell-based functional assays to select candidate molecules for clinical development
Design and execution of drug mechanism of action studies using in vivo models and ex vivo methods, such as cell sorting, multi-color flow cytometry, immunohistochemistry/immunofluorescence, primary immune cell assays and 3D/organoid/explant assays.
Drive scientific and technical innovation collaboratively with other members of the company
Identify new ways to make better CAR T cells and collaborate with other ArsenalBio teams to move novel product concept designs to the clinic.
Provide exceptional scientific leadership and mentor and cross-train other scientists and research associates

What You Will Bring:
PhD, MD, DVM, or MD/DVM-PhD with at least 3 years of relevant post-doctoral research experience in Immunology, Biochemistry or Molecular Biology.
A strong work ethic, a steadfast commitment to discovery research and a documented ability to initiate, drive and complete research projects, as evidenced by a strong publication record.
Ability to manage an independent research program and to lead a cross-functional research team
Outstanding written and oral communication skills and the ability to organize and communicate complex data sets in a clear and concise manner to key stakeholders from diverse backgrounds are essential
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status

To all recruitment agencies: ArsenalBio does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, or Arsenalbio employees. ArsenalBio is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",5.0,"Arsenal Biosciences
5.0","South San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
119,Machine Learning Engineer,$118k-$201k (Glassdoor Est.),"With the continued impact of COVID-19 and social distancing measures, Kensho is conducting all interviews and on-boarding activities remotely. At the present time, all employees are working remotely, until further notice. When the time comes to open our offices, Kensho will fully support those employees who would like to continue working remotely and not ask anyone to return to the office until they are comfortable.

At Kensho, we hire talented people and give them the freedom, support, and resources needed to build cutting edge technology and products for our parent company, S&P Global. As a result, we produce technology that is scalable, robust, and solves the challenges of one of the world’s largest, most successful financial institutions.

As a Machine Learning Engineer, you will be responsible for tackling a wide range of problems from natural language processing to timeseries prediction. You will move beyond the theoretical confines of academia and apply your tradecraft to build machine learning systems on real world data. In this role, you will constantly collaborate and work with groups of engineers. Our Machine Learning team is responsible for delivering ML-based solutions from problem framing, to prototyping, and production application.
Are you looking to make impactful, scalable contributions that transform the way we think about data? If so, we would love to help you excel here at Kensho. We take pride in our tightly-knit, team-based community that provides our Kenshins with a collaborative, supportive environment to bring transparency to the biggest challenges in data.
What You’ll Do
You will conduct original research on large proprietary and open source data sets
Identify, research, prototype, and build predictive products
You will build cutting-edge models for understanding vast amounts of textual data
Write production code
You will write tests to ensure the robustness and reliability of your productionized models
You will work closely with software engineers to build incredible systems
Technologies You’ll Use
Python and specifically NumPy, SciPy, Pandas, SciKit-learn
Neural network packages like TensorFlow/Keras and pytorch
ML packages like LightGBM and XGBoost
OpenFST
Elasticsearch
Required Skills, Knowledge & Experience
You have 3+ years of experience being a major machine learning contributor at a top company, hedge fund, or university
You have at least one core programming expertise, such as Python (NumPy, SciPy, Pandas), MATLAB, or R
You have experience with advanced machine learning methods
You possess strong statistical knowledge, intuition, and experience modeling real data
You demonstrate effective coding, documentation, and communication habits
You have a strong research acumen and experiment design skills
You have the ability and credibility to lead a team
You have a stellar ability to communicate even the most complicated methods and results to a broad, often non-technical audience
Several of the following terms should hold deep meaning for you: LSTM, lookahead bias, bagging, boosting, stacking, information retrieval, batch norm, entity recognition, bootstrapping, Glorot initialization, Kullback-Leibler divergence, GLOVE, SMAPE, HMM, MAP, exponential family, VC dimension, EM, L1, TD(Lambda)
How to Really Get Our Attention
Your GitHub/Kaggle profile shows a project or problems you’ve tackled
You have relevant research or publications
You are a specialist in deep learning in an academic setting or production-grade machine learning


At Kensho, we pride ourselves on providing top-of-market benefits, including:
- Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance
- 100% company paid premiums
- Unlimited Paid Time Off
- 20 weeks of 100% paid Parental Leave (paternity and maternity)
- 401(k) plan with 6% employer matching
- Generous company matching on donations to non-profit charities
- Up to $20,000 tuition assistance toward degree programs, plus up to $4,000/year for ongoing professional education such as industry conferences
- Plentiful snacks, drinks, and regularly catered lunches
- Dog-friendly office (CAM office)
- In-office gyms and showers (CAM, DC) or Equinox membership (LA, NYC)
- Stipend towards commuter or gym reimbursement
- Bike sharing program memberships
- Compassion leave and elder care leave
- Mentoring and additional learning opportunities
- Opportunity to expand professional network and participate in conferences and events
About Kensho
Kensho uses machine learning, artificial intelligence, natural language processing and data visualization techniques to solve some of the hardest analytical problems and create breakthrough financial intelligence solutions for our parent company, S&P Global.
Kensho was founded in 2013 by Harvard & MIT alums and was acquired by S&P Global in 2018. Kensho continues to operate as a startup in order to maintain our distinct, independent brand and to promote our breakthrough, innovative culture. Our team of Kenshins enjoy a dynamic and collaborative work environment that runs autonomously from S&P, while leveraging the unparalleled breadth and depth of data and resources available as part of S&P Global. As Kenshins, we pride ourselves on maintaining an innovative culture that depends on diversity and inclusion.
We are an equal opportunity employer that welcomes future Kenshins with all experiences and perspectives. Kensho is headquartered in Cambridge, MA, with offices in New York City, Washington D.C. and Los Angeles. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",4.1,"Kensho
4.1","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
120,Radiation Effects Design and Modeling Engineer,$95k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Draper is an independent, nonprofit research and development company headquartered in Cambridge, MA. The 1,800 employees of Draper tackle important national challenges with a promise of delivering successful and usable solutions. From military defense and space exploration to biomedical engineering, lives often depend on the solutions we provide. Our multidisciplinary teams of engineers and scientists work in a collaborative environment that inspires the cross-fertilization of ideas necessary for true innovation. For more information about Draper, visit www.draper.com.

Our work is very important to us, but so is our life outside of work. Draper supports many programs to improve work-life balance including workplace flexibility, employee clubs ranging from photography to yoga, health and finance workshops, off site social events and discounts to local museums and cultural activities. If this specific job opportunity and the chance to work at a nationally renowned R&D innovation company appeals to you, apply now www.draper.com/careers.

Equal Employment Opportunity

Draper is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an affirmative action and equal opportunity employer. We understand the value of diversity and its impact on a high-performance culture. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, disability, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran status, or genetic information.

Draper is committed to providing access, equal opportunity and reasonable accommodation for individuals with disabilities in employment, its services, programs, and activities. To request reasonable accommodation, please contact hr@draper.com.

Responsibilities


This position will be located in Draper Odon, IN office. The engineer will lead the design, modeling, and test of complex multi-physics devices and systems. A key focus will be on radiation effects in semi-conductor electronics. The candidate should be able to lead multi-disciplinary engineering teams that develop and verify the performance of such systems with a broad understanding of the relevant physics. In addition, the candidate should have an interest in a wide variety of other areas such as electro-optics, RF, and MEMS components and systems.

Qualifications


The ideal candidate will have a MS or PhD degree in nuclear engineering, electrical engineering, physics, materials science, or related field with a minimum of 7 years of experience. Desired skills include:
Experience with developing and testing complex microelectronic devices
Radiation testing and hardening experience is highly desired but not required
Ability to model multi-physics devices and systems using TCAD, SPICE, Comsol or similar tools
Experience or desire to lead R&D teams
Strong written and oral communication skills with proposal writing experience a plus
Interest in developing a broad array of novel multi-physics devices and systems
Security Requirement

Active Secret Clearance is required.",3.4,"Charles Stark Draper Laboratory
3.4","Odon, IN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1973,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
121,Scientist Antibody/Protein Engineering - Structural Biology,$70k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Scientist Antibody/Protein Engineering - Structural Biology
Location


Lexington, MA

Employment duration


Full time

ID

314

Apply Now

We are a dedicated group of scientists, physicians, and businesspeople working together toward one goal: to discover and develop therapies that can unleash the power of the body’s immune system to treat and potentially cure cancer. We are passionate about the work we do every day at Agenus to deliver on the promise of immuno-oncology. If you’re looking for an inspired environment, passionate colleagues, and a culture that nurtures learning, innovation and team success, we invite you to join us.

We are seeking a highly motivated Scientist to join the Research Discovery group at Agenus. In this position, the selected candidate will work as part of the integrated Research Discovery and Molecular Sciences research team to advance early stage immune-oncology discovery programs through the research pipeline and into the clinic. She/he will lead efforts on the characterization and evaluation of new molecules as well as optimizing fusions molecules to enhance their potency. The candidate is expected to utilize a large variety of biochemical technics, structural biology, chemistry, antibody/protein production and interaction, ELISA and cell based assays to facilitate the development and evaluation of drug candidates. The successful candidate is expected to work independently and as part of the group to facilitate the design, execute and interpret data. She/he will have opportunities to grow their career through acquisition of new skills, experiences, mentorship and professional relationships in a fast-paced and resource-rich environment.

Responsibilities:
Develop and execute multiple biochemical assays for the characterization of drug candidates.
Design, optimize and produce new molecule formats for monospecific and bispecific antibodies, and other protein targets.
Work cross-functionally with other research groups, including discovery and immune education to lead the characterization of immune modulating drugs.
Apply information obtained from internal and published sources to develop hypotheses as well as design and execute experiments for clinical-enabling and other critical go/no-go program decisions.
Work collaboratively to obtain protocols, tools and reagents needed to execute experiments.
Generate, organize, analyze, and prepare presentations for internal and external stakeholders.
Contribute to the preparation of technical documents, project report summaries, laboratory protocols, and other regulatory documents.
Mentor junior staff and other group members.
Qualifications:
A MS or PhD degree in biochemistry, structural biology, molecular immunology or related disciplines.
A minimum of 5 years of relevant experience with demonstrated academic or industry achievement as evidenced by publication in high impact journals.
Experience with standard biochemical techniques including antibody/protein expression and purification using mammalian and bacterial cell cultures, protein/antibody interaction, enzymatic assays and 3D structure analysis.
In addition, chemistry experience is a plus.
Candidates should have excellent oral and written communication skills, an ability to synthesize and distill complex ideas into effective and innovative solutions, and a dedication to translating basic translational research insights into impactful human therapies.
Prior application of working with antibody-based therapies are highly preferred.
Experience in preparing and delivering oral presentations, posters, manuscripts, draft research reports and contributing to IND, BLA/NDA, and patent filings.",3.3,"Agenus
3.3","Lexington, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
122,"Data Engineer, People Operations",$67k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Carvana

If you like disrupting the norm and are looking for a company revolutionizing an industry then you will LOVE what Carvana has done for the car buying experience. Buying a car the old fashioned way sucks and we are working hard to make it NOT suck. At Carvana, our customers can hop online to...
Search and browse our inventory of over 20,000 vehicles that we own and certify.
Narrow down search results using highly intelligent filtering tools/components.
View vehicle details, Carfax reports, and 360 rotating studio images for every vehicle.
Secure financing in minutes using Carvana's in-house service or their own bank.
Interact with GUI components to easily customize loan length, down payment, and monthly payment.
Generate, upload, and eSign all documents online (no ink necessary).
Schedule front door delivery or pick up at one of our vending machines.
Trade-in their existing vehicle or just sell it to Carvana (no purchase necessary).
For more information on Carvana and our mission, sneak a peek at our company introduction video or learn more about what it's like to work here from the people that already do.

About the team and position

In today's world, data is king and this is the team with all the data on our people. If you're excited about understanding complex data sets from disparate sources and how we can leverage them to make Carvana a great place to work for employees, this is the team for you. Our people systems and analytics team automates all people processes and provides leaders with the people insights they need to make their teams better.

The People Data Engineer is the bouncer of Carvana's people data – and we have no qualms about tossing out the riff-raff. We extract data from multiple systems across the company and make it easy for analysts to consume to help Carvana become a strong, data-driven company.

What you'll be doing
Grow your toolset by working with tools like SSDT and Tableau across multiple versions of SQL Server including 2016, 2017, and Azure SQL Database.
Get familiar with newer cloud and data platform technologies like S3, Spark, and Redshift to create robust data pipelines to and from our on-premise data stores.
Become familiar with the multitude of ways data flows through our systems in order to contribute creative and scalable problem-solving solutions, as well as to ensure the data integrity among various data stores and ETLs.
Learn new languages that can be used to create more extensible ETL solutions, such as Python.
Utilize dev, test, and production environments, adhering to change management requirements for system implementations.
Participate in team lunch and learns, design sessions, and code reviews.
Work with People Operations team members to understand and deliver data so that non-technical resources can understand/respond as needed.
Take part in cross-functional project teams with data scientists, analysts, executives, and talent leaders.
Work with leaders and users to define business intelligence needs and translate them into functional requirements to the technical team.
Work with end-users and other IT teams to resolve operational issues and mitigate risks as applicable.
Help architect, design, and prototype solutions to support business strategies and deliver business value.
Influence across the People Operations team on how data should be collected, communicated, and visualized. You'll have the chance to drive decisions that touch every single employee and team in the company.
Other duties as assigned.
What you should have
An undergraduate degree in Management Information Systems, Computer Science, etc. or equivalent experience in the field.
At least 5 years of experience working with database development in SQL Server.
Experience working with various relational database models as well as the concepts of normalization and referential integrity.
Proven ability to know what a query plan is and how to view one, the purpose of primary, foreign, and unique keys, and understand the difference between DML and DDL.
Understanding of basic indexing concepts, like the difference between clustered/non-clustered.
Excitement toward working on performance tuning and process streamlining (woo!).
Track record of working in industry best practices and implementing processes accordingly.
The ability to work cross-functionally with engineering, data science, and business teams and communicate across them in a clear and concise manner understood by all.
You have the flexibility to move and shake with competing and changing priorities.
What we'll offer in return
Full-Time Salary Position with a competitive salary.
Medical, Dental, and Vision benefits.
401K with company match.
A multitude of perks including student loan payments, discounts on vehicles, benefits for your pets, and much more.
A great wellness program to keep you healthy and happy both physically and mentally.
Access to opportunities to expand your skill set and share your knowledge with others across the organization.
A company culture of promotions from within, with a start-up atmosphere allowing for varied and rapid career development.
A seat in one of the fastest-growing companies in the country.
Other requirements

To be able to do your job at Carvana, there are some basic requirements we want to share with you.
Must be able to read, write, speak and understand English.
Of course, we'll make any reasonable accommodations for those with disabilities to perform the essential functions of their jobs.

Legal stuff

Hiring is contingent on passing a complete background check. This role is not eligible for visa sponsorship.

Carvana is an equal employment opportunity employer. All applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, national origin, age, mental or physical disability, protected veteran status, or genetic information, or any other basis protected by applicable law. Carvana also prohibits harassment of applicants or employees based on any of these protected categories.

Please note this job description is not designed to contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties, or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities, and activities may change at any time with or without notice.",3.5,"Carvana
3.5","Tempe, AZ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2013,Company - Public,Other Retail Stores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
123,Cloud Data Engineer,$93k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 400 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.

If you have proven experience working with one or more Public Cloud Providers such as AWS and Microsoft Azure in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you.
Design and development of relational and non-relational databases, data warehouses and data lakes
RDS, Azure SQL DB, Azure DB for MySQL, Azure DB for PostgresSQL
AWS DynamoDB, AWS SimpleDB, Azure Cosmos DB
Amazon Redshift, Azure Data Lake Storage, Azure Synapse Analytics
AWS DB Migration Service, Azure DB Migration Service
Development, monitoring and maintenance of data integration and processing tools and pipelines
AWS Glue, AWS Data Pipeline, Azure Data Factory
AWS Data Pipeline, AWS Glue
Design and testing of machine learning and data science tools, including the building and deployment of data models
Amazon EMR, Azure Databricks, Azure HDInsight
Implementation of high-capacity, real-time data streaming technologies
AWS Kinesis Analytics, Azure Stream Analytics, Azure Data Lake Analytics, AWS Lambda
Data analysis and visualization tools
AWS QuickSight, Azure PowerBI
Amazon Athena, Azure Data Lake Analytics
Leveraging non-database data storage alternatives to maximize performance, costs and data quality
AWS S3, Azure Blob Storage
AWS ElastiCache, Azure Cache for Redis
AWS CloudSearch, Azure Search
Familiarity with security and security policies within AWS and Azure
Nice to have
Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Azure or AWS Certification
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes
bonus experience

Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes

what's in it for you?

Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success as sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology and social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
124,Development Scientist,$24k-$108k (Glassdoor Est.),"Development Scientist
Location


SEATTLE - Bothell, WA

Company Order #

1775

Apply Now

AGC Biologics is a leading global Contract Development and Manufacturing Organization, with a deep commitment to improving life quality by bringing new biopharmaceuticals to market. Because of our dedication to building and empowering our internal teams, AGC Biologics is an innovative leader in the industry with an extensive network of cGMP facilities in the US, Europe and Asia. As such, we deliver a deep expertise, dynamic solutions and technologies, as well as customized services for the scale-up and cGMP manufacturing of protein-based therapeutics. We forge exceptionally strong partnerships with our clients, and we never lose sight of our pledge to deliver a reliable and compliant drug substance supply. Right. On time. For more information, visit www.agcbio.com.

SUMMARY:

The Development Scientist in the Upstream Process Development group will support the development, scale-up, and transfer of mammalian cell culture processes to GMP manufacturing for the production of recombinant therapeutic proteins

PRINCIPAL RESPONSIBILITIES:
Work with clients and internal project teams in the successful completion of contract manufacturing projects.
Coordinate bench scale experiments leading up to clinical and commercial manufacturing.
Present data to project teams in verbal and written reports.
Take a leadership role within the department for developing and improving cell culture processes:
Develop, coordinate, and communicate experimental plans within the department
Execute and manage shake flask and bench scale bioreactor experiments
Manage large data sets and provide technical guidance to others in the analysis and interpretation of data
Write development protocols and characterization reports
Coordinate activities and experiments with project management, manufacturing, purification development, and analytical development
Provide technical support to manufacturing during large scale manufacturing campaigns
Contribute to the overall operation of the lab and infrastructure improvements
Provide technical support in the laboratory as necessary
Troubleshooting process control instrumentation
Implementation of new equipment and technology
Provide technical and strategic planning support to business development activities with respect to new client projects and new business initiatives.
Contribute to technology development—goal of increasing efficiency and productivity of manufacturing processes through cell culture media and process development
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES:
Demonstrated experience in a mammalian cell culture and bioreactor lab environment
Excellent technical writing and presentation skills
Previous supervisory, technical guidance and leadership experience
Entrepreneurial/business aptitude with interest in growing a contract manufacturing business
Good interpersonal relationship skills required for working with clients
Previous experience with process validation activities and knowledge of large scale manufacturing activities in a GMP environment
Experience with JMP or other statistical analysis tools would be beneficial
EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE:
PhD (or equivalent experience) in life science or engineering with a minimum of 3-8 years of industrial experience in cell culture process development related to manufacturing biotherapeutics
AGC Biologics offers a highly competitive compensation package and a friendly, collaborative culture that values personal initiative and professional achievement. AGC Biologics is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran status, race, religion, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances.",3.3,"AGC Biologics
3.3","Bothell, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
125,Senior Data Scientist,$110k-$176k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Overview:
Age of Learning is a leading education technology innovator based in Glendale, California, with a talented team of more than 600 individuals comprised of nationally-renowned educators, curriculum experts, developers, artists, writers, designers, engineers, producers, product managers, analysts and marketing experts! Together we develop engaging, effective digital learning technology and content to help children build a strong academic foundation for lifelong success.
Our flagship product ABCmouse.com Early Learning Academy® is a comprehensive online curriculum and the #1 digital learning product for young children. To-date, more than 30 million children worldwide have completed over 7 billion Learning Activities on ABCmouse. We recently launched Adventure Academy, the first massively multiplayer online (MMO) game designed specifically to help elementary- and middle-school-aged children learn. It features thousands of engaging Learning Activities—including minigames, books, original animated and live action series, and more—in a fun and safe virtual world. Other Age of Learning programs include immersive English language learning products for children in China and Japan; ReadingIQ, a digital library and literacy platform; and a groundbreaking personalized, adaptive digital learning system that individualizes math instruction for every child through AI-driven technology.

We are committed to helping all children succeed. We provide our educational programs at no cost to teachers, Head Start programs, public libraries, and other community organizations, and have served millions of children through these initiatives. We recently established the Age of Learning Foundation to expand this work globally.
As we expand our global reach and increase the educational impact of our programs, we’re looking for passionate, ambitious, and collaborative leaders to become a part of our growing team.


Summary:
We are seeking a strong, highly-motivated, results-oriented Senior Data Scientist to help conduct in-depth analyses and derive relevant insights. You will be an integral part of a newly-formed central analytics team and your work will influence business operations and strategy throughout the company.
In this senior role, you will be the go-to person for advanced analytics and data science projects as well as mentoring and assisting junior analysts on our centralized data and analytics team as need be.
Responsibilities:
Partner closely with stakeholders from a variety of teams, including the executive team, curriculum, brand marketing, partnerships, strategy and customer success, to surface insights and learnings that solve key business challenges
Develop statistical analyses and build and deploy machine learning models to understand and predict customer behavior and product performance
Create, report and interpret key metrics to assess performance, measure the impact of strategic initiatives, and identify ways to grow revenue and reduce costs
Drive A/B and multivariate testing strategy and implementation of user behavior to inform media tactics, audience acquisition and targeting, churn, lifetime value, product and content recommendations and personalized experiences
Create beautiful visualizations
Communicate results to technical and non-technical stakeholders and mentor/lead more junior analysts as needed
Drive data capture and data integrity requirements while partnering with other teams so that the right data is captured
Maintain vigilant eye on data quality
Develop frameworks, models, tools, and processes to ensure data-driven decisions across org
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field and 5+ years of experience in professional data-intensive role excluding any independent data-related projects or internships that may or may not have been part of an undergraduate program
OR Master’s and/or Ph.D. in a quantitative field and 3+ years of experience in professional data-intensive role excluding any independent data-related projects or internships that may or may not have been part of an graduate program
Advanced knowledge of analytical, statistical and machine learning methods
Proficiency in SQL and complex SQL querying
Experience modeling in R and/or Python
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Proven ability to explain technical concepts to non-technical stakeholders
Must be intellectually curious, self-motivated, collaborative, and a team player
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience productionalizing models a plus
Experience with testing and optimization a plus, ideally in a digital environment
Experience in games or education a plus
We Provide:
Medical, Dental, Vision + 401k
Highly competitive PTO policy
Casual Dress Code
Snacks + Drinks (Coca Cola Freestyle Machine)
Gaming room including an Arcade (2,000+ games)
Frequent team and company outings
Limitless opportunities for professional growth!",3.1,"Age of Learning
3.1","Glendale, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,K-12 Education,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
126,Principal Bioinformatics Scientist I,$132k-$202k (Glassdoor Est.),"Impact Healthcare

Roche Sequencing is not only changing science, but we are changing lives! Our team is pushing the boundary of technology with next-generation genomic sequencing. You will develop products that scientists and others in the life sciences will use to diagnose, find treatments, and eventually beat diseases like cancer.

Make a Big Difference

Do you enjoy experimenting on groundbreaking technology? If so, be prepared to love your job with us!

We are looking for a Principal Bioinformatics Scientist to support early Research Development on assay development efforts for our Nanopore NGS platform that will impact patient care globally. Use your Bioinformatics expertise in partnership with wet lab scientists to build the next NGS tools that will help change lives.

Responsibilities :

Collaborate with Bioinformatics and Assay Development Scientists to research and develop analysis tools for assays on the RSS Nanopore platform.
Identify and implement new development needs on bioinformatics algorithms, tools, and methods for Nanopore-based assays
Provide hands-on Bioinformatics data analyses and troubleshooting of Bioinformatics pipelines.
Follow best practices for documentation and reproducible research.
Present and communicate team activities/project results across multiple functions in the organization.

Who you are

When you join us, you will have meaningful work being part of a team developing an innovative technology that saves and improves lives around the world. As you collaborate with some of the best scientists/engineers in the industry, you will make a huge difference on cancer diagnostics! Our team is collaborative and fast-paced. And, we offer a competitive salary with a rich benefits package.

Requirements:

Bachelor’s degree in Bioinformatics, Computational Biology, Computer Science or a relevant subject area plus a minimum of 9+ years of proven experience; or Master’s and 7+ years or PhD and 4+ years of direct related experience; advanced degree is highly preferred
Proficient in general Bioinformatics tools including tools for sequence alignment, variant analysis, and database queries
Able to program in Python and R
Experienced in Bioinformatics methods development
Proficiency working in highly parallel computing environments
Proficiency working in AWS or Google Cloud a plus
Strong statistics, C++ or Java proficiency is a plus
May occasionally travel up to 10%.

#LI-CS1

Roche is an equal opportunity employer and strictly prohibits unlawful discrimination based upon an individual’s race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, national origin/ancestry, age, mental/physical disability, medical condition, marital status, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.

If you have a disability and need an accommodation in connection with the on-line application process, please email us at US.Accommodation@roche.com .",4.2,"Roche
4.2","Pleasanton, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1896,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
127,Senior Business Intelligence Analyst,$74k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"About PLAYSTUDIOS

PLAYSTUDIOS is the developer of award-winning casual games for mobile and social platforms, including POP! Slots, myVEGAS Slots, myVEGAS Blackjack, and my KONAMI Slots. The apps are powered by the company’s groundbreaking playAWARDS loyalty platform, which enables players to earn real-world rewards from more than 70 iconic hospitality, entertainment, and leisure brands across 15 countries and four continents. playAWARDS partners include MGM Resorts International, Wolfgang Puck, Norwegian Cruise Line, Resorts World, Gray Line Tours, and Hippodrome Casino, among others. Founded by a team of veteran gaming, hospitality, and technology entrepreneurs, PLAYSTUDIOS apps combine the best elements of popular social games with exciting casino gaming mechanics. To learn more about PLAYSTUDIOS, visit www.playstudios.com

PLAYSTUDIOS is enthusiastically seeking a Senior Business Intelligence Analyst to join the myKONAMI Slots team in Austin. Does the idea of analyzing millions of records, forming insights, and guiding strategic direction for an entire app interest you? Are you a data ninja that can flawlessly write queries, aggregate data to any granularity, and go any length for a game hanging analysis?

If so, look no further. In this role, you will be building complex data sets, automating processes, overseeing A/B testing, and answering big picture questions through ad hoc analysis. You will be a leading voice among product managers, data engineers, and live ops managers to optimize the product. The data, insights, and conclusions you provide will be at the intersection of all strategic decision making.

myKONAMI Slots puts the hottest, real-world casino games in the palm of your hand, letting you enjoy the most authentic slot machine action, any time, any place.

myKONAMI Slots features robust live operations, game content, jackpots, and tournaments. We are a dynamic team working together in Austin, TX to deliver the best player experience.

Responsibilities
Serve as lead and mentor to other BI Analysts on the team
Work alongside the Product Director on monitoring the health of the app and areas of opportunity
Help drive the strategic direction and implementation of the data and architecture and data warehouse
Ensure the accuracy and completeness of the data accuracy and completeness of the data - be the data quality champion for myKONAMI
Take pride in the quality of your work output. Your code, analyses, and documentation all reflect that of someone who is extremely detail-oriented
Own the outcome and success of performance. Partner closely with teams responsible for revenue, product designers, and other teams across the studio to identify and prioritize the most impactful business problems through data-driven intelligence
Translate problems into structured analyses or data products that directly drive actionable insights that maximize value
Reporting and analysis
Update weekly and bi-weekly presentations with performance metrics and recommendations with Product Managers
Create presentations for and present to internal and external teams as well as executives
Conduct ad hoc analysis as needed
Manage all AB tests Instrument in-game actions by working in tandem with Engineering and Data Platform teams, enabling us to track, measure, and evaluate the performance of new features and game content
Required
Bachelor's degree in Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Engineering, or other quantitative disciplines
5+ years of work experience analyzing large datasets in analytics or product-centric role
2+ years managing others
Advanced Excel, SQL, and Tableau
Strong data visualization skills
Prior experience presenting to executives
Advanced Excel and SQL skills
Knowledge of data management, and working in both structured and unstructured data
Excellent verbal and written communication skills and a capacity for translating product and business needs into technical specifications
Strong presentation skills (google slides, ppt) and experience representing internally, externally, and top executives
Ability to work with global cross-functional teams
Strong written and verbal communication skills to go with your technical expertise. It’s second nature for you to tell coherent and compelling narratives around complicated quantitative concepts that can be easily understood by non-technical stakeholders
A team player that is results-focused and an intellectually curious self-starter. You bring a ""can-do"" attitude and are looking to own initiatives end-to-end in a fast-paced, rapidly changing environment
Familiar with and passionate about analyzing user behavior on consumer mobile applications
Preferred
Deep understanding of mobile free-to-play games
Master’s degree in business, economics, statistics, analytics, or another related degree
Ability to build rich and complex data sets for analysis or tool building
Benefits and Perks
100% health benefit coverage for you and your dependents!
Performance-based bonuses.
401K plan and stock options.
Flexible vacation policy.
Great downtown Austin location with extensive nearby dining options and vibrant nightlife.
Employee-driven entertainment, happy hours, and team-building events.
Catered lunches multiple times per week.
Snacks and drinks available in the kitchen.
Casual work environment.
An open, collaborative workspace.
Commuter benefits program.
*** During COVID 19 we are currently working from home
PLAYSTUDIOS is an equal opportunity employer. Applicants will be considered regardless of their sex (includes pregnancy, childbirth, breastfeeding, and related medical conditions), race, age, religion, color, national origin, ancestry, physical disability, mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, marital status, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, military or veteran status, or other protected category under the law.",3.3,"PLAYSTUDIOS, Inc.
3.3","Austin, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Video Games,Media,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
128,Data Engineer,Employer Provided Salary:$45-$55 Per Hour,"StarsHR has the following contract opportunity available with our client in St. Louis.

Data Engineer

Required
5 years or more experience in Java, Scala or Python.
Ability to perform complex data analysis with large volumes of data.
Experience with stream processing, e.g. Kafka, Spark Streaming, Akka, Flink, etc..
Expert level proficiency in SQL.
Experience data modeling for large scale databases, either relational or NoSQL (graph, key:value, document, etc.) • 5+ years experience with developing ETL/Data Pipeline solutions.
Proven experience (2 years) with distributed systems, e.g. Mesos, Kubernetes, Spark, Hadoop, distributed databases, grid computing
Desired:
Experience developing and utilizing Data Lakes.
Experience with data privacy concerns
Ability to build and maintain modern cloud architecture, e.g. AWS, Google Cloud, etc.
Experience contributing to open source projects
• Knowledge of data science practices, to better steer our efforts to support them through the infrastructure we create",4.6,"StarsHR
4.6","Saint Louis, MO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
129,Senior EO/IR Signal Processing/Discrimination Modeling Engineer,-1,"Job title: Senior EO/IR Signal Processing/Discrimination Modeling Engineer
Job type: Permanent
Emp type: Full-time
Salary type:
Annual
Salary:
Negotiable
Location: Huntsville, AL.
Job published: 09/28/2020
Job ID: 32284
Contact name: Bo Ryals
Phone number: 256.217.4711

Job Description


Decisive intelligence, Inc. is seeking a Senior EO/IR Signal Processing/Discrimination Modeling Engineer to join a new 10 year contract supporting a GMD simulation program.
Senior EO/IR Signal Processing/Discrimination Modeling Engineer

Security Clearance: Active DoD SECRET clearance required

Job Description & Position Responsibilities:

Support a focused development team to build a high-fidelity Ground-based Midcourse Defense interceptor 6DOF simulation. Development will take place in an Agile Scrum environment and will make product releases using a phased capability approach. The team will start with an existing government owned interceptor simulation and improve/enhance. In addition, the simulation will be integrated into an existing simulation architecture to enable easy execution and 3D display and analysis. This position would focus on the interceptor endgame EO/IR signal processing and discrimination algorithm development.

Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, engineering, physics or mathematics
10+ years of experience
General 6DOF interceptor aerospace modeling experience for both kill vehicle and booster
EO/IR interceptor endgame signal processing and discrimination algorithm development experience
Missile defense / hit-to-kill interceptor program experience
C/C++ or FORTRAN programming language
Preferred Qualifications:
EO/IR interceptor seeker modeling experience
Interceptor GN&C modeling experience
Agile development process experience
Risk Management Framework (RMF) and software cyber security controls experience
Software configuration management or automated testing experience
#GDHP",5.0,"Decisive Intel
5.0","Huntsville, AL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
130,Development Data Analyst,$38k-$68k (Glassdoor Est.),"Link Logistics Real Estate (“Link”) is an industrial real estate operating platform owned by The Blackstone Group Inc. Link currently manages a national portfolio of high-quality, well-located industrial assets totaling over 400 million square feet throughout the U.S.
The Development Team is responsible for overseeing Link Logistics $1.5b development pipeline that includes ground up construction, build to suits and major redevelopments of existing assets. The Development Data Analyst will be responsible for supporting the Development Team with the administrative oversight of all development-related reporting, data management, and project monitoring. This position will be exposed to all facets of commercial real estate.

Establish and monitor project budgets and schedules in Yardi for all developments through the project life cycle
Project future revenue by entering and maintaining market lease assumption for speculative buildings in Forecast Manager
Manage project documentation in Yardi and confirm proper records are maintained for all developments
Work with the Development teams on accurate cashflow projections and update as budget and schedules evolve
Coordinate the “Close Out” process of completed developments and ensure all documentation is received and financial records are finalized
Work with Yardi consultants to improve reporting capabilities and data management
Ensure timely payments of development expenses and accurate coding
Assist in ad-hoc reporting and new development initiatives
Support all phases of the Development from acquisition through lease-up
Assist in preparation of the monthly Development Executive reporting and quarterly Board Book

BA or BS in relevant field of study (Finance, Accounting, Real Estate, Business Management or similar)
Must be a team player
1-2 years’ experience in the development or real estate industry preferred
Strong proficiency with Microsoft Outlook, Excel, Word, PowerPoint; familiarity with Yardi also a plus
Detail-oriented
Ability to multi-task effectively in a fast-paced work environment
Excellent oral and written communication skills
EEO Statement
Our company is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. Our employment decisions are based on individual qualifications, job requirements and business needs without regard to race, color, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, age, religion, disability, citizenship status, national origin, pregnancy, veteran status and or any other legally protected characteristics. We are committed to providing reasonable accommodations, if you need an accommodation to complete the application process, please email employment@liprop.com
#LI=MB1",3.4,"Revantage Corporate Services
3.4","Fort Washington, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Real Estate,Real Estate,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
131,Senior Data Scientist,$107k-$173k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you want to join us and apply machine learning to tackle difficult problems in biotechnology drug development? As an AI Scientist, you can play a pivotal role in a rapidly growing team analyzing and manipulating various types of biomedical datasets and generating the insights from our complex data that brings innovative medicines to patients.

About AstraZeneca in Gaithersburg, MD:

Our Gaithersburg, Maryland facility creates life-changing medicines for people around the world. This campus employs more than 3,500 experts in our field and is only a short drive from Washington, DC. This modern and vibrant scientific campus is the home of R&D and Oncology in the US. Here, we play host to some of the most cutting-edge technology and lab spaces, all designed to inspire collaboration and cross-functional science. We believe employees benefit from being challenged and inspired at work. We are dedicated to creating a culture of inclusion and collaboration.

The Gaithersburg site offers a variety of amenities to help boost productivity and help keep our employees happy and healthy. This includes a fitness center, employee healthcare clinic, electric vehicle charging stations, dry cleaning, full-service cafeteria and copy center. This is where youll find newly-designed, activity-based work spaces to suit a range of working styles while increasing collaboration between teams.

Summary of the group:

The Data Science and Modeling team within AstraZenecas Biopharmaceutical Development (BPD) group applies sophisticated algorithms and techniques to solve some of the hardest problems in the development of biological medicinal products. The team uses a blend of scientific, problem solving, and quantitative skills to develop and deliver ground breaking methods addressing critical problems in bioproduct development.

Our team of data scientists work right next to biotechnology scientists and operational teams, allowing them direct influence on the questions, the design of the corresponding studies and real time access to the resulting data. Biopharmaceutical Development has more than 20 years of experience with biotherapeutics, has brought more than 100 molecules to the clinic and has launched 6 new therapies. Together we seek to:
Improve our understanding of disease and uncovering new targets
Transform R&D processes
Speed the design and delivery of new medicines for patients
Main Duties & Responsibilities:
Develop, implement and support modelling solutions for the AI ecosystem for bioprocess optimization including integrating data from multiple different sources and modalities, as well as the application of classification, regression, clustering, image analysis, or graph theory and other specialist techniques
Researching and developing predictive models and computational methods to guide decision-making within project parameters and established approaches
Translate unstructured, business problems into the appropriate data problem, model and analytical solutions
Perform AI research, including establishment of hypotheses that can be approached using computational methods and tools. May present or publish findings for conferences and in peer reviewed journals
Build effective relationships with established range of stakeholders to ensure utilization and value of information resources and services. Clearly and objectively communicate results, as well as their associated uncertainties and limitations within agreed frameworks
Develop, maintain and apply ongoing knowledge and awareness in trends, standard methodology and new developments in analytics and data science
Education & Experience Requirements:

Graduate Degree in mathematics, computer science, physics, statistics, engineering, or a related quantitative discipline.

Required Skills:
Knowledge of modern data science approaches, including unsupervised and supervised classification and regression algorithms. May also have expertise in advanced statistical modelling, or broader aspects of applied mathematics such as dynamical systems or optimization.
Algorithm design, development, optimization, scaling and applications
Data modeling experience with sequential data such as signals, sequences, and time series.
Predictive modeling: Classification and Regression
R, Python/Julia Programming experience, SQL Querying
Stakeholder management and effective communication of the results and models
Desired Skills:
Understanding and familiarity with deep learning algorithms for RNN, CNN, or reinforcement learning for sequential data modeling
Recommendation systems
CNN for Image analysis and processing
AWS storage and services
Excellent problem solving, written and verbal communication, business analysis, and consultancy skills
Why AstraZeneca?

At AstraZeneca when we see an opportunity for change, we seize it and make it happen, because any opportunity no matter how small, can be the start of something big. Delivering life-changing medicines is about being entrepreneurial - finding those moments and recognising their potential. Join us on our journey of building a new kind of organisation to reset expectations of what a bio-pharmaceutical company can be. This means were opening new ways to work, pioneering cutting edge methods and bringing unexpected teams together. Interested? Come and join our journey.

So, whats next!

Are you ready to bring new ideas and fresh thinking to the table? Brilliant! We have one seat available and we hope its yours.

Where can I find out more?

Check out our landing page for more information on our BPD group https://careers.astrazeneca.com/bpd

Our Social Media, Follow AstraZeneca on LinkedIn https://www.linkedin.com/company/1603/

Follow AstraZeneca on Facebook https://www.facebook.com/astrazenecacareers/

Follow AstraZeneca on Instagram https://www.instagram.com/astrazeneca_careers/?hl=en",4.1,"AstraZeneca
4.1","Gaithersburg, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1913,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
132,"Scientist, Process & Analytical Development - Cell Therapies",$84k-$157k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us as a Scientist, Process & Analytical Development - Cell Therapy in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

As a Scientist, Process & Analytical Development - Cell Therapies working on the Pharmaceutical Sciences, Cell Therapy team, you will be empowered to build a world class cell therapy team.

POSITION OBJECTIVES:

This scientist position will play an important role in developing the clinical manufacturing processes and/or analytical methods for developing cellular therapy, e.g. CAR T, CAR NK, CAR gdT products etc. as well as genome engineering. Independently plans and executes process and assay development, characterization and qualification studies. Prepares study protocols, reports, technology transfer documentation, and regulatory documents for clinical trials. Presents study results at team or department meetings, to external partners or at conferences.

POSITION ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Understands project timelines and deliverables and plans/coordinates project work accordingly with departmental, functional and external stakeholders
Provides technical leadership to project teams within area of expertise and commits resources to execute specific project tasks.
Contributes significantly and independently to project work which may include multiple projects within functional area.
Support NK, gdT and primary T cell therapy product development.
Reviews, interprets and communicates data cross-functionally within CMC and/or project teams.
Plans and implements resolutions to technical problems/issues
Represents functional area on GCT project teams by communicating activities from designated functional area to project team
Independently designs and executes experiments, and reports results
Assists with development of project strategy and communicates complex data/decisions within department and cross functionally as necessary
Builds and maintains relationships with key vendors and assists with technical aspects of vendor negotiations
Proactively analyses manufacturing issues and coordinates potential resolution with the CMC team.
Responsible for integrating scientific/technical efforts around cross-functional issues.

EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE, BEHAVIOURAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

Education and Experience:

Required:

PhD in Immunology, biology, biomedical engineering or related pharmaceutical science; 0+ years relevant industry experience
Sound knowledge of current Good Manufacturing Practices (cGMP)
Previous experience with the use of contract facilities
Experience in working in a multi-disciplinary team environment
Demonstrated mastery of subject or area related to field

Knowledge and Skills:

TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS:

Analytical and Problem-Solving Skills - Able to troubleshoot critical issues or problems, and determine causes and possible solutions
Teamwork - Ability to work well in highly cross functional team environment and across global line functions.
Communication Skills -Able to expresses one’s self clearly and concisely within team; documents issues and/or concerns concisely with colleagues; adjusts communication style as appropriate for the audience; timely and effectively communicates issues to supervisor; technical writing skills to support authorship of internal technical documents
Organization – Exercises good time management and prioritization skills and is able to successfully manage multiple tasks simultaneously
Knowledge Sharing - Ability to capture organizational knowledge; improve solutions, processes, and deliverables through use of information; improve information capital by contributing experience, theories, deliverables, and models for others to use
Resource Management -Ability to manage one’s time within individual, departmental, and corporate goals and timelines; management of internal and external resources (vendors)
External Involvement – Demonstrated involvement in professional community evidenced by presentation of scientific posters or lectures at professional conferences or events
Technical - Subject matter expertise and knowledge of applicable lab equipment and operations.

TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS:

May require approximately 5-10% travel

LINE FUNCTION SPECIFIC QUALIFICATIONS:

Experience in developing cell therapy or biological products manufacturing processes, or experience in developing and executing cellular characterization assays, including flow cytometry-based, and multiplexed luminescent readouts
In-depth experience in principles and practices of cell biology methodologies, cellular immunology or stem cell biology (e.g., induced pluripotent stem cells (iPSCs)), including cell culture, cell transfection and transduction, development and execution of functional in vitro and preclinical methods relevant for various types of immune cells or stem cells.
Understanding and experience of using the tools of Design of Experiment (DOE) and Quality by Design (QBD) in process & assay design, development, qualification and validation.
Understanding of viral transduction principles and processes is strongly preferred
Previous exposure to GMP manufacturing of cell therapy or biological products, or participation in technical transfer of clinical processes to a CMO, or tech transfer of product release & characterization or clinical assays to a CRO, or other third party is a plus
At least 2-4 years of biopharmaceutical industry experience in a development setting is preferred.

WHAT TAKEDA CAN OFFER YOU:

401(k) with company match and Annual Retirement Contribution Plan
Tuition reimbursement
Company match of charitable contributions
Health & Wellness programs including onsite flu shots and health screenings
Generous time off for vacation and the option to purchase additional vacation days
Community Outreach Programs

Empowering Our People to Shine

Discover more at takedajobs.com

No Phone Calls or Recruiters Please.

#LI-AA1

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
133,"Decision Scientist, CPG Analytics",$64k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"Would you like to be part of an industry-leading analytics organization? With over 50 people, Ibotta's Analytics team uses the latest developments not only in our core technical capabilities such as statistics, machine learning, testing methodologies, and data engineering, but also in the broader aspects of an analytics organization such as minimizing technical debt, increasing organizational data literacy, and developing analytics leadership, making Ibotta a place where individuals at all levels can learn and grow their careers.

As a Decision Scientist - CPG, you will be responsible for providing actionable and data-driven recommendations to internal and external stakeholders. You'll have the opportunity to work alongside talented individuals and understand the business in-depth, support and challenge strategic options, and build state-of-the-art tools to improve our largest line of business.

What you will be doing:
Embrace and uphold Ibotta's Core Values: Integrity, Boldness, Outhustle, Teamwork, Transparency & A good idea can come from anywhere
Leading projects to build causal inference models (A/B testing), automation of existing reports and deliverables, machine learning models, root cause analysis of upstream data issues, and market analysis case studies
Working cross-functionally to analyze large amounts of behavioral and transaction data to provide clients with actionable insights about Ibotta's users and campaign performance
Communicating complex analyses and data intricacies in a clear, concise manner both internally as well as to external clients
Serving as a leader for the ideation, development, and support on strategic initiatives including statistical modeling and advanced analytics within the team
Mentoring other members of the team
What we are looking for:
3+ years of practical work experience in Analytics, with at least 1 year of experience building statistical causal inference or machine learning models in a distributed computing environment
Moderate to advanced knowledge of common data science software development packages (Python, R, etc.) and their relevant libraries, along with strong SQL and proven data wrangling and feature engineering skills
Ability to drive projects end-to-end with minimal guidance/oversight, with examples of high-quality output that provide actionable, business-focused insights and recommendations
Initiative to proactively anticipate and solve important problems
Ability to communicate complex analytical concepts clearly and concisely both in written form and verbally to both technical and non-technical audiences, with a track record of strong partnerships with key stakeholders and clients across multiple functions
About Us:

Built in Denver, CO, Ibotta (""I bought a..."") is a free mobile shopping app that gives users cash back on groceries and more. Through our partnerships with brands and retailers like Procter & Gamble, Kraft Heinz, Kellogg, Amazon, Walmart, Target and Uber, we've delivered over $750 million in cumulative cash rewards to our Savers. Guided by our values and our mission to make every purchase rewarding, we come to work energized by the business problems we get to solve, the technology we get to build, and the people we get to innovate (and have fun) with. Ibotta made Inc.'s 2020 list of the 5000 fastest-growing private companies in the U.S. for the third consecutive year. In 2019, we became the first mobile consumer technology company in Colorado to achieve $1B in valuation.

To learn more about what our Tech teams are doing day to day, visit Building Ibotta on Medium.com

Additional Details:
This position is located in Denver, CO and includes competitive pay, benefits package (including medical, dental, vision), 401k, and equity.
Ibotta provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, and genetics.
Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis.
For the security of our employees and the business, all employees are responsible for the secure handling of data in accordance with our security policies, identifying and reporting phishing attempts, as well as reporting security incidents to the proper channels.",3.6,"Ibotta
3.6","Denver, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
134,"Decision Scientist, Data & Media",$64k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"Ibotta is seeking a Decision Scientist - Data & Media to join our analytics team to provide compelling, actionable and data-driven recommendations to our Data and Media partners and clients.

As a Decision Scientist - Data & Media, you will be responsible for using the latest developments in data engineering, statistics, and testing methodologies to understand the business in-depth, support and challenge strategic options, and build state-of-the-art tools to improve our Data & Media business. You'll have the opportunity to work alongside talented individuals and understand the business in-depth, support and challenge strategic options, and build state-of-the-art tools to improve our fastest growing line of business.

What you will be doing:
Embrace and uphold Ibotta's Core Values: Integrity, Boldness, Outhustle, Teamwork, Transparency & A good idea can come from anywhere
Partner cross-functionally with the Data & Media team, leveraging proven data handling, processing, statistical and analytical skills to solve business problems
Using analytics to drive sales of three key products: external data feeds, targeted audiences, and advertisements on Ibotta's mobile app.
Build and maintain ETL pipelines to deliver data feeds to external clients
Communicating complex analyses and data intricacies in a clear, concise manner both internally as well as to external clients
Serving as a leader for the ideation, development, and support on strategic initiatives including statistical modeling and advanced analytics within the team
Work to enhance and automate current processes
Respond to time-sensitive requests and analyses
What we are looking for:
2+ years of practical work experience in Analytics
Bachelor's degree in computer science/mathematics/statistics/data science or equivalent experience
Moderate to advanced knowledge of common data science software development packages (Python, R, etc.) and their relevant libraries, along with strong SQL and proven data wrangling and feature engineering skills
Ability to communicate complex analytical concepts clearly and concisely both in written form and verbally to both technical and non-technical audiences, with a track record of strong partnerships with key stakeholders and clients across multiple functions
Ability to thrive in an agile environment and provide creative, actionable solutions/insights
Become the go-to expert around client data questions and requests
About Us:

Built in Denver, CO, Ibotta (""I bought a..."") is a free mobile shopping app that gives users cash back on groceries and more. Through our partnerships with brands and retailers like Procter & Gamble, Kraft Heinz, Kellogg, Amazon, Walmart, Target and Uber, we've delivered over $750 million in cumulative cash rewards to our Savers. Guided by our values and our mission to make every purchase rewarding, we come to work energized by the business problems we get to solve, the technology we get to build, and the people we get to innovate (and have fun) with. Ibotta made Inc.'s 2020 list of the 5000 fastest-growing private companies in the U.S. for the third consecutive year. In 2019, we became the first mobile consumer technology company in Colorado to achieve $1B in valuation.

To learn more about what our Tech teams are doing day to day, visit Building Ibotta on Medium.com

Additional Details:
This position is located in Denver, CO and includes competitive pay, benefits package (including medical, dental, vision), 401k, and equity.
Ibotta provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, and genetics.
Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis.
For the security of our employees and the business, all employees are responsible for the secure handling of data in accordance with our security policies, identifying and reporting phishing attempts, as well as reporting security incidents to the proper channels.",3.6,"Ibotta
3.6","Denver, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
135,Data Scientist - Two Sigma Insurance Quantified,$131k-$217k (Glassdoor Est.),"Two Sigma is a different kind of investment manager. Since 2001, we have used data science and technology to derive insights that forecast the future and discover value in markets worldwide. Our team of scientists, technologists and academics looks beyond traditional finance to understand the bigger picture and develop creative solutions to some of the world’s most challenging economic problems. Our work spans across markets and industries, from insurance and securities to private investments and new ventures.

Two Sigma IQ works closely with its industry partners to deliver products and solutions, which lead to enhanced automation and data-driven decision making. Comprised of a diversified and growing team of highly skilled data scientists, engineers, and business professionals, Two Sigma IQ possesses the agility and innovation of a dynamic startup with the resources and long-term view of Two Sigma. Learn more about TSIQ at https://twosigmaiq.com/

You will take on the following responsibilities:
Work with large, possibly unstructured datasets;
Perform exploratory data analysis and develop predictive models using large data sets
Carry out independent investigations/research studies and produce reports and visualizations to communicate your results;
Generate statistical models for a variety of phenomena;
Interact with industry professionals to understand their business and propose technical/statistical approaches;
Write libraries and research tools, developing and maintaining a research infrastructure to accelerate future results.

You should possess the following qualifications:
A strong academic record with at least one degree in a technical discipline.
Solid knowledge of Computer Science and Statistics.
Experience with data analysis tools (R, numpy/pandas/scikit-learn) and SQL.
Advanced programming skills in Python
Experience producing research reports and predictive models.
Good communication skills, both written and verbal.
Interest in working in a fast-paced and dynamic environment.

You will enjoy the following benefits:
Core Benefits: Fully paid medical and dental insurance premiums for employees and dependents, competitive 401k match, employer-paid life & disability insurance
Perks: Onsite gyms with laundry service, wellness activities, casual dress, snacks, game rooms
Learning: Tuition reimbursement, conference and training sponsorship
Time Off: Generous vacation and unlimited sick days, competitive paid caregiver leaves

We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or any other applicable legally protected characteristics.",4.4,"Two Sigma
4.4","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
136,Data Engineer - Python,$77k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Locations: TX - Plano, United States of America, Plano, Texas

Data Engineer - Python

Do you love building and pioneering in the technology space? Do you enjoy solving complex business problems in a fast-paced, collaborative, inclusive, and iterative delivery environment? At Capital One, you'll be part of a big group of makers, breakers, doers and disruptors, who love to solve real problems and meet real customer needs.

We are seeking Software Engineers who are passionate about marrying data with emerging technologies to join our team. As a Capital One Software Engineer, you’ll have the opportunity to be on the forefront of driving a major transformation within Capital One. Learn more about #lifeatcapitalone and our commitment to diversity & inclusion by jumping to slides 76-91 on our Corporate Social Responsibility Report.

What You’ll Do:

Collaborate with and across Agile teams to design, develop, test, implement, and support technical solutions in full-stack development tools and technologies

Work with a team of developers with deep experience in machine learning, distributed microservices, and full stack systems

Share your passion for staying on top of tech trends, experimenting with and learning new technologies, participating in internal & external technology communities, and mentoring other members of the engineering community

Collaborate with digital product managers, and deliver robust cloud-based solutions that drive powerful experiences to help millions of Americans achieve financial empowerment

Work with cloud native stack, build on AWS, use technologies like Kubernetes and Serverless

Basic Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree

At least 4 years of experience in software engineering

Preferred Qualifications:

Master's Degree

2+ years of experience in Agile practices

1+ years of experience with AWS, GCP, Microsoft Azure, or another public cloud service

4+ years of experience in at least one of the following: Java, Scala, Python, Go, Javascript/TypeScript, Angular/React.js, or Node.js

2+ years of experience working with big data technologies (e.g. Hadoop, Spark, Presto)

2+ years of experience working on streaming data applications (e.g. Kafka, Kinesis, Flink, or Spark Streaming)

4+ years of experience in open source frameworks

At this time, Capital One will not sponsor a new applicant for employment authorization for this position.",4.0,"Capital One - US
4.0","Plano, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
137,Senior Data Scientist (Remote),$82k-$141k (Glassdoor Est.),TMP advertising products is seeking a Sr. Data Scientist to support its efforts in building a leading performance media platform for recruitment.,3.5,"TMP Worldwide
3.5","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
138,Medical Lab Scientist Temporary,$17-$24 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Overview
About


Tower Health is a strong, regional, integrated healthcare provider/payer system that offers leading-edge, compassionate healthcare and wellness services to a population of 2.5 million people.

Together, our six hospitals and other entities provide a full range of medical care from prevention, screenings and education; to the latest clinical services and surgeries available; to rehabilitation. We also offer wellness programs and public health services that ensure our communities are the healthiest they can be. Our caring, highly trained physicians and staff are committed to patient safety and patient satisfaction.

Who We Are


With more than 11,000 team members, Tower Health includes Reading Hospital, a teaching hospital based in West Reading; Brandywine Hospital in Coatesville; Chestnut Hill Hospital, a teaching hospital in Philadelphia; Jennersville Hospital in West Grove; Phoenixville Hospital in Phoenixville; and Pottstown Hospital in Pottstown. We also operate Reading Hospital Rehabilitation at Wyomissing and Reading Hospital School of Health Sciences, and we have a comprehensive physician network. All of our facilities participate in our partnership with the UPMC Health Plan.

Collaboration across Tower Health enables our hospitals, providers, leadership and staff to leverage best practices across the health system. Our patients benefit from access to a broad range of services all right here in our region.

#LI



Responsibilities

The Medical Lab Scientist is responsible for evaluating and receiving incoming patient specimens and processes all testing in the Microbiology Lab. Must possess high level of quantitative skills, strong attention to detail, organizational skills, and be highly motivated in a fast-paced hospital environment. Responsibilities include: obtaining or receiving specimens, performing clinical laboratory tests by standardized procedures, understanding method principles, performing quality control, performing preventive maintenance, and interpreting results accurately, acceptably and within critical limits. The Medical Lab Scientist works independently, organizing work to meet established deadlines and validates all data obtained.

#LI



Qualifications

Bachelor's Degree: Baccalaureate Degree in Medical Technology, Clinical Laboratory Science, Medical Laboratory Science or related science (Required)
Minimum of 1 year of experience
Certification and Licensure Requirements. MLS (ASCP) (Preferred)

7:00AM-3:30PM, Rotating Weekends & Holidays
1-Day",3.0,"Tower Health
3.0","West Reading, PA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2017,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
139,Scientist - Raw Materials,$16k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB DESCRIPTION

PPD is a leading global contract research organization providing comprehensive, integrated drug development, laboratory and lifecycle management services. At PPD, we are passionate, deliberate, and driven by our purpose- to improve health!

PPD Laboratories offers the most comprehensive set of laboratory services available in the industry and continues to deliver innovative solutions to our clients through our collaborative approach, including PPD® Laboratories FSP. PPD® Laboratories FSP is a unique partnership that allows our clients to leverage the experience of our PPD staff, while allowing you, the employee, to gain direct experience working onsite at a pharmaceutical/ biopharmaceutical company, all while maintaining full-time benefits/advantages of being a part of PPD.

As a Scientist you will perform a variety of complex sample preparation and analysis procedures to quantitatively measure pharmaceutical and biopharmaceutical compounds in a variety of formulations and/or biological matrices.

At PPD we hire the best, develop ourselves and each other, and recognize the power of being one team. We offer continued career advancement opportunities, award winning training and benefits focused on the health and well being of our employees.

Position Summary:

Versatile, pharmaceutical product development GMP laboratory seeks a hardworking, results-focused analytical chemist with experience in supporting small molecule pharmaceutical programs at Bristol-Myers Squibb. The position will require position relevant expertise in vibrational spectroscopic and physical testing of drug substances, drug products, excipients and raw materials used in the manufacturing and formulation of clinical small molecule drug substances and clinical drug products. This position will be located at the BMS New Brunswick, NJ (NBR) site, reporting directly to a Lab Manager within the GxP Raw Materials Group of the Analytical Strategy & Operations (ASO) department.

Duties and Responsibilities:
Essential Duties and Responsibilities include, but are not limited to, the following:
• Demonstrate practical knowledge of analytical techniques to contribute to development of phase-appropriate robust and reproducible analytical methods for use in the GMP clinical laboratory.
• Independently perform analytical testing including but not limited to FTIR, NIR and Raman spectroscopy methods, color & appearance tests, hardness testing, pH measurements, compendial methods, and wet chemistry techniques. Executed tests support clinical release and stability testing of drug substances, drug products, excipients and raw materials used in the manufacturing and formulation of clinical small molecule drug substances and clinical drug products.
• Independently execute analytical method qualifications, validations and transfers (as applicable) to QC laboratories. Carefully adhere to approved protocols.
• Contribute to study design and the authoring of analytical methods, protocols and reports.
• Maintain clear, complete, accurate and GMP-compliant documentation for experiments.
• Proactively provide clear, timely communication of potential issues to management.
• Organize and present data for internal and external scientific meetings.

PPD Defining Principles:

We have a strong will to win - We earn our customer’s trust - We are gamechangers - We do the right thing - We are one PPD -

If you resonate with our five principles above, and ultimately wish to accelerate the delivery of safe and effective therapeutics for some of the world’s most urgent health needs, then please submit your application – we’d love to hear from you.

PPDFSP

Job Qualification

Education and Experience:

Bachelor's degree or equivalent and relevant formal academic / vocational qualification

Previous experience that provides the knowledge, skills, and abilities to perform the job (comparable to 2+ years).

In some cases, an equivalency, consisting of a combination of appropriate education, training and/or directly related experience, will be considered sufficient for an individual to meet the requirements of the role.

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:

The candidate must demonstrate good communication skills, particularly in documentation of data and writing reports and methods. Skill in communicating/escalating critical issues to appropriate team leaders and functional area management is necessary.

At least one year of experience in a GMP regulated lab is required.

The candidate must be able to deliver when working under assigned timelines.

Understanding of cGMP/GLP and GDPs practices and EHS requirements is essential. Ability to comply with all applicable SOPs, internal ADT requirements and external regulations is a must.

Expertise in MS Office applications, in particular MS Word and Excel, is required. Familiarity with electronic documentation systems (e.g. Qumas, Infinity, Syncade-DCA) for routing protocols/reports, investigation reports for review and approval is a plus.

Experience in use of scientific reporting applications and ELN software, e.g., VelQuest, Symyx and LIMS, preferred.

Demonstrated knowledge of multiple applicable techniques such as: HPLC, UV-Vis, FT-IR, NIR, Raman Spectroscopy methods, color and appearance tests, hardness testing, pH measuremetns, compendial methods, and wet chemistry techniques.

Proficient in Microsoft Excel and Word

Proven ability to interpret data by performing trend analysis

Proven ability in technical writing skills

Ability to independently optimize analytical methods

Proven problem solving and troubleshooting abilities

Good written and oral communication skills

Time management and project management skills

Ability to work in a collaborative work environment with a team

Working Environment:

PPD values the health and well being of our employees. We support and encourage individuals to create a healthy and balanced environment where they can thrive. Below is listed the working environment/requirements for this role:

Able to communicate, receive, and understand information and ideas with diverse groups of people in a comprehensible and reasonable manner.

Able to work upright and stationary and/or standing for typical working hours.

Able to lift and move objects up to 25 pounds

Able to work in non-traditional work environments.

Able to use and learn standard office equipment and technology with proficiency.

May have exposure to potentially hazardous elements, including infectious agents, typically found in healthcare or laboratory environments.

Able to perform successfully under pressure while prioritizing and handling multiple projects or activities.

Diversity Statement
PPD is proud to be an affirmative action employer that values diversity as a strength and fosters an environment of mutual respect. PPD is committed to providing equal employment opportunities without regard to age, race, color, pregnancy, national origin, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, disability, veteran status or status within any other protected group.",3.8,"PPD
3.8","New Brunswick, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
140,Data Analyst,$53k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Nexon, a world leader in online games, is building a workplace based on mutual respect, good humor, and the pursuit of excellence because we believe that great games can only be built by amazing people. Our vision is to create high quality, innovative online games that create unforgettable experiences for players around the world.

Nexon has an ever-expanding worldwide team of over 6,000 employees and boasts a diverse global portfolio that includes titles like MapleStory, Dungeon Fighter Online, KartRider and many more. If you want to be part of building an exciting game company and help chart the course of online gaming, let's talk!

Job Description

The Data Analyst is responsible for providing in-depth data mining and data analyses to multiple departments, with a focus on understanding our customers and identifying ways to improve the user experience within our games.

JOB RESPONSIBILITIES:
Identify, design, prioritize and develop data analyses to create unique business insights; perform detailed data exploration and validation to understand customers
Identify key analytic metrics; build reports and present key insights to ensure that data drives actions to improve the business; examine and analyze available information to determine patterns and gaps at a strategic level and recommend a course of action to support internal and external users
Research and analyze web and game usage data and recommend solutions; analyze user experience and business processes in order to identify opportunities for improvement
Document business needs, prioritize requested functionality, and validate requirements against strategic goals and project objectives
Provide reporting and performance monitoring by using data drawn from diverse sources
Other duties as assigned
Type of Decisions made by this position?
Analyze game data and make recommendations for improvement
Prioritize data requests
Documentation of the department's business needs
Work Experience
3+ years of experience in data analytics or a related field
2+ years of experience with analytics software such as Google Analytics
2+ years' experience with Marketing Intelligence Platforms such as Singular
Experience with data extraction and manipulation tools and Data Mining tools
Online gaming experience preferred
Education, Professional Training, Technical Training or Certification
Master's Degree preferred or Bachelor's degree with equivalent experience
Knowledge/Skills
Excellent knowledge of statistical analysis
Ability to extract data by writing your own SQL queries
Experience using Tableau or similar BI tools
Programming for data analysis (R or Python) preferred
Strong interpersonal and communication skills
Able to manage shifting priorities in a fast-paced environment
Exceptional Excel and PowerPoint skills
Excellent time and project management skills
Management has the right to add or change duties and job requirements at any time.

Nexon's benefits and perks:

We offer medical, dental and vision plans for you, your spouse or domestic partner, and your children. Employees who enroll in the high deductible health plan receive an annual employer contribution to a health savings account and company paid hospital indemnity benefits. We also provide company-paid life, AD&D, short-term and long-term disability benefits as well as access to voluntary life and AD&D for yourself and your dependents, flexible spending accounts, a 401(k) savings plan with a company match, and pet insurance. Nexies are encouraged to take advantage of our monthly wellness credit, participate in lunchtime yoga, and enroll in language classes. We host bi-monthly catered lunches, monthly happy hours, and maintain a well-stocked snack bar. To help you maintain a good work-life balance, we offer paid time off, sick days, company holidays, and a year-end break.

Nexon is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, national origin, protected veteran status, or any other basis protected by applicable law and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.

]]>",2.6,"Nexon America Inc
2.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Public,Video Games,Media,$10+ billion (USD),-1
141,"Scientist, Discovery Biology",$65k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"NGM Biopharmaceuticals, Inc. is a biopharmaceutical company dedicated to discovering and developing the next generation of medicines for the treatment of serious diseases. Our experienced scientific team has joined forces with an impressive group of industry professionals, Nobel Laureates and other distinguished researchers to build a company where innovation and cutting-edge science has provided the foundation for a robust drug discovery engine that has a track record of generating one new IND candidate per year. NGM’s current pipeline of clinical-stage programs consists of five drug candidates targeting liver and metabolic diseases, retinal diseases and cancer. The most advanced drug candidate, aldafermin (NGM282), is in Phase 2b clinical studies in non-alcoholic steatohepatitis (NASH) and is wholly-owned by NGM. Another drug candidate, NGM621, is in a Phase 2 study in geographic atrophy (GA) secondary to age-related macular degeneration (AMD). NGM’s strategic collaboration with Merck, with a current term running to March 2022, provides us with the resources and flexibility to pursue our ambitious R&D goals and further extend our pipeline of novel drug candidates.

NGM is excited to hire a passionate biologist to join our discovery biology team. This role will involve creatively thinking about biomedical problems and independent design and execution of experiments with the goal of advancing biologic medicines to clinical development. An ideal candidate will be a soon-to-be or recent PhD graduate in the life sciences with a big-picture understanding of mammalian biology.
Responsibilities
Designing and executing independent experiments
Consistent critical review of scientific and patent literature
Presenting to internal project teams and R&D Leadership
Liaising with Commercial Research Organizations (CROs) and academic collaborators
Lead select research meetings
Working with a team to develop assays and perform experiments
Teaching techniques to collaborators and research associates
Competencies
Deep understanding of mammalian biology
Substantial mammalian cell culture experience
Substantive experience with in-vivo models experiments
Proficiency in experimental design and execution
Excellent communication skills, and ability to consistently understand and articulate scientific concepts and interpret data
Excellent project management skills
Well-versed in Excel and Graph Pad Prism
Qualifications
PhD in biological sciences, with 0-2 years of experience since graduating
Track record of high-impact publications and presentations
Deeply passionate about Biology and scientific discovery
NGM offers a creative, collaborative, highly challenging scientific environment, along with a strong compensation package that includes salary, stock options, employee stock purchase program participation, 401(k) and a comprehensive, industry-leading, benefits package.

Interested applicants should apply through the NGM Biopharmaceuticals website: https://www.ngmbio.com/open-positions/
We have become aware of false offers of employment being made by individuals impersonating NGM representatives in order to collect personal information and/or payment. Please exercise caution when receiving unsolicited recruiting offers. NGM always lists all open positions on the NGM careers page and all employment applications must be submitted through our online portal. NGM will never solicit payment or payment information from candidates. Please be advised that NGM is not currently hiring in any countries other than the US. We never request that candidate information be sent to a non-ngmbio.com email address.

Note to Recruitment Agencies: Please do not forward any agency résumés. NGM Bio is not responsible for any fees related to résumés that are unsolicited.",3.5,"Ngm Biopharmaceuticals
3.5","South San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
142,"Senior Research Associate/Associate Scientist, Immuno-Oncology",$38k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Research Associate/Associate Scientist, Immuno-Oncology
Location


Agios Pharmaceuticals HQ

Job Code

1271

# of openings

1

Apply Now

Senior Research Associate/Associate Scientist, Immuno-Oncology

Agios (agios.com) is a biopharmaceutical company committed to applying our scientific leadership in cellular metabolism to transform the lives of patients with cancer and rare genetic diseases. We have an active research and discovery pipeline across both therapeutic areas. Agios has multiple first-in-class investigational therapies in clinical and/or preclinical development and has successfully launched two oncology precision medicines.

Agios Pharmaceuticals is searching for a dynamic Senior Research Associate/Associate Scientist to join our growing Immuno-Oncology team. The Senior Research Associate/Associate Scientist will collaborate cross-functionally with scientists at Agios to generate data to support the novel target discovery screens, validation of targets using both in vitro cell assays and in vivo mouse models of cancer and inflammation. The ideal candidate will integrate with project teams and contribute to study design, execution, data analysis and interpretation, and communication of results. A considerable level of independence is expected after the initial training period. This role requires a high degree of technical expertise as well as strong collaborative and written/verbal communication skills and a positive attitude to interact with multiple stakeholders.

Key Responsibilities
Develop and characterize immune-cancer cells co-culture assays to be used for genetic screens of novel therapeutic targets
Design and execute studies to support target validation using cell based models and assays
Identify methods, models, and technologies required to facilitate research and overcome scientific challenges and lead their development/optimization
Document, analyze, and interpret experimental data; present results and conclusions in a variety of team settings
Minimum Requirements
BS with 5+/MS with 2+ years of industry/academic experience working in a cancer biology or immunology team
Experience in isolation of primary immune cells and ex vivo assays of immune cell function (e.g. proliferation, differentiation, cytokine production)
Experienced with multi-color flow cytometry
Strong oral and written communication skills
Demonstrated ability to work independently in a cross-functional team environment
Ability to rapidly learn new techniques and technologies and perform them independently
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with mouse tumor models and/or models of acute immune activation
Experience with both shRNA and/or CRISPR techniques
Experience in molecular biology (nucleic acid purification, DNA cloning, PCR, gel electrophoresis, Western blotting, and qPCR)",4.2,"Agios Pharmaceuticals
4.2","Cambridge, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
143,"Scientist, Tumor Immunology, Discovery Research",-1,"ArsenalBio’s mission is to develop efficacious and safe cellular therapies for patients with chronic diseases, initially cancer. Our products are being designed to herald the transition of adoptive cell therapy from a hospital based treatment to outpatient therapy, like most other cancer treatments. Our people are our greatest asset, they bring scientific talents in molecular biology, immunology, pharmacology, protein chemistry, computational biology, automation, genome engineering, software and other fields to make the future happen now.

We are seeking an outstanding Scientist to lead our tumor immunology discovery efforts to build multicellular immune assays to enable novel target discovery, with a goal of designing synthetic circuits to build next generation cell therapies. Strongest consideration will be given to candidates with demonstrated expertise in immune assay development and molecular immunology and whose research interests are relevant to the problem of T cell development, mechanisms of immunosuppression, and next generation adoptive cell therapies. The successful candidate is expected to effectively lead cross-functional teams.
What You Will Do
Lead efforts to design and execute novel cell-based functional assays to select candidate molecules for integration into synthetic cell circuits
Discover and evaluate novel mechanisms of tumor resistance to innate and adaptive immunity
Design and execute drug mechanism of action studies using in vitro and in vivo models, leveraging techniques such as cell sorting, high-dimensional flow cytometry, immunohistochemistry/immunofluorescence, primary immune cell assays and 3D/organoid/explant assays
Drive scientific and technical innovation collaboratively with other members of ArsenalBio
Provide exceptional scientific leadership and mentorship to scientists and research associates
What You Will Bring
PhD, MD, DVM, or MD/DVM-PhD with at least 3 years of relevant post-doctoral research experience in Immunology, Biochemistry or Molecular Biology
A strong work ethic, a steadfast commitment to discovery research and a documented ability to initiate, drive and complete research projects, as evidenced by a strong publication record
Ability to manage an independent research program and to lead a cross-functional research team
Outstanding written and oral communication skills and the ability to organize and communicate complex data sets in a clear and concise manner to key stakeholders from diverse backgrounds are essential
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status

To all recruitment agencies: ArsenalBio does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, or Arsenalbio employees. ArsenalBio is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",5.0,"Arsenal Biosciences
5.0","South San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
144,Data Analyst,$30k-$55k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who we are...

Connecting people in a more meaningful way is not just what BombBombs software delivers - its what drives our teams every day. Through simple, personal video, we aim to Rehumanize communication. Our team is resourceful and intelligent. Competitive and collaborative. Fun-loving and tenacious. Were close-knit and love adding new talent to the mix. If you are seeking a dynamic workplace and new challenges, we want to hear from you!

Who we're looking for...

A Data Analyst eager to learn and and collaborate with those around them to derive powerful data insights from large data sets. An Analyst who thrives on getting into the details and developing high quality reporting capabilities. An analyst who is committed to analyzing, organizing and gathering large amounts of data to discover new patterns and assisted in identify what data is important to the business.

What you will do...
Provide quality assurance of data in the data warehouse, by studying, cleaning, organizing, and resolving data weaknesses
Works with data engineers and business analysts to develop clarity, consistency, and unity in dimension and fact tables.
Create, organize, and maintain metadata. Make data assets understandable and usable for data consumers.
Collaborate with data engineers and organizational leaders to identify opportunities for process improvements and recommend opportunities for data source improvement.
Develop, manage, and monitor reports and dashboards in Tableau to ensure data quality and assistant is data validation
Presents data insights and recommendations to key stakeholders.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
How you'll do it...

Embody BombBombs core values: Relationships, Fun, Humility, Flexibility and Service
Analytical: Able to structure and process qualitative or quantitative data and draw conclusions from it.
Commitment to quality: Dedicated to ensuring accuracy and precision in daily tasks and projects.
Persistent: Tenacity and willingness to go the distance to get something done.
Teamwork: Reaches out to peers & supervisors to create a collaborative work environment.
Self-Starter: Motivated to take initiative on projects or tasks, assembling the resources required to complete the objective.
Communication: Communicate clearly, concisely, and courteously with the ability to give a detailed explanation if necessary.
Flexibility: Must be able to multitask in a fast-paced environment and adapt to new challenges as they arise.
Our ideal candidate will be or have...
Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, Economics, or equivalent experience
1+ years of experience in data analytics, business intelligence, or other data and reporting environments
Strong SQL skills and experience in querying common databases like Oracle, Redshift (PostgreSQL), big data.
Experience with data visualization tools (Tableau, PowerBi, or Excel)
AWS familiarity (S3, DynamoDB, Athena, Redshift)
Data modeling, understanding of basic data warehouse concepts
BombBomb Benefits Package Includes...
Excellent Medical, Dental and Vision Benefits for you and your family (2 PPO + HSA option)
Flexible Paid Time Off program
7 paid holidays
401k Plan with employer match
Monthly company-catered lunch
Fun workplace: happy hour every Friday and company game room
Annual Education / Development for your career growth
Powered by JazzHR",4.1,"BombBomb
4.1","Colorado Springs, CO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
145,Data Analyst (Underwriting & Lending Industry),-1,"Do you find yourself searching for a truly unique working environment? Do you have a go-getter attitude? Well, are you ready to take on a new challenge? We have an exciting opportunity for a Data Analyst (Underwriting & Lending) to join Dot818’s growing team!

We’re looking for a special kind of candidate – someone who appreciates challenging projects, is comfortable working with a supportive team, and hungers for the freedom to think outside of the box. We also want you to care about our core values too. We have a deep commitment to success, we build strong relationships through tenacious effort, and we keep a firm focus on our client’s needs. If this sounds like your dream job, take the first step toward joining our team and apply now with your resume.

The Data Analyst is expected to thoroughly understand the credit/lending risk domain, and frequently use industry specific risk analysis best practices when operating and building predictive models. The ideal candidate would be able to design new models, frameworks, dashboards, and other tools.
Job Requirements*
You should be able to:
Develop and implement underwriting and credit risk assessment data models
Track various data metrics within the lending industry
Close interaction with IT Team to design/improve data architecture
Identify optimization opportunities using predictive modeling
Develop and implement advanced custom models and algorithms
Develop tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy
Investigate new data sets and identify strategic opportunities for improving servicing for our customers
Build out new data flows as our product changes, and produce high-value, timely analytics relevant to the lending and underwriting industry
Qualifications*
Master’s degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, or any other quantitative discipline
At least 3 years’ experience in the Fintech industry working with financial underwriting models, variables, and risk assessment models.
Knowledge of R, Python, SQL
Rigorous statistical intuition, deep understanding of core statistical principles, and extensive experience with core methods
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms
Skills*
You are highly organized with the ability to multi-task and prioritize in a fast-paced culture
You are a critical thinker and able to problem solve
You have strong verbal communication skills
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms
What We Offer*
Competitive compensation package
Casual Fridays and major holidays off
Flexible work environment with a close-knit family feel
Paid time off, company-sponsored 401k, and employee health and wellness benefits
Company luncheons, outings, after-hour events, and team building festivities
Workplace perks such as healthy snacks, fresh brewed organic coffee, and employee discounts
Company sponsored gym membership
Company provided parking
Last, but not least, you will get to work with an amazing group of people!
If you have the experience, drive to succeed and have a can-do attitude then we are looking for you. Click apply and come join a fast-growing technology company!*
Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Data Analyst: 3 years (Required)
Underwriting and Lending analysis: 1 year (Required)
Location:
Glendale, CA (Required)",5.0,"Dot818, LLC.
5.0","Glendale, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
146,Senior Digital and Data Science Manager,$161k-$257k (Glassdoor Est.),"This is your opportunity to join a growing, dynamic group and lead exciting and transformative digital initiatives. Grow your experience with data science and computer systems lifecycle and validation in a biopharmaceutical company with a great work environment.

Primary Duties:

Oversee the design, implementation, validation, change management, and maintenance of digital and data analytics systems and procedures (e.g. SIMCA).
Have specific subject matter expertise in process analytics and working knowledge of distributed control systems, PI historian, Statistica, LIMS, JMP and other multivariate process analytical tools.
Have the expertise to identify potential improvement projects utilizing advanced analytics and process knowledge (PAT, QBD, etc).
Take ownership of the user experience of deployable systems.
Acts as a data steward for the site. Supervises the work of contract and junior personnel.
Work as an administrator role for Statistica software system.
Working in commercial manufacturing facility and GxP experience is required.
Previous project management experience implementing similar systems/programs at other biotech or biopharma companies is also required.
Strong cross functional collaboration skills are essential

Responsibilities:
40%

A key part of this role will be leading and continuing the implementation of real-time multivariate and predictive analytics platforms in support of clinical and commercial manufacturing.
This will include defining and owning the all user requirements, models documentation, and other design and implementation documents (e.g. functional specifications, configuration specifications, etc).
Have expertise in multivariate modeling methods, including PCA/PLS, OPLS, Discriminant analysis, etc and work with subject matter expert to collect and process data for use in creating models, utilizing a variety of automated tools (e.g. VBA, R/Python, etc).
The individual will be able to assess and design a phased approach in the project plan based on readiness of peripheral systems, design and building of process models and capital/resource availability.

30%

Managing software solution implementations throughout lifecycle from conception to validation and maintenance.
Working with IT and Automation to implement solutions and interfaces supporting data science applications.
Create training and communications for business users to enable visibility and effective use of solutions.

20%

Process Data Storage and Communication –Develop and maintain a standardized system for storing and communicating process data.
This will include all key process indicators that will be routinely monitoring by PTS floor support and communicated on an exception basis.
It will also include a subset of process run data that is readily available and routinely communicate to external customers (Mfg.) and cross functional partners (QA and MS&T).
This responsibility also includes ensuring uptime and working with Automation and IT to troubleshoot any server, connection, or configuration issues.

10%

Technical Support – As part of the Digital and Data Sciences team within Manufacturing Sciences the individual may be required to provide technical support of ongoing routine event response, containment and investigation support of GMP and/or clinical operations as they align with experience and expertise.

Education and Experience Requirements:

The ideal candidate will have a BS in technical discipline with 8+ years of experience, MS with 6+ years or PhD with 4+ years of applicable process automation, process analytics, technical support or process/facility design experience
Experience with some of the following: database design, process historian/data collection systems and data analysis/reporting applications such as SIMCA, PI Historian, PI Process Book, Excel, JMP and Statistica/ Discoverant, OPC DA and UA technologies is a must. Proven ability to write maintainable code in programming languages (eg. Python, R).
Experience with SDLC and CSV methodology and compliance standards for project deliverables – Requirements, Design & Development, Validation, SOPs, and Training
A sound technical knowledge of major unit operations associated with biologics manufacturing such as cell culture, recovery, fluid transfer, filtration, chromatography, CIP/SIP, and UF/DF processes is required.
Design or operational experience with large-scale cell culture and protein purification for both clinical and commercial processes is also preferred.

Key Skills, Abilities, and Competencies:

Candidate must have expertise in cGMPs and statistical analysis methods.
As an active participant on multiple cross-functional teams, the candidate must demonstrate excellent written and verbal communication skills.
The candidate must also provide guidance and leadership for junior team members for strong working relationship with key business partners and stakeholders and across all cross functional groups.

Notice to Employment / Recruitment Agents:

Employment / Recruitment agents may only submit candidates for vacancies only if they have written authorization to do so from Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda’s Talent Acquisition department. Any agency candidate submission may only be submitted to positions opened to the agency through the specific Agency Portal. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda will only pay a fee for candidates submitted or presented where there is a fully executed contract in place between the Employment / Recruitment agents and Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda and only if the candidate is submitted via the Agency Portal. Candidates submitted or presented by Employment / Recruitment Agents without a fully executed contract or submitted through this site shall not be deemed to form part of any Engagement for which the Agency may claim remuneration.

Equal Employment Opportunity

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

EEO is the Law - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf

EEO is the Law – Supplement - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/OFCCP_EEO_Supplement_Final_JRF_QA_508c.pdf

Pay Transparency Policy - https://www.dol.gov/ofccp/pdf/pay-transp_formattedESQA508c.pdf

Reasonable Accommodations

Shire, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Takeda, is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodation to individuals with disabilities. If, because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application process, or in order to perform the essential functions of a position, please call 484-595-8400 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Lexington, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
147,"Sr. Associate Scientist / Scientist I, Functional Genomics",$81k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who we are

Since 2006, 23andMe's mission has been to help people access, understand, and benefit from the human genome. We are a group of passionate individuals pushing the boundaries of what's possible to help turn genetic insight into better health and personal understanding.

23andMe's Therapeutics team is committed to discovering and developing new therapies that can offer significant benefits for patients. This dedicated research and development group in South San Francisco identifies novel targets using 23andMe's genetic database and performs preclinical research to advance programs for disease areas with high unmet need.

We are seeking a highly motivated Sr. Associate Scientist or Scientist I to join a collaborative, cross-functional research team committed to the discovery and development of novel therapeutics. Successful candidates will be independent and creative researchers with the ability to apply a variety of functional genomics approaches, including but not limited to single cell RNA-seq, to early research programs in immuno-oncology, immunology, oncology and other disease areas.

More information about our Therapeutics team is available at https://therapeutics.23andme.com/.

What you'll do

Generate, visualize, interpret and present omics data sets including but not limited to bulk and single-cell RNA-seq, ChIP-seq, ATAC-seq and MPRA
Develop and establish novel methods for variant to gene mapping and gene to function studies using a range of genomic perturbation technologies
Collaborate with therapeutic leads and computational biologists to design and analyze functional genomics experiments to address critical questions for target ID, validation or mechanism of action studies
Identify opportunities to apply functional genomics approaches to provide insights into novel genetic associations

What you'll bring

PhD (+ min of 2 years' experience), Master's (+min of 5 years' experience) or Bachelor's (+ min of 7 years' experience) in Biology, Genetics, Immunology or related field with a proven track record of applying functional genomics technologies
Strong technical expertise in molecular biology including NGS library preparation, 10X Genomics scRNA-seq platform, cloning, DNA and RNA purification and diverse PCR methods
Cell biology expertise including mammalian cell culture, lentiviral transduction, transfection and running functional cell-based assays
Familiarity with languages such as Perl, Python and/or R for running omics data analysis pipelines and visualization of those data
Excellent organizational and communication skills with the ability to work independently and collaboratively in a fast-paced team environment

Pluses

Experience with CROPseq or Perturbseq
Experience with flow cytometry/FACS
Experience leading cross-disciplinary project teams
Experience managing people

Note: Job title will be commensurate with experience and academic credentials

About Us

23andMe, Inc. is the leading consumer genetics and research company. Founded in 2006, the mission of the company is to help people access, understand, and benefit from the human genome. The company was named by Glassdoor as one of the Best Places to Work in 2019, MIT Technology Review to its ""50 Smartest Companies, 2017"" list, and named one of Fast Company's ""25 Brands That Matter Now, 2017"". 23andMe has millions of customers worldwide, with more than 80 percent of customers consented to participate in research. More information is available at www.23andMe.com.

At 23andMe, we value a diverse, inclusive workforce and we provide equal employment opportunity for all applicants and employees. All qualified applicants for employment will be considered without regard to an individual's race, color, sex, gender identity, gender expression, religion, age, national origin or ancestry, citizenship, physical or mental disability, medical condition, family care status, marital status, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, genetic information, military or veteran status, or any other basis protected by federal, state or local laws. If you are unable to submit your application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at accomodations-ext@23andme.com. 23andMe will reasonably accommodate qualified individuals with disabilities to the extent required by applicable law.

Please note: 23andMe does not accept agency resumes and we are not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes. Thank you.",4.2,"23andMe
4.2","South San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
148,Cloud Data Engineer,$53k-$100k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are!

At Maven Wave, we are relentless in hiring the industrys top talent. Each employee is hand-picked not only for their skills, but for their personality and broad expertise. We are looking for this rare combination of talent that sets us apart in the industry.

Maven Wave helps leading companies make the shift to digital and shorten the fuse to innovation. We combine the expertise of top-tier consulting with the agility of a cutting-edge technology firm. This multidisciplinary blend of skills allows us to create unique digital advantages for our clients. Maven Waves digital solutions are agile, mobile, rooted in analytics, and built in the cloud.


Maven Wave, Google, and YOU: Help us build data driven cloud solutions.

We are looking for a skilled Cloud Data Engineer to design, build, and test data ingestion and ETL programs with a strong focus on performance and data quality management.

Your Life As a Maven:
Build and implement complex data solutions in the cloud (AWS, GCP and/or Microsoft).
Uncover and recommend remediations for data quality anomalies.
Investigate, recommend and implement data ingestion and ETL performance improvements.
Document data ingestion and ETL program designs, present findings, conduct peer code reviews.
Develop and execute test plans to validate code.
Your Expertise:
4+ years experience building complex ETL programs with Informatica, DataStage, Spark, Dataflow, etc.
3+ years experience in Python and/or Java, developing complex SQL queries, and working with relational database technologies.
Experience configuring big data solutions in a cloud environment (AWS, Azure or GCP).
Experience using cloud storage and computing technologies such as BigQuery, RedShift, or Snowflake.
Experience developing complex technical and ETL programs within a Hadoop ecosystem.
Must have a bachelors degree in Computer Science, Technology, Computer Information Systems, Computer Applications, Engineering, or a related field.
Your X-Factor:
Aptitude - You have an innate capacity to transition from project to project without skipping a beat.
Communication - You have excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordination across projects and teams.
Impact - You are a critical thinker with an emphasis on creativity and innovation.
Passion - You have the drive to succeed paired with a continuous hunger to learn.
Leadership - You are trusted, empathetic, accountable, and empower others around you.
Why Were Proud To Be Mavens!
Google Cloud North America Services Partner of the Year 2019, 2018
#21 Best Workplaces in Chicago, FORTUNE, 2018
Great Place To Work Certification, Great Place to Work, 2017 & 2018
Fast Fifty, Crain's Chicago Business
101 Best and Brightest Companies to Work For, National Association for Business Resources (NABR)
Top Google Cloud Partner, Clutch
Fastest Growing Consulting Firms in North America (#11, #37), Consulting Magazine
Top IT Services Companies, Clutch
Google Global Rising Star Partner of the Year
Ready to Learn More?
Life as a Maven
Check out the Data Team
See what Glassdoor has to say
Real Customer Stories",4.4,"Maven Wave Partners
4.4","Chicago, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
149,Data Scientist,-1,"MUST BE A U.S. CITIZEN WITH AN ACTIVE TS/SCI-SSBI SECURITY CLEARANCE *
Ability to develop analytics for multiple cyber weapon systems with many different infrastructure and end-point devices. Ability to incorporate predictive, descriptive, and presumptive modeling; machine learning; artificial intelligence into analytics. Must be able to code proficiently in one or more of the following languages: Python, R, Scala, Spark, and Maven. Develop algorithms in one or more of the following Machine Learning areas: anomaly detection, one/few-shot learning, deep learning, unsupervised feature learning, ensemble methods, probabilistic graphical models, reinforcement learning. Ability to develop analytics based upon the Mitre ATT&CK Matrix or other applicable CS&D framework to discover, identify, characterize, and/or create signatures for cyberspace threat activity. Ability to assist in the development and implementation of a data analytics program. Develop robust documentation and comprehensive user manuals for all developed projects

Original Hire Document for data scientist below:

Job Responsibilities:

· Perform big data analysis on information technology infrastructure and end-point devices

· Customer outreach and engagement

· Problem solving

· Time management

· Collaborate with others

· Mission focused

· Deliver findings

· Accept and assess customer data, dashboard, requirements

· Identify new ways to visualize and analyze data

· Develop analytics to identify anomalous activity based on customer requirements

· Perform hunt operations identifying anomalous activity

· Produce reports based on misconfigurations and/or anomalous activity discovered through analysis

Knowledge/Skills Ability:

Required:

· Ability to analyze and assess software development or data acquisition requirements and determine optimum, cost-effective solutions.

· Proficiency in one or more big data programming languages, such as R, Python, Scala, or Spark and Maven.

· Experience working with a hybrid team of analysts, visualization experts, engineers, and developers to conduct research, and build and deploy complex, but easy-to-use analytical platforms.

· Previous experience performing research in Data Analytics or big data.

· Be Director of Central Intelligence Directives 6/4 eligible (Top Secret) with a current Single Scope Background Investigation (SSBI)

Minimum Experience/Education:

· At least one (1) of the following:

· Four (4) years experience in cyberspace operations

· IAT Level 1 per DoD 8140 (Net+, Sec+, etc.)

· Experience on National/Service cyber weapon system/platform within last five years

Highly Desired:

· Education/ Certifications:

· 4+ years of experience in data analytics or quantitative intelligence analysis

· Four (4) years of experience in an intelligence field at a tactical or operational level

· DoD 8570 IAT related BA/BS degree

\*BEAT LLC IS AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER - DISABILITY AND VETERANS\*

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee discount
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
10 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Data Analytics: 4 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
License:
CompTIA Security+ (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Required)
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.9,"B E A T LLC
4.9","San Antonio, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Telecommunications Services,Telecommunications,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
150,Lead Data Scientist - Experimentation & Inference,$119k-$186k (Glassdoor Est.),"Faire is an online wholesale marketplace built on the belief that the future is local there are over 1M independent retailers in the U.S. and Canada doing more than twice the revenue of Walmart and Amazon combined. At Faire, we're using the power of tech, data, and machine learning to connect a thriving community of over 100,000 brands and local retailers around the world. Picture your favorite boutique in town we help them discover the best products to sell in their stores. With the right tools and insights, we believe that we can level the playing field so that small businesses can compete with these big box and ecommerce giants. We're looking for smart, resourceful and passionate people to join us as we power the shop local movement.

Job Description

At Faire we build elegant and efficient products to deliver superior customer experiences and enhance marketplace efficiency at the same time. From the mobile checkout process, to personalized search ranking, to the intelligent underwriting engine that determines credit limits for retailers---we are constantly iterating and innovating our product offering to create more value for the ecosystem. Experimentation and inference serves as the foundation for such an innovative process and is absolutely critical to high quality decision-making at Faire.

We're looking for someone who's comfortable working on difficult inference problems using both cutting edge and proven techniques. As a foundational member of a fast-growing company and team, you will be working closely with other data scientists, engineers, and product managers to drive a culture of causal reasoning, to develop methods in experimentation and causal inference for data scientists and engineers, and to implement features that improve the design, analysis, and interpretation of the large volume of experiments we run each week.

What you will be doing:
Work on cutting edge inference problems involving a wide variety of data about our retailers, brands and products to power rigorous decision-making and help our customers succeed.
Develop methods and tools that increase the rigor and efficiency of our experimentation platform and analyses that are constructed using causal inference techniques.
Write and collaborate on production code with engineers to implement new inference methods and improve experimentation related pipelines.
Consult with other team members across Faire on complicated experimental designs and on analyses estimating causal effects.
Stay aware of academic literature and industry best practices around experimentation & causal inference and be a champion of good statistical practices at Faire.
What it takes:
Advanced degree in a relevant discipline such as statistics, economics, econometrics, mathematics, computer science, operations research, etc.
2+ years of industry experience using experimentation and causal inference to solve real world problems with large datasets.
Experience and excitement with one or more of the following: advanced statistical techniques for A/B testing, methods for experimental design, observational causal inference, or quasi-experimental analysis. Examples include: quantile testing, sequential testing, variance reduction techniques, variance estimation for ratio metrics, multi-level / hierarchical modeling, matching methods, regression adjustment, structural equation models, instrumental variables, regression discontinuity design, etc.
Resourcefulness and proactiveness: track record for executing independent projects and leading complex, multi-functional projects with several dependencies.
Strong communication skills: can effectively and patiently work with others in a closely collaborative team environment and evangelize experimentation to the organization.
Proficiency with Python / R and SQL.
Why you'll love working at Faire:
We are entrepreneurs: We believe entrepreneurship is a calling and our mission is to empower entrepreneurs to chase their dreams. Every member of our team is an owner of the business and taking part in the founding process.
We are using tech and machine learning to level the playing field: We are using the power of technology and data to connect brands and boutiques from all over the world, building a thriving community of over 100,000 small business owners.
We build products our customers love: Everything we do is ultimately in the service of helping our customers grow their business because our goal is to grow the pie - not steal a piece from it. Running a small business is hard work, but using Faire makes it easy.
We are curious and resourceful: We always find a way to get the job done and come up with creative solutions to whatever problems are standing in our way. People at Faire are insatiably curious. We lead with curiosity and data in our decision making and reason from a first principles mindset.
Faire was founded in 2017 by a team of early product and engineering leads from Square. We're backed by some of the top investors in retail and tech including: Y Combinator, Lightspeed Venture Partners, Forerunner Ventures, Khosla Ventures, Sequoia Capital, Founders Fund, and DST Global. We have offices in San Francisco, Kitchener-Waterloo, and Salt Lake City. We're looking for smart, resourceful and passionate people to join us as we power the shop local movement. To learn more about Faire and our customers, you can read more on our blog.

Faire is being built for entrepreneurs, by entrepreneurs.

Additional Information

Faire provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, genetics, sexual orientation, gender identity or gender expression.",4.3,"Faire
4.3","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
151,Principal Signal Processing/HDL Modeling Engineer,$120k-$187k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary: *
Key member of the development of digital signal processing related VHDL for use in communication datalink systems and other programs as required. Applies fundamental engineering principles, procedures, and techniques to performs advanced systems engineering assignments related to the development of electronic and software intensive systems and subsystems. Good verbal and written communication skills and problem solving skills are also required. Previous work experience in VHDL design mandatory. Knowledge of FPGA design environments, including ISE, Vivado, EDK, Modelsim and Matlab a plus.
Performs complex electrical engineering duties following designated standards and procedures. Works closely with engineering disciplines. Duties require application of engineering principles and techniques. May supervise subordinate engineering staff and lead design efforts. This job requires strong analytical and technical abilities and demands fast, but carefully thought-out results. Strong leadership and control of the work process from beginning to end is necessary. This position typically works under limited supervision and direction. Incumbents of this position regularly exercise discretionary and substantial decision-making.
Additional Job Duties and Responsibilities: *
Familiar with VHDL or Verilog design and FPGA architectures.
Develops MatLab fixed-point, bit-accurate modeling for communication datalinks.
Able to breakdown an FPGA system into sub-components and create input/output vectors for discrete VHDL verification.
Provide architectural and detailed DSP designs, including modulation/demodulation, and frequency, phase, time and AGC tracking loops.
Familiar with networking architectures and multiple access techniques.
Provides technical direction and strategy to engineering development efforts for solving complex issues.
Outlines and communicates the most appropriate technical approach for business development activities.
Plans and evaluates architectural design and reviews system performance.
Identifies, investigates and resolves technical issues and mitigate risks.
Participate in engineering design change boards and technical/project reviews.
Communicates technical advancements through briefings and technical papers, as appropriate.
Maintains state-of-the-art awareness in areas of technical expertise such as changes, advancements and improvements.
Develops algorithms.
Plans, conducts and directs research and development.
Applies advanced systems methods, theories and research techniques.
Propose innovative engineering solutions and improve engineering processes.
Involved in design review activities, including proposal technical volume reviews.
Minimum Job Requirements: *
This job is at a cleared facility, candidates must hold U.S. Citizenship. Four-year college degree in electronic engineering or science discipline plus a minimum of eight years experience or an applicable Master’s of Science degree and five years of related experience. Desired experience in designing, developing and testing RTL. Effective written and oral communication skills. Ability to use typical office automation products such as word processors and spreadsheets. Knowledge of customer needs and competing products. Mental ability to perform analytical work. Ability to prioritize work, complete multiple tasks and work under deadlines. Good interpersonal skills. May be required to travel domestically and internationally to include working odd hours, in-line with customer requirements.
The description provided above is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all job duties, responsibilities and requirements. Duties, responsibilities and requirements may change over time and according to business need.
Worker Type: *
Employee

Job Type: Full-time",3.3,"Cubic Corporation
3.3","San Diego, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1951,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
152,Lead Pharmacovigilance Scientist,$31-$55 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused company that will inspire you and support your career? If so, be empowered to take charge of your future at Takeda. Join us as a Lead PV Scientist in our Cambridge, MA office.

OBJECTIVE:

Provides pharmacovigilance functional area expertise and support to project teams for assigned developmental and/or marketed products in conjunction with pharmacovigilance physicians
Responsible for operational pharmacovigilance activities for assigned developmental and/or marketed products
Represent pharmacovigilance department internally and externally at a global level and to function as an authoritative and professional member of relevant teams.
Lead signal detection/safety monitoring activities for pharmacovigilance operations.
Provide functional & therapeutic area expertise, thereby supporting junior pharmacovigilance scientist
Flexible outside of primary therapeutic area as directed by business and departmental need

ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Technically fully competent to perform all usual Senior Pharmacovigilance Scientist workload, including case report QC, review, follow-up and reportability assessments and input into aggregate safety reports
Liaise with other relevant functional areas both within and outside of global PV
Represent pharmacovigilance department in cross-functional teams or committees and external environments at a global and regional level as required.
In depth knowledge and understanding of designated products/studies.
Provide support and oversight of pharmacovigilance operational activities within therapeutic area
Mentorship and guidance for junior/new pharmacovigilance scientists
Conduct project activities for designated developmental products:
Lead set up of safety procedures for complex developmental programmes
Contribute to development of safety exchange agreements for co-development projects
Review and provide functional area expertise for development of protocols, IBs, SAPs, CSRs and other relevant project/study documents
Close knowledge of protocols to effectively respond to safety issues.
Providing investigator and monitor training on safety procedures
Participate in Global Safety Teams, coordinating all aspects of signal detection/safety review activities.
Draft responses to regulatory/ethics safety questions
Assist with writing and maintenance of the Safety Monitoring Plan
Assist with set-up and running of DSMBs
Close working relationship with physicians, both technically and managerially
Perform ad hoc analyses e.g. in response to regulatory queries
Integral to Global Safety Teams and associated support
Other functions as directed by departmental and business needs
Any other tasks assigned by manager to assist in departmental activities

EDUCATION, BEHAVIOURAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

Health care background or life science degree level qualification/Bachelors required; Advanced degree in scientific/medical field preferred
Excellent databases and coding skills including ability to perform advanced searches
In depth knowledge of clinical trial methodology, pharmacovigilance regulations, safety profile and risk/benefit analysis.
Critical thinking and decision making skills
Ability to review, analyse, interpret and present complex data to a high standard
Global player in a global PV organistion
Excellent communication and presentational skills
Good level of computer literacy
Excellent organisation skills and ability to prioritize
Minimum 15 years experience in pharmacovigilance or related field

TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS:

Estimated up to 5 travel times per year, including possible international travel.

WHAT TAKEDA CAN OFFER YOU:

401(k) with company match and Annual Retirement Contribution Plan
Tuition reimbursement
Company match of charitable contributions
Health & Wellness programs including onsite flu shots and health screenings
Generous time off for vacation and the option to purchase additional vacation days
Community Outreach Programs

Empowering Our People to Shine

Learn more at takedajobs.com.

Takeda is an EEO employer of minorities, women, disabled, protected veterans, and considers qualified applicants with criminal histories in accordance with applicable laws. For more information, visit http://www.takeda.us/careers/EEO_Policy_Statement.aspx

No Phone Calls or Recruiters Please.

#LI-MT1

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
153,Data Scientist,$100k-$161k (Glassdoor Est.),"Grammarly is continuing to grow our team during the COVID-19 pandemic, conducting fully remote hiring and onboarding processes. All Grammarly team members can work remotely until August 2021. Read more about how we're supporting our team and communities.

The opportunity


Grammarly empowers people to thrive and connect, whenever and wherever they communicate. 30 million people around the world use our AI-powered writing assistant every day. All of this begins with our team collaborating in a values-driven and learning-oriented environment.

We're looking for a Data Scientist to help us drive decision-making, find bigger opportunities, and improve our product. As a consumer internet company, we produce huge amounts of data, and in this role, you will have outsize opportunities to develop the insights to make it actionable. You will have broad impact and exposure across Grammarly, working with team members from our Product, Research, Marketing, Engineering, and Finance teams.

Grammarly's engineers and researchers have the freedom to innovate and uncover breakthroughs—and, in turn, influence our product roadmap. The complexity of our technical challenges is growing rapidly as we scale our interfaces, algorithms, and infrastructure. Read more about our stack or hear from our team on our technical blog.

Your impact


As a Data Scientist at Grammarly, you will help our team make better decisions by advocating for data-driven approaches across the organization. Your analysis will contribute to our strategy across the business in areas such as user acquisition, engagement, retention, and more.
Within your first month, you will start developing a good understanding of the overall data-processing pipeline, understand a subset of Grammarly's key metrics, and complete at least two small data reports to present to relevant business owners.
By month three, you will become an expert user of our analytical tools, start contributing to the Data Science team's projects, understand all of Grammarly's key metrics, and independently work on small-to-medium-complexity data projects (including A/B tests, channel analysis, and user engagement).
By month six, you will start working independently on complex data projects, such as user segmentation, short- and long-term user-engagement analysis, and lifetime value projections.
By year one, you will become the go-to person and subject-matter expert for a few of Grammarly's key metrics, own and drive projects independently with minimal supervision, and along with our other Data Scientists, ensure ""data science excellence"" at Grammarly (dashboards, high-quality reports, empowered teams, etc.).
We're looking for someone who
Embodies our EAGER values—is ethical, adaptable, gritty, empathetic, and remarkable.
Holds a PhD in a quantitative field or a masters in a quantitative field and has at least 3 years of experience working as a data scientist.
Has experience in data analysis, A/B testing, retention tracking, etc. (consumer product experience is preferred).
Is proficient in data mining and statistics.
Has experience with SQL as well as experience programming in Python, R, Scala, or an equivalent language.
Has strong analytical and critical thinking skills as well as a strong bias toward actionable insights; loves finding insights and getting others to act on them.
Is a self-starter with superior organizational and prioritization skills.
Support for you, professionally and personally
Professional growth: We hire people we trust, and we give team members autonomy to do their best work. We also support professional development with training, coaching, and regular feedback.
A connected team: Grammarly builds products that help people connect, and we apply this mindset to our own team. We have a highly collaborative culture supported by our EAGER values. We also take time to celebrate our colleagues and accomplishments with global, local, and team-specific events and programs.
Comprehensive benefits: Grammarly offers all team members competitive pay along with a benefits package that includes superior health care. We also offer ample and defined time off, catered lunches, gym and recreation stipends, admission discounts, and more.
We encourage you to apply


At Grammarly, we value our differences, and we encourage all—especially those whose identities are traditionally underrepresented in tech organizations—to apply. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, gender expression or identity, sexual orientation, national origin, citizenship, age, marital status, veteran status, disability status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Grammarly will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance. Grammarly is an equal opportunity employer and participant in the U.S. Federal E-Verify program.",5.0,"Grammarly
5.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
154,Sr Data Scientist,$106k-$169k (Glassdoor Est.),"Neustar is an information services and technology company and a leader in identity resolution providing the data and technology that enables trusted connections between companies and people at the moments that matter most. More information is available at https://www.home.neustar.
Job Requisition:
R-3226 Sr Data Scientist (Open)
Primary Location:
LOS ANGELES
Job Description:
Job Description
Who are we?
As a company built on the foundation of Privacy by Design, for more than 20 years Neustar’s unique capabilities have made us the leader in the field of responsible identity resolution. Neustar enables trusted connections between companies and people at the moments that matter most, with world-class and industry leading solutions in Marketing, Identity, Risk, Communications, Security and Registry services.
Job Requisition:
Senior Data Scientist
Primary Location:
Los Angeles, New York or another major Neustar office in the US (Virtual OK for experienced candidates with record of successful telecommuting)

Job Description:
The senior data scientist will work on challenging problems extracting actionable information out of the many data sources available to Neustar. She/he/they will focus on marketing analytics and privacy-preserving big data analytics, and will be involved in projects from end-to-end, including data ingestion and curation, hypothesis development, feature engineering, and model development and evaluation.
At Neustar senior data scientists create prototypes of new algorithms and support engineering teams in productizing these capabilities. They work closely with various teams including data acquisition, data products, other data science teams within various business units including Risk, Security, and OneID to ensure implementation of capabilities that enable the organization’s vision.
Responsibilities:
·         Algorithm Development: Develop a deep understanding of all the data relevant to the problem to be addressed. Establish deterministic and probabilistic linkages between data sources and develop ways to extract and summarize the sought information in the data using a wide variety of statistical, data mining and machine learning techniques.
·         Prototyping: Create prototypes of productizable ways to perform the analysis at scale, provide documentation and help educate your colleagues in different function about the solution.
·         Support Implementation: Closely work with product, engineering and client teams to incorporate Data Science capabilities into Neustar’s products and services.
Experience and Qualifications:
·         A PhD in an analytical field such as computer science, machine learning, data science, statistics, physics and/or engineering, or a Master’s degree in a related field with 3 to 5 years of experience is a minimum requirement.
·         Minimum 5 years of experience with Python and SQL, and one or more enterprise level programming languages such as Java or Scala.
·         Minimum 2 years of hands-on experience with Linux-based cloud systems such as AWS and GCP.
·         Minimum 2 years of experience with wrangling large (terabytes) event level datasets.
·         Academic or industrial experience in privacy-preserving analytics on large datasets preferred.
·         Some experience writing code for highly distributed systems such as Apache Spark, Dask and Hive.
·         Several years of experience engineering features for machine learning models from raw data.
·         Background in applying optimization theory to real-world problems.
·         Ability to modify cost functions in machine learning algorithms based on business problems.
·         Some experience with TensorFlow or PyTorch.
·         Excellent oral and communication skills.
·         Ability and experience working in a cross-functional environment.
At Neustar, we are committed to the growth and development of our employees whose individual skills, curiosity and passion for their work, contribute to the overall success of our business. Our core values (Accountability, Collaboration, Transparency, Resilience, and Respect) are the driving force of our culture across our locations around the globe. We offer our employees a comprehensive benefits package including perks such as tuition & certification reimbursement, awesome company discounts, community service events, pet swag and much more!  We are all learning and creating together; and having some major fun along the way.
JOIN US!  We can’t wait to meet you!
Neustar does not accept unsolicited resumes from external firms or agencies. Neustar will not be responsible for placement fees associated with unsolicited resumes.
DIVERSITY
Diversity, inclusion and teamwork are second nature to Neustar; and these values permeate our entire business structure. Neustar is committed to creating an environment where a wide spectrum of opinions and beliefs are actively sought, listened to and respected. Further, our talented workforce draws from the many geographic areas and markets in which Neustar operates worldwide, which represents a distinct competitive advantage. The rich and varied personal and professional backgrounds of our employees make Neustar a dynamic and rewarding company at which to build a career. We invite you to join us.

EOE of Minorities/Females/Vets/Disability
Neustar, Inc. considers all applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, sexual orientation, or status as a Vietnam-era or special disabled veteran in accordance with federal law and other state and local requirements. Neustar, Inc., complies with applicable state and local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment and provides reasonable accommodation to qualified individuals with disabilities in accordance with the American with Disabilities Act (ADA) and applicable state and local laws.",3.6,"Neustar
3.6","Los Angeles, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
155,Geodetic Orbit Scientist,$56k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"Geodetic Orbit Scientists monitor Global Navigation Satellite Systems, acquire and analyze satellite data, and produce accurate products for the National System for Geospatial-Intelligence (NSG). They develop, evaluate, and use algorithms and tools to provide integrity monitoring and determine precise ephemerides and other information. They analyze satellite ranging and timing information in order to identify anomalies in both real time and post-fit scenarios. These analysts handle technical and logistical details pertinent to remote command and control of a worldwide network of satellite tracking stations. They provide in-depth technical expertise on satellite issues to customers, and represent NGA in community forums establishing doctrine and policy.

Additional Job Information
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: The Global Navigation Satellite Systems (GNSS) Division is seeking a Geodetic Orbit Scientist. The GNSS Division has responsibility for a wide range of functions and tasks which require an understanding of satellites and their characteristics (hardware and software), orbital analysis, and geodetic sciences. Current functions include producing daily precise, rapid and predicted ephemerides for GPS satellites using data from NGA and United States Air Force (USAF) ground monitoring stations, as well as daily generation of Earth Orientation Prediction Parameters (EOPP), Defense Meteorological Satellite Program (DMSP) ephemeris, and GPS precise ephemeris data for Satellite Tracking (SATRAK) as needed. The Monitor Station Network Control Center (MSNCC) has responsibility for operating a worldwide GPS monitor station network, which is controlled via the MSNCC in St. Louis, MO and Springfield, VA. Data from our monitor stations is provided near realtime to the USAF for integrity monitoring and used in updating time and position information broadcast by GPS satellites. Daily GPS data in Receiver Independent Exchange (RINEX) format is also supplied to the International GNSS (Global Navigation Satellite System) Service (IGS). GNSS also generates a daily GPS precise ephemeris in batch production mode using Estimation and Prediction of Orbits and Clocks to High Accuracy (EPOCHA) software and is currently testing and evaluating a version of EPOCHA designed to provide near realtime 5-minute GPS precise ephemeris on a 24x7 basis. Band 3 Geodetic Orbit Scientists perform moderately difficult or complex assignments to monitor Global Navigation Satellite Systems (GNSS), acquire and analyze satellite data, and produce accurate products for the GEOINT Enterprise. They develop, evaluate, and apply algorithms and tools to provide integrity monitoring and determine precise ephemerides and other information. They select and apply techniques and methods to analyze satellite ranging and timing information to identify anomalies in real-time and post-fit scenarios. They handle moderately complex technical and logistical details pertinent to remote command and control of a worldwide network of satellite tracking stations. These Geodetic Orbit Scientists also provide technical expertise on satellite issues to internal and external customers, and represent NGA in community forums establishing doctrine and policy. OTHER REQUIREMENTS: The MSNCC is monitored 24x7 and shift work/rotations, within this position, may be required. Shift rotations may be required. Weekend and Holiday shifts may be required. Occasional travel may be required. Once employed with GNSS, the employee will be deemed Emergency Essential and will not be subject to facility closures or reporting delays; employee must report for duty on time due to shift and mission requirements. Additional Application Requirement: You may be asked to complete one or more assessments in addition to the application you submit on this website as part of your application to NGA. These assessments may include but are not limited to: 1) Online questionnaires or assessments that require you to describe your job-related knowledge, skills, abilities, or other characteristics that are aligned with the mandatory and desirable qualifications of this job posting. The information you provide in the application you submit must support the response you provide to this questionnaire. You will receive an email to describe any additional assessments required. Please monitor your emails and complete any required assessments as soon as possible.

Mandatory Qualifications
MANDATORY QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: For this particular job, applicants must meet all competencies reflected under the Mandatory Qualification Criteria to include education (if required). Online applications must demonstrate qualification by providing specific examples and associated results, in response to the announcement's mandatory criteria specified in this vacancy announcement: 1. Proven ability to communicate ongoing work to peer and leadership through written, visual, spoken reports, or briefings. 2. Demonstrated knowledge in computer and operating systems, computer networking and/ or database management. 3. Demonstrated ability of working in a team environment. 4. Demonstrated experience in scientific or statistical analysis. 5. Demonstrated ability to apply critical thinking to problem identification, analysis and resolution on challenging issues. EDUCATION REQUIREMENT: A. Education: Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in Geodesy, Mathematics, Physical Science, or a related discipline that includes at least 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework in any combination of Astronomy, Computer Science, Engineering Science, Geodesy, Geology, Geomatics, Geophysics, Mathematics, Orbital Mechanics, Physical Science, Physics, Remote Sensing, or Surveying. Coursework must include differential and integral calculus. -OR- B. Combination of Education and Experience: A minimum of 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework in any area listed in option A, plus experience in conducting work related to satellite operations, GPS surveying, Geodesy, Geophysics, Wide Area Network analysis, or a related field that demonstrates the ability to successfully perform the duties associated with this work. As a rule, every 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework is equivalent to one year of experience. Candidates should show that their combination of education and experience totals 4 years. PHYSICAL REQUIREMENT: Distinguish principal colors and shades/hues of principal colors; Near visual acuity of 20/20 or better with or without corrective lenses; Far visual acuity of 20/60 or better binocular with or without corrective lenses

Highly Desired Qualifications
QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: In addition to the mandatory qualifications, experience in the following is desired: 1. Demonstrated knowledge with one or more of the following computer systems: MS Windows office applications, UNIX, UNIX scripting, FORTRAN, C, C++, STK, UML, MATLAB or MATHEMATICA. 2. Personal flexibility, and adaptability for shifts/ changes in crisis situations enabling the success enabling the successful handling of unforeseen challenges inherent to working in a high-visibility environment. 3. Demonstrated knowledge managing complex acquisition and/ or integration programs. 4. Demonstrated knowledge monitoring and /or analyzing satellite characteristics (hardware & software).

Additional Job Requirements
You must be able to obtain and retain a Top Secret security clearance with access to Sensitive Compartmented Information. In addition, you are subject to a Counterintelligence Polygraph examination in order to maintain access to Top Secret information. All employees are subject to a periodic examination on a random basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Refusal to take the examination may result in denial of access to Top Secret information, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs. Employees with SCI access and who are under NGA cognizance are required to submit a Security Financial Disclosure Report, SF-714, on an annual basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Failure to comply may negatively impact continued access to Top Secret information, Information Systems, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs.

Pay, Benefits, & Work Schedule
PROMOTION OPPORTUNITY: Promotion opportunities allow applicants at all band levels to be considered. Qualifications for NGA positions do not include specific time-in-band requirements. NGA will emphasize quality of experience, rather than duration, and assess how the quality of the experience demonstrates possession of the knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies necessary for successful job performance in the NGA occupational structure. Band 03 $72,030 - $133,465 PERMANENT CHANGE IN STATION: PCS expenses are not authorized. Pay is only part of the compensation you will earn working for the Federal Government. We offer a broad array of benefits programs and family friendly flexibilities to meet the needs of you and your family. For more information on the array of benefits programs, please visit https://www.intelligencecareers.gov/nga/ngabenefits.html

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $72,030.00 - $133,465.00 per year

Schedule:
Day shift
Work Remotely:
No",3.9,"National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency
3.9","Springfield, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Government,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
156,"Team Leader Pharmaceutical Chemistry Research Scientist, PhD",-1,"Avisyn is a pharmaceutical research group with labs in the US and Canada. Focusing on medicinal chemistry design, computational chemistry and excellence in synthesis, we specialize early phase discovery programs in psychiatry, neurodegeneration, and oncology. Although we are an independent group, we do collaborate with major pharma on some in-sourced and out-sourced projects. For the present opening, we seek a team-leader level scientist who will oversee a team of synthetic chemists while also contributing directly to the team’s synthesis efforts. This position is within the labs of one of our major pharma collaborators, they are a top-5 global pharma company with research headquarters in Groton and San Diego.

Please note that we are NOT a recruiting nor a temp agency.

Required qualifications

· PhD with >3 industrial experience in synthetic chemistry with previous supervisory experience managing 3 or more synthetic chemists within major pharma or biotech environment.

· Experience in traditional and contemporary organic synthesis techniques.

· Familiarity with a wide range of techniques and reaction types such as low temperature reactions, inert atmosphere, metal-catalyzed cross coupling, hydrogenation, etc.

· Capable of independently evaluating synthetic routes and proactive troubleshooting.

· Experience in reaction monitoring (TLC, LCMS, GCMS, etc.).

· Ability to work safely with potentially hazardous chemicals. Ability to lead teams of synthetic chemists that maintain high awareness and compliance with safety protocols.

· Be highly skilled in practical and theoretical aspects of synthetic organic chemistry. Have strong understanding of reaction mechanisms and reactivity.

· Have strong expertise in multi-step synthetic chemistry over a broad range of reaction types, conditions and scale. Have strong experience in the synthesis, purification, and characterization of chiral compounds. Be highly skilled in chromatography, crystallization, and other purification techniques. Be highly skilled in the characterization of organic compounds, especially NMR and mass spectrometry.

· Be an avid reader of chemical literature with up-to-date knowledge of contemporary and emerging developments in synthesis.

· Have excellent oral communication skills with a strong ability to communicate scientific results at team discussions. Have excellent written communication skills through clear, concise reporting and by maintaining high quality, accurate electronic scientific notebook records.

· Employees must successfully pass a background check and drug test as a condition of employment.

Responsibilities

· Effectively manage laboratory work of a team of colleagues by fostering a culture of scientific rigor, high productivity, safety, and open communications. Provide guidance and feedback on reaction set-up, safety protocols, analytical interpretation, and troubleshooting/problem solving while balancing his/her own laboratory deliverables.

· Work effectively with Project Leaders to assure high productivity and high-quality delivery of synthetic targets and project goals.

· Build and sustain high performing teams by assuring that the team communicates well, helping to make sure that there are no misunderstandings or unexpressed difficulties between team members. Give and receive effective feedback.

· Consistently demonstrate effective multi-step synthetic planning, reaction optimization, and delivery through deep synthetic and mechanistic knowledge, awareness of classical, contemporary, and emerging synthetic methods, expertise using literature and scientific databases (SciFinder and Reaxys) and through highly effective reaction troubleshooting.

Our team members innovate beyond known chemistry while focusing on delivery. We have a passion for staying at the forefront of chemistry. To drive innovation, we recognize the importance of intelligent risk-taking and open-mindedness. We encourage creativity and recognize everyone’s contribution. We accomplish the most by working as a team.

We regret that we cannot respond to candidates that do not meet the stated requirements.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Application Question:
How many year's experience do you have in heterocycle chemistry synthesis in your post-PhD work?",-1,Avisyn Pharma,"San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
157,Data Scientist,-1,"About Us

Mindoula is a next-generation behavioral health management company that delivers tech-enabled, team-based 24/7/365 behavioral health support across the continuum of care. We are building the best population health management and analytics platform by using the latest technologies in big data and data science. Also, we are developing a comprehensive platform to address the needs of pre and post hospital care for large populations.

We are currently seeking to fill in multiple roles in technology and data to help build great technology helping Mindoula to grow faster.

About You

We are looking for a talented data scientist who has a great passion for solving business problems by providing data insights through data modeling and analysis. You will work with senior leadership and data/technology teams to understand and solve complex business problems by developing data models and various techniques to analyze the health populations.

Responsibilities:
Derive insights from data analysis and modeling using multiple datasets, derived from the company platform, data provided by our customers etc.
Develop a comprehensive profile of the patient/member using the data available.
Apply statistical techniques to understand health data and analyze outcomes.
Apply data science algorithms and techniques to understand the member profile and prepare the data such that these insights help the care management team in addressing needs of our customers and members.
Be part of the data team, collaborate with product and engineering teams in developing the data required to support the functionality and new features of our platforms.
Must be self-driven and a quick learner.
Requires strong problem-solving, analytical and communication skills.
Healthcare data experience (claims, groupers) is a plus.
Technologies:
Data science: Analysis/Machine learning/AI algorithms and modeling.
Data Platforms: Spark, Python/Scala.
Strong SQL experience.
Databases: Postgres, Microsoft SQL Server
Hosting: Microsoft Azure
Tools: Github, CircleCI, CodeClimate
Requirements:
Minimum 3 years of experience in position
Healthcare experience with managing claims data
Compensation:
Competitive salary.
Generous benefits
This position is open to both as an employee or as a contractor/consultant.",3.8,"Mindoula Health Inc
3.8",Maryland,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
158,"Computer Scientist / Machine Learning, Staff",$74k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE is seeking an early career Computer Scientist to apply machine learning / deep learning, computer vision and cognitive science to solve some of the world’s most challenging problems. Our Data Engineering and Biometrics team provide MITRE-unique solutions across multiple sponsors. We are a driving force investigating, developing and defining multiple research initiatives in collaboration with academia, industry and our sponsors.

Responsibilities include:

Work in innovation and research initiatives related to machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics in combination with cybersecurity, data engineering and social science
Advance the Department domain knowledge and capabilities that align with strategic/significant sponsor needs and challenges including but not limited to: Adversarial information scenarios, Defining, detecting and measuring information trust, bias/fairness in decision, models and algorithms, Biometric authentication, detecting biometric or identity fraud, anti-spoofing, Defining, detecting and measuring bias in datasets and information, Information security and privacy, Data generation, Data impacting quality of decision
Contribute to the technical work program of one or more projects and produce quality products focused on successful sponsor outcomes

Basic Qualifications:

Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Cybersecurity, or related field
Must be a U.S. citizen with ability to possess and maintain a Secret DoD clearance and DHS fitness
2+ years’ work experience should include: machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science

Required Qualifications:

Proficiency in use of Microsoft Office including Outlook, Excel, and Word
Must have demonstrated proficiency and strength in verbal, written, PC, presentation, and communications skills
Demonstrated proficiency using tools such as: TensorFlow, Keras, Caffe, Theano, PyTorch, dlib, C/C++, Python, JSON, XML, SQL, NoSQL, DBMS, ETL

Preferred Qualifications:

Advanced degree in related field of study
Candidates that possess a current/active US Government Secret clearance are preferred
Documented success working in the fields of: cybersecurity, data engineering, social science, mobile computing, computer networking, virtualization, cloud computing, and big data

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"Mitre Corporation
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
159,Senior DBA - Data Engineering,$104k-$189k (Glassdoor Est.),"Course Hero is scaling! We are looking for a motivated, and progressive Senior DBA - Data Engineer that will help build our next-generation Data Platform. We are searching for someone who has a DevOps mentality and passionate about innovating, optimizing, and automating data at scale.

You can expect high impact and wide-ranging responsibilities: As a Senior DBA - Data Engineer, you will have deep hands-on experience working with Data Scientists, Machine Learning experts, and Search Engineers. The scalable systems you build will enable our product designers to bring powerful data products to the Course Hero platform.

Here are some ways you'll make an impact:
Work with a team of passionate data engineers and scientists to enable data mining, deep learning, statistical modeling, predictive analytics, machine learning, and NLP.
Plan and execute a path to scale our data infrastructure in both traffic and data.
Ensure compliance with the organization's high bar for data quality and modeling standards, across the product and related business areas.
Automate monitoring and administration of the data infrastructure to help us grow our microservice architecture.
Collaborate with engineering on query tuning and schema design so we can continue to scale.
Provide tools to empower internal teams across the organization (sales, operations, finance, engineering, etc.) to make data-driven decisions.
Participate in the on-call rotation and document administration and response procedures through runbooks & playbooks.
Are you our next Senior DBA - Data Engineer?
Experienced with AWS RDS
Expert in Mysql and other relational database technologies.
Robust Ops foundation - you're always thinking ""What happens if this fails"" when you build things.
Proficient in scripting and automation
Worked with Machine Learning experts and Data Scientists to enable self-service data ingestion, transformation, visualization, reporting and advanced analytics (machine learning, AI).
Strategic thinker and thrive operating in a broad scope, from conception through a continuous operation.
Hands-on experience working with large scale data ingestion, ETL processing, storage, Hadoop ecosystems, Spark, non-relational databases (NoSQL, MongoDB, Cassandra), and messaging systems (Kafka, Kinesis, RabbitMQ).
Bachelor's or Master's degree in computer science, mathematics, economics, engineering, or other related fields.
Experienced using broader AWS stack (i.e. S3, Athena, Redshift, EC2, SNS, SQS, SES, DynamoDB, Kinesis).
Experience with ElasticSearch, Docker, and Kubernetes.
Familiar with Python analytics libraries, Tableau, or use of R language.
Experience with standard IT security practices such as Access, Authorization, and Key Management.
About Us:

At Course Hero, we have an awesome team and a truly engaging culture. We are customer-focused, collaborative, responsible, gritty and we love to learn. Our bold mission is to help students graduate confident and prepared!
We are not the only ones that think we're onto something big. Course Hero has been recognized as the 278th Fastest Growing Company in North America on Deloitte's 2019 Technology Fast 500 and also 2019's One of the Best Places to Work in the Bay Area by the Bay Area News Group. Read up on some of our recent news coverage, blog, and learn more about usto see what it is like to work with our team.

Benefits & Perks!
Competitive salary and stock options
Full medical coverage (medical, dental, vision)
401(k) program with match
Education Reimbursement
Quarterly team events and outings (Sporting Events, Escape Rooms, Go-Kart Racing, Karaoke, Bowling and much more!)
Free lunches twice a week, on-site cafe discount, plus an endless snack and drink supply
Onsite gym – Pacific Shores Center – Classes – Pool – Spa – Rock Wall - Massages!
Commuter benefits, shuttle service from Redwood City
10K Local move benefit to move within 10 miles of our office!
8 hours per quarter paid time for volunteering for a cause of your choice
Front row seat to Master Educator lectures",4.8,"Course Hero
4.8","Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Colleges & Universities,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
160,Operations Strategic Data Analyst - Healthcare,$54k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Operations Strategic Data Analyst embraces complex, disparate data sets and leading technologies – including Amazon Web Services, Redshift, Alteryx, and Tableau – to design data models, craft scoring methodologies and develop algorithms that inform the leaders of our business on our performance. This individual will be working directly on Healthfirst strategic initiatives to identify solutions that have visibility at the highest levels of the company.

Duties & Responsibilities:

Operate with intellectual curiosity and critically assess existing processes and procedures to identify opportunities for improvement
Develop complex analyses requiring the integration of multiple data sources, evaluation of data quality, and standardization of data to consistent format/structure
Create advanced queries and reports that extract data to support business teams’ needs, including working with nesting tables and temp tables and writing multiple conditions against varying data sets)
Summarize and present data outcomes, recommendations, and methodology to analytics leadership, department leadership, and enterprise stakeholders
Learn, adopt and leverage leading analytical tools and technologies to further the maturity of departmental analytics at-large which may include the development of procedures in Amazon Redshift, workflows in Alteryx, or other solutions as required
Hold oneself accountable for the accuracy, completeness, quality, and relevance of deliverables in order to own responsibility for work product and consider these factors in the end-to-end analytical process, from data gathering to analysis to formatting and presentation
Employ best practices in documentation, coding style and comments to facilitate persistence, re-usability, and scalability of your solutions
Document and escalate data issues as appropriate
Exhibit collaborative attitude, willingness to work with others on data projects that included working team(s) made of cross departmental/interdisciplinary users
Additional duties as assigned

Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree from an accredited institution or equivalent relevant work experience
Working experience exhibiting strong critical thinking and analytical skills
Advanced MS Excel skills that include creating pivot tables, macros, utilizing v/h lookups and/or VBA
Familiarity with writing SQL (and/or SAS) queries for analyzing data and establishing business rules and requirements
Familiarity with relational database structures, theories, principles and practices
Familiarity with data models and/or data modelling
Ability to understand the data life-cycle within the organization and its impact on the business
Experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment
Ability to communicate effectively verbally and in writing while demonstrating good grammar, spelling and punctuation skills
Work experience requiring meticulous attention to detail

Preferred Qualifications:

Degree in Mathematics, Computer Science, Data Sciences, Engineering, Business Analytics, Informatics, or similar concentration
Experience working with SQL in a professional environment
Experience with Alteryx, Tableau, Amazon Redshift, QlikView, or other similar tools/platforms
Familiarity with statistical principles, such as standard deviations, normal distributions, and regressions
Familiarity with Python and/or R
Familiarity with healthcare data
Balances working independently with an understanding of when to escalate with questions/issues
Ability to work effectively with both business and technical stakeholders

Compliance & Regulatory Responsibilities: N/A

License/Certification: N/A

WE ARE AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER. Applicants and employees are considered for positions and are evaluated without regard to mental or physical disability, race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, genetic information, military or veteran status, sexual orientation, marital status or any other protected Federal, State/Province or Local status unrelated to the performance of the work involved.

If you have a disability under the Americans with Disability Act or a similar law, and want a reasonable accommodation to assist with your job search or application for employment, please contact us by sending an email to careers@Healthfirst.org or calling 212-519-1798 . In your email please include a description of the accommodation you are requesting and a description of the position for which you are applying. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a position within Healthfirst Management Services will be reviewed at the e-mail address and phone number supplied. Thank you for considering a career with Healthfirst Management Services.

EEO Law Poster and Supplement",3.2,"Healthfirst
3.2","Lake Mary, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1993,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
161,Senior Data Engineer,$78k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"Cision Ltd is a leading global provider of innovative earned media software and services to public relations and marketing communications professionals. Cision’s Communications Cloud platform allows users to identify key influencers, craft and distribute strategic content, and measure meaningful impact of PR and Communications Teams’ campaigns. Cision has over 4,500 employees with offices in 23 countries throughout the Americas, EMEA, and APAC. For more information about our products and services, visit www.cision.com and follow us on Twitter @Cision.
Cision employs the brightest, most passionate people in the tech industry. We’d love for you to join that group! We invest in our people through training and professional development and we empower them to grow their careers - because the most important measure of our success is yours.


As a Senior Data Engineer for the Earned Media Attribution Software Engineering team, you will work with business data and database systems that power our market leading solution, Impact. You will be working with data engineers, software engineers and quality engineers on high-scale data collection and processing systems to gain insights from web scale analytics data. The team will work in an iterative manner to consistently and frequently deliver high-quality, robust and scalable software solutions.
You will help us by:
Leading development work on core data warehouse for attribution product and designing platform iterations to accommodate rapid growth
Working closely with QA, Architecture, and Product teams to help Cision deliver innovative software to our customers and industry partners
Designing and optimize database architecture including schemas, partitioning and aggregations
Developing standards to ingest, enrich and aggregate large amounts of data while focusing on consistency and data quality
Building and implementing data integrations using ELT/ETL frameworks and APIs with industry partners
You would be a good fit if you have:
7+ Years proven professional experience in data engineering field such as architecture, data management, data warehousing or data quality
In depth understanding and practical experience and understanding of designing, developing and maintaining a modern data warehouse in AWS
Proven experience in the following: developing in Java or similar experience and interest in adopting Java, MPP and/or columnar databases, RedShift preferred, bash scripting and Python for ETL processing
Ability to understand key business needs and translate those needs into data solutions
Expertise with the following: OLAP data modeling, concurrency, data structures, business intelligence tools such as MS Power BI/Tableau, data streaming platforms such as Apache Kafka as well as creating RESTful APIs for use in data visualization applications
Ability to recommend and optimize for new higher performing multi-dimensional architectures for more efficient Business Intelligence performance
You would be a great fit if you also have:
Experience with one or more of: high availability (HA) applications; distributed and redundant data storage and processing; service-oriented architecture and data mining
Experience with the following: agile software development or an iterative development environment and with continuous integration and continuous delivery
Understanding of data privacy and data protection
Cision is committed to building an environment where all employees are set up to thrive and reach their full potential. We believe diversity, equity and inclusion is vital to driving our culture, sparking innovation and achieving long-term success. Cision is proud to have joined more than 600 companies in signing the CEO Action for Diversity & Inclusion™ pledge, the largest CEO-driven business commitment to advance diversity and inclusion within the workplace.
Cision is proud to be an equal opportunity employer, seeking to create a welcoming and diverse environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, veteran status, or other protected statuses.
EEO/AA employer M/F/D/V, 41 CFR 60–1.4
Please see EEO is the law and EEO is the Law Supplement.
Please review our Global Candidate Data Privacy Statement to learn about Cision’s commitment to protecting personal data collected during the hiring process.",2.8,"Cision
2.8","Austin, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1892,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
162,Polymer Characterization Scientist,$18k-$79k (Glassdoor Est.),"A trusted partner at nearly three million commercial customer locations, Ecolab (ECL) is the global leader in water, hygiene and infection prevention solutions and services. With annual sales of $13 billion and more than 45,000 associates, Ecolab delivers comprehensive solutions, data-driven insights and personalized service to advance food safety, maintain clean and safe environments, optimize water and energy use, and improve operational efficiencies and sustainability for customers in the food, healthcare, hospitality and industrial markets in more than 170 countries around the world.

Ecolab is seeking a Polymer Characterization Scientist to develop and advance technical platforms satisfying both business and customer needs. In this role, you will be responsible for performing and leading research, development and problem-solving projects to enable new product and platform development. You will work closely with anchor and divisional RD&E teams to design, execute and communicate results. We are seeking candidates who have strong collaboration and teamwork skills, are self-motivated, have good communication skills, are creative problem solvers, and possess strong observation and perception skills.

Whats in it For You:
The opportunity to take on some of the worlds most meaningful challenges, helping customers achieve clean water, safe food, abundant energy and healthy environments
The ability to make an impact and shape your career with a company that is passionate about growth
The support of an organization that believes it is vital to include and engage diverse people, perspectives and ideas to achieve our best
What You Will Do:
Develop and transfer phase 0-1 chemistry and formulation concepts
Collaborate with anchor and divisional research scientists/RD&E leaders on new development projects and platforms
Conduct synthetic polymer characterizations through, for example, molecular weight measurements using Size Exclusion Chromatography-Multi Angle Light Scattering (SEC-MALS) techniques
Develop organic and aqueous phase SEC methods
Perform Thermogravimetric Analysis (TGA) and Differential Scanning Calorimetry (DSC) analysis of products and product blends
Collaborate with other researchers to design and ultimately provide the most complete product analysis
Actively engage in development of new platforms that meet strategic business needs
Interpret experimental data and communicate results clearly to peers and project teams in written reports and oral presentations
Provide consulting on experimental design, mentoring, and work direction for junior lab scientists
Maintain employee safety standards, including 6S lab standards
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelors degree in Chemistry or related discipline and 5 years of R&D experience; Masters Degree and 3 years of R&D experience; or Ph.D. and 1 year of R&D experience
Experience working with fundamental physical/chemical properties and structural activity relationships
Experience conducting synthetic polymer characterizations through, for example, molecular weight measurements using Size Exclusion Chromatography-Multi Angle Light Scattering (SEC-MALS) techniques
Experience developing organic and aqueous phase SEC methods
Experience performing Thermogravimetric Analysis (TGA), Differential Scanning Calorimetry (DSC), and rheological analysis of products and product blends
Preferred Qualifications:
Method development experience with water soluble polymer characterization techniques like SEC/GPC, SEC-MALS and viscometry
Demonstrated record of applying polymer characterization techniques to a wide variety of problems
Fundamental understanding of polymerization processes and formulation
Working knowledge of statistics
Strong problem-solving skills
Strong oral and written communication skills
Our Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion

At Ecolab, we believe the best teams are diverse and inclusive, and we are on a journey to create a workplace where every associate can grow and achieve their best. We are committed to fair and equal treatment of associates and applicants. We recruit, hire, promote, transfer and provide opportunities for advancement on the basis of individual qualifications and job performance. In all matters affecting employment, compensation, benefits, working conditions, and opportunities for advancement, we will not discriminate against any associate or applicant for employment because of race, religion, color, creed, national origin, citizenship status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expressions, genetic information, marital status, age, disability, or status as a covered veteran.

In addition, we are committed to furthering the principles of Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) through Affirmative Action (AA). Our goal is to fully utilize minority, female, disabled and covered veteran individuals at all levels of the workforce. Ecolab is a place where you can grow your career, own your future and impact what matters.

We will consider for employment all qualified applicants, including those with criminal histories, in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable state and local laws, including the City of Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance and the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance.",3.7,"Ecolab
3.7","Naperville, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,1923,Company - Public,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
163,Lead Data Scientist,$111k-$178k (Glassdoor Est.),"At the intersection of technology, science, business and sports, Strivr offers an end-to-end, VR-based immersive learning platform that changes the way people around the world train, learn and perform. With a mission to elevate performance through immersive experience, we are redefining an industry in real time and shaping the future of learning.

Strivr was founded in 2015 out of Stanford University’s Virtual Human Interaction Lab, using the football field as our proving ground. Since then, we have quickly expanded from the athlete to the enterprise, partnering with leading Fortune 500 companies including Walmart, Verizon and Fidelity to innovate and elevate employee development.

More than just content inside a headset, immersive learning provides realistic, high-impact experiences driven by L&D experts, instructional designers, data scientists, and immersive content specialists. Strivr offers the only end-to-end solution available today, bringing together the software, hardware, content and services needed to deliver effective training at scale.

Recognized by Fast Company’s Most Innovative Companies of 2019 and 2020, we take pride in our passion for innovation and we use that energy to fuel our work. Our culture thrives on teamwork, grit, transparency and impact, and celebrates every win. It’s an exciting time to join our fast growing team!

At Strivr, our Data Science team develops cutting-edge techniques to improve people’s performance in the real world based on their experiences in the virtual world. As a Data Scientist at Strivr, you will be at the forefront of defining approaches to Immersive Data Science and will be evaluating and optimizing user experience in the virtual world.

Your responsibilities:
Develop innovative approaches to measuring user behavior and evaluating performance in the virtual environment
Collaborate with partners such as Engineering and Solutions teams to instrument the data collection process and build ETL pipelines to obtain data required for your analyses
Implement approaches and communicate insights in a compelling narrative
Incorporate your research outcomes into the data product offering
Minimum Qualifications:
5+ years of industry experience as a Data Scientist
An advanced degree in a quantitative field (e.g Economics, Statistics, Sciences, Engineering)
Experience developing and implementing in-depth approaches, including statistical and econometric analyses and/or ML models
Experience building ETL pipelines
Proficiency with Python (or R), and SQL
Strong communication skills
Passion for using data to improve immersive experiences",4.5,"Strivr
4.5","Palo Alto, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
164,Senior Scientist/Senior Project Manager,-1,"SUMMARY*
Reporting to the Vice President, the Senior Scientist/Senior Project Manager is required to provide project management, mentor and lead teams of junior staff, and help the company obtain project work through writing work proposals and taking an active role with regards to strategic growth and marketing.

It is expected that the Senior Scientist/Senior Project Manager can generally work independently to generate complex reports and other documents with only final review prior to product submittal. They are expected to be able to manage a project from the bid through reporting. This includes coordinating with other staff to ensure any necessary work or data collection is performed as necessary to meet the objectives of the project’s scope of work. Individuals in this role should be skilled in balancing internal management with external leadership, business development and visibility to support the growth goals of the firm.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES*
_BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT _
Works with Executive Team to ensure the firm’s business development plan is consistently executed in support of MTS’ growth strategies
Supports the potential project search and request-for-proposal process for new business
Participates in strategic development and pursuit of clients and projects
Maintains working dialog with key clients including federal, state and local officials
Participates in the development and execution of key project and client presentations
Develops personal relationships/networking opportunities with allied market leaders, consultants and other professionals
_PROJECT MANAGEMENT _
Responsible for technical oversight and execution of various environmental consulting projects; managing and mentoring field staff; and ensuring the safe execution of all phases of project work to meet our clients’ objectives as well as company goals for revenue generation and profitability
Schedule or supervise professional-level technical and administrative support staff to achieve established objectives and deadlines
Responsible for project administration including project financial performance, budgeting, directing appropriate staff, directing the preparation of and approving project invoices, maintaining project files, closing the job, and preparing project descriptions
Evaluates the needs of a project and effectively delegate various tasks and responsibilities.
Coaches and mentors project team members in the technical and administrative activities required to successfully complete projects
Maintains client contact throughout the project to keep the client informed of key project milestones and budget issues
Responds to client and prospective client requests
Leverages existing client relationships and builds new client relationships to develop projects
PROFESSIONAL REQUIREMENTS AND CERTIFICATIONS*
Maintains an advanced SCUBA certification
Can tow, launch, and operate small watercraft
Has knowledge of coastal ecosystems and the species that inhabit them
Can design field sampling programs using accepted scientific methods
Has experience using a variety of marine remote sensing equipment such as water quality probes, remotely operated vehicles, and various sonar equipment
Ability to lead and manage a team efficiently
Ability to travel as needed
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $70,000.00 - $110,000.00 per year

Experience:
boat handling: 1 year (Required)
Project Management: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
San Marcos, CA 92069 (Required)
License:
SCUBA (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Marine Taxonomic Services, Ltd.","San Marcos, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
165,"Lead Data Analyst, Consumer Experience",$66k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the role

As a Lead Analyst, you will be responsible for the success of multiple work streams across our consumer product, focusing on the Move Money product experience. You will act as a mentor and manager to your fellow teammates and lead the standardization of our analytical processes and project delivery methods. You'll use data to develop insights, run experiments, and guide decision making to build consumer experiences and features to delight and solve our members' issues.

In this role, you can expect to
Define key metrics used to measure the success of our consumer banking experiences and products and develop dashboards to surface insights to drive decision making
Build a deeper understanding of our members needs and use predictive analytics to develop strategic product and business opportunities for Chime
Closely partner with product, engineering, and operations to translate your data insights into product features or recommendations; you will partner with product to drive roadmap development.
Oversee and help to define the work of other members of the team to ensure consistent delivery of high-quality outputs
Lead experimentation by providing guidance on the experiments that should be run, how they should be run, and evaluating the impact on our key metrics
Foster a data-driven, test-and-learn culture with your passion for telling stories with data
To thrive in this role, you have
A quantitative degree in a field like Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, Operations Research, or Engineering. Advanced degrees preferred
7+ years in analytics. B2C product analytics and FinTech experience preferred
2+ years direct or indirect management experience overseeing the work of 2-4 team members
Advanced SQL skills - familiarity with window functions and query optimization
A high level of comfort delivering reporting and insights within a data visualization platform (eg Looker, Tableau)
Exposure to a scripting language like Python or R and relevant data science packages
Proven experience with data science, experimentation, and statistical analysis used to guide decision making.
Excellent communication skills, a record of working cross-functionally to achieve results.
A little about us

We created Chime because we believe everyone deserves financial peace of mind. By eliminating unnecessary fees and helping people grow their savings automatically, we've empowered millions of Americans to take control of their finances.

Chime is the largest and fastest-growing U.S. player in the challenger-banking space. Through our banking partners, we offer access to bank accounts with fee-free overdraft, provide members the chance to receive early access to their paychecks, help them improve their credit, and more!

We've built one of the most experienced leadership teams in Fintech and were recently valued at over $14.5B. We've raised over $1B in funding from leading investors including DST, Coatue, Tiger Global, General Atlantic, Iconiq, Dragoneer, Menlo, Whale Rock, Access, Forerunner, Crosslink, Cathay, aCrew, and others.

What we offer
Competitive salary based on experience
401k match plus the usual medical, dental, vision, life, and disability benefits
Quarterly stipend to spruce up your home office
Generous vacation policy and company-wide Take Care of Yourself Days
Virtual events to connect with your fellow Chimers- think cooking classes, music festivals, mixology classes, paint nights, etc., and delicious snack boxes, too!
A challenging and fulfilling opportunity to join one of the most experienced teams in FinTech and help create a completely new kind of banking service
We know that great work comes from great and inclusive teams. At Chime, we specifically look for individuals of varying strengths, skills, backgrounds, and ideas. We believe this gives us a competitive advantage to better serve our members and helps us all grow as Chimers and individuals.

We hire candidates of any race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital or family status, disability, Veteran status, and any other status. Chime is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know. To learn more about how Chime collects and uses your personal information during the application process, please see the Chime Applicant Privacy Notice.",4.8,"Chime
4.8","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
166,"Scientist, Analytics - Process and Technical Development, Manufacturing",-1,"ArsenalBio’s mission is to develop efficacious and safe cellular therapies for patients with chronic diseases, initially cancer. Our products are being designed to herald the transition of adoptive cell therapy from a hospital based treatment to outpatient therapy, like most other cancer treatments. Our people are our greatest asset, they bring scientific talents in molecular biology, immunology, pharmacology, protein chemistry, computational biology, automation, genome engineering, software and other fields to make the future happen now.

We are seeking a talented and highly motivated Scientist to lead the development of analytic assays for the characterization and release of ArsenalBio’s cell therapy products. The individual will have direct technical experience in a biopharmaceutical setting in the development of analytical characterization and release methods of cell therapy products. This position will report into the EVP and Head of R&D, who oversees Product Development or their designee. The Scientist will work closely with the Process and Technical Development team to design, evaluate, integrate and implement analytical assays to support the manufacture, characterization, and release of ArsenalBio’s chimeric antigen receptor T cell (CART) programs. The Scientist will interact cross-functionally across the organization to enable the success of upstream teams in Discovery and Technology whose activities feed Process and Technology Development, as well as the downstream manufacturing teams.
What You Will Do:
Design, test, and implement quality-based analytic assays to support the characterization and release of cell therapy products.
Independently plan, execute, analyze, and report assay development and qualification studies.
Apply analytic assays to analyze development and manufacturing data for the development of a cGMP cell process.
Provide technical expertise and leadership within project teams and in a matrix environment.
Establish tracking and trending analyses of process development and cGMP production runs.
Establish and draft documentation (protocols, batch records, reports) to enable transfer of ArsenalBio’s analytical methods to external CDMO
Good understanding of cGMP environment, and Quality by Design (QBD) principles for process and assay development, qualification and validation.
Collaborate closely with other functions to enable effective and successful project development; actively engage in cross-functional collaboration with peers to overcome challenges
Organize, communicate, and present complex data sets to key stakeholders and senior management
What You Will Bring
PhD (preferred), MS or BS in a relevant scientific discipline (such as Biotechnology, Bioprocess engineering, Immunology, Molecular Biology, Biochemistry)
Minimum of 3 years of relevant experience in biopharmaceutical setting, and successful performance track record in establishing and applying Analytical assays for cell therapy products
Experience in technical development of analytic assays to support cell and gene therapy biologics and other advanced modalities in an early development setting
Strong leadership skills and strategic problem-solving ability; ability to predict issues and identify solutions
Ability to lead successfully within extended project teams and handle multiple challenges under pressure
Excellent communications and presentation skills, written and verbal
Excellent organizational skills: Proactive, management of multiple tasks of varying complexity simultaneously


We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status

To all recruitment agencies: ArsenalBio does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, or Arsenalbio employees. ArsenalBio is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",5.0,"Arsenal Biosciences
5.0","South San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
167,Research Principal Scientist Biologics Expression,$21k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us as a Research Principal Scientist Biologics Expression in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

POSITION OBJECTIVES:

Molecular biologist within Global Biologics to lead efforts in mammalian protein production supporting programs in therapeutic areas of IO/Oncology, GI/Immunology, CNS, and Rare Disease.

Innovative thinker with expertise in construct design and mammalian expression of large molecule therapeutic drug candidates and protein reagents.

POSITION ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Experience in mammalian protein expression from shake flasks and wavebags for biotherapeutic leads, protein reagents and immunogens.
Detailed understanding of the scientific and technological principles behind state-of-the-art protein expression systems.
Expertise in design, execution, and troubleshooting of expression processes and expertise in techniques for monitoring cell culture density, viability and protein titer
Experience in setting up high throughput expression systems
Experience with insect cell and E.coli expression systems to generate protein reagents
Experience in DNA construct design
Experience in optimization of mammalian cell expression plasmid vector sequences to improve transcription and mRNA stability for CHO cell line development suitable for biotherapeutic production
Experience with viral vectors, evaluation of diverse gene editing technologies and approaches including CRISPR, TALEN, transposons, etc.
Familiar with molecular biology techniques (flow cytometry, gene and protein analysis, PCR, cloning, viral work (AAV, lenti, adeno))
An innovator with a proven track record in molecular design of biologics, and a creative and proactive approach to problem solving and willingness to meet aggressive timelines
Desire to understand underlying biology and mechanism of targets and biologics to enable production of the right modality
Good understanding of downstream purification processes and analytical characterization
Experience in establishing good lab practices and ensuring staff members do so, approve weekly progress reports from staff, and generate weekly summary reports
Good organization and communication skills and the ability to collaborate within multidisciplinary teams.
Regular participation and presentation of data and analyses at project team and department meetings
Designs and directs research strategy and activities to meet program objectives; provide
leadership, timelines and contingency plans
Provide training of staff, and continue to explore opportunities to expand their responsibilities and capabilities
Independently manages workload and expectations
Scientific independent and a driver for research strategy that impacts group internally and outside area of function
Frequent contact with internal and external personnel at various management levels
Collaborates with other departments, and disciplines, acting as scientific authority within
discipline
Serves as senior company / project representative at external conferences, or business meetings
Determines methods on new assignments; makes strategic recommendations on projects; greater demonstrated independence; may manage junior staff

EDUCATION, BEHAVIORAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

PhD degree in Molecular & Cellular Biology, Biochemistry or a related filed with 8+ years experience , or
MS with 12+ years experience, or
BS with 14+ years experience

WHAT TAKEDA CAN OFFER YOU:

401(k) with company match and Annual Retirement Contribution Plan
Tuition reimbursement Company match of charitable contributions
Health & Wellness programs including onsite flu shots and health screenings
Generous time off for vacation and the option to purchase additional vacation days
Community Outreach Programs

Empowering Our People to Shine

Discover more at takedajobs.com

No Phone Calls or Recruiters Please.

#LI-SGM

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
168,Sr. Data Scientist,$108k-$169k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Commercial Lines BI team at Woodruff Sawyer is a newly founded capability to enhance the organizations capacity in providing data-backed insights to its clients seeking P&C and liability insurance. The members of this team will work closely with the VP of Commercial Lines Business Intelligence and other enterprise stakeholders to develop and roll out analytics solutions. A successful candidate will apply data science methodologies, actuarial methods, knowledge of insurance, and the latest technological tools to create reusable business intelligence assets.

What you will be doing:

With limited guidance from the leaders, managers, or project leads:
Primarily collects, prepares and analyzes data from various sources.
Executes formal exploratory data analysis for data science projects.
Develops re-usable templates and reports for the review and feedback by other team members.
Prepares analysis summaries and provides to the colleagues and leaders.
Conducts data research and presents findings.
Identifies areas of more in-depth analysis and builds prototypes for IT implementation.
Required Qualifications:
A graduate degree in any of the quantitative disciplines, e.g., Actuarial Science, Math, Engineering, Stats, Finance, or a related discipline.
Knowledge of basic data science algorithms demonstrable through internships, coursework, or a combination.
2+ years of experience in visual analysis packages such as Tableau / Power BI.
2+ years of experience in programming using Python or R.
Skilled in developing presentations in PowerPoint or equivalent.
2+ years of work experience in an insurance or FINTECH environment as a data scientist or BI analyst. (4+ for an undergraduate).
Knowledge of common insurance terminologies. A couple of actuarial exams is a plus.
What you'll be getting from us:
The opportunity to work with sharp, motivated co-workers in a collaborative and entrepreneurial team
A flexible work schedule
A fun office in vibrant downtown San Francisco
Security for your future: Employee Stock Option Program (ESOP), 401K with company match and profit sharing
Medical, Dental and Vision benefits for employees and families (including domestic partners)
Life Insurance, short term and long-term disability benefits
Paid vacation, holiday and sick days
Tuition reimbursement
Access to an Employee Assistance Program
Fun company and team outings",4.0,"Woodruff Sawyer
4.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1918,Company - Private,Insurance Agencies & Brokerages,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
169,"Senior Data Scientist, Schools",$110k-$181k (Glassdoor Est.),"What do we do?

At Teachers Pay Teachers (TpT), we're unlocking the power of educator-created content. More than 3 out of 4 teachers in the U.S., Canada, and Australia come to TpT every year to get teacher-tested, engaging, and rigorous materials. What began as a humble exchange for teachers looking to share lesson plans has since exploded into a massive marketplace where teachers have created more than 4 million resources for all aspects of PreK-12 education. More than six million educators worldwide (including teachers, administrators, and parents) have downloaded TpT resources more than a billion times. According to Fast Company, Teachers Pay Teachers is one of the top 50 Most Innovative Companies in the world in 2019. If you haven't heard of TpT yet and want to learn more, just ask a teacher.

Role

As a Senior Data Scientist you will be responsible for finding valuable insights related to our new and rapidly growing TpT School Access subscription product. You will work with product managers, business managers, data analysts, and data engineers across Engineering, Product, Sales and Marketing, and you'll use research techniques such as data visualization, statistical modeling, and machine learning to explore data, test hypotheses, identify underlying causes and patterns, and find the best ways to turn these insights into better decisions and product improvements.

You should be deeply curious, comfortable solving unstructured problems with large datasets, and excited to learn and grow your skills and domain knowledge.

Responsibilities
Help the company understand user behavior and in turn improve our product. You'll use the tools of data science, from exploratory data analysis, through statistical and predictive modeling, to data visualization and presentation.
Be a creative, critical thinker and a key member of our product teams. You'll synthesize your quantitative results with deep domain knowledge and work with others to guide strategic and day-to-day decisions.
Develop insightful predictive models to improve internal decision-making, and prototype predictive models that could be incorporated into our products.
Perform research in a product and business-driven, fast-paced, dynamic environment.
Work within our analytics technical stack, including R, BigQuery, Heap, GitHub, LaunchDarkly, and Looker.
Mentor teammates and teach what you've learned.
Qualities for a successful candidate
A track record of value-creation in previous organizations, using data science techniques to model and explain user behavior on web sites and/or B2B purchasing behavior.
Advanced knowledge of SQL and R (or Python) for data science, including reproducible research tools and processes, data exploration and visualization, and statistical modeling.
Statistical and mathematical depth equivalent to a Masters in Applied Statistics, either from a degree program or experience, including advanced regression and probabilistic modeling.
Able to choose machine learning models, train and tune them with good practices, extract insights, and suggest opportunities to productionize them.
Outstanding communications skills, including the ability to speak clearly to technical and nontechnical audiences, present insights to groups, and write clearly.
Able to keep complex projects on track and focused on value-creation.
At least three years of insights-focused data science experience in industry (less if you have a PhD in a related field).
Extracurriculars:
Parental leave for both mothers and fathers to be able to take some quality time in bonding with their new addition to their family
Comprehensive Medical & Dental Benefits
Mother's Room
Quiet Room
Company Events (Bring Your Child to Work Day, Field Day, Camp TpT, Hackathons etc.)
Here at TpT we value Diversity & Inclusion and encourage people to bring their most authentic selves to work. We cultivate an environment where people are recognized and celebrated for their individuality.

Any TpT applicant who requires reasonable accommodations during the interview process can contact the TpT People Ops Team (accommodations@teacherspayteachers.com) to make the need for an accommodation known.

Finally, if you're a California resident, California law requires that we provide you notice about the collection and use of your personal information. We encourage you to read it carefully. You can find our full notice here.",4.9,"Teachers Pay Teachers
4.9","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
170,"Computer Scientist – Machine Learning, Assoc",$87k-$152k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE is seeking an early career Computer Scientist to apply machine learning / deep learning, computer vision and cognitive science to solve some of the world’s most challenging problems. Our Data Engineering and Biometrics team provide MITRE-unique solutions across multiple sponsors. We are a driving force investigating, developing and defining multiple research initiatives in collaboration with academia, industry and our sponsors.

Responsibilities include:
Work in innovation and research initiatives related to machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science, mathematics and statistics in combination with cybersecurity, data engineering and social science
Advance the Department domain knowledge and capabilities that align with strategic/significant sponsor needs and challenges including but not limited to: Adversarial information scenarios, Defining, detecting and measuring information trust, bias/fairness in decision, models and algorithms, Biometric authentication, detecting biometric or identity fraud, anti-spoofing, Defining, detecting and measuring bias in datasets and information, Information security and privacy, Data generation, Data impacting quality of decision
Contribute to the technical work program of one or more projects and produce quality products focused on successful sponsor outcomes
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Cybersecurity, or related field
Must be a U.S. citizen with ability to possess and maintain a Secret DoD clearance and DHS fitness
Required Qualifications:
Proficiency in use of Microsoft Office including Outlook, Excel, and Word
Must have demonstrated proficiency and strength in verbal, written, PC, presentation, and communications skills
Demonstrated proficiency using tools such as: TensorFlow, Keras, Caffe, Theano, PyTorch, dlib, C/C++, Python, JSON, XML, SQL, NoSQL, DBMS, ETL
Preferred Qualifications:
Advanced degree in related field of study
Candidates that possess a current/active US Government Secret clearance are preferred
2+ years’ work experience should include: machine learning/deep learning, computer vision, cognitive science
Documented success working in the fields of: cybersecurity, data engineering, social science, mobile computing, computer networking, virtualization, cloud computing, and big data
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
171,System Engineer/Data Modeler,-1,"*\*\*\*\*\*\*Multiple Positions open with years of experience ranging from 5-20 yrs\*\*\*\*\*\** *\*\*\*\*REQUIRED: Candidate must have an active TS/SCI Full Scope Polygraph Clearance\*\*\*\** *Enterprise Architect SE4* -A Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Systems Engineering, or a related discipline and at least 10 years of systems engineering experience. A Master’s or PhD Degree may be substituted for two years of experience. Note: a High School Diploma or GED plus 14 years of systems engineering experience would also be acceptable. -At least three years of demonstrated experience in DoD Architectural Framework (DoDAF) or Federal Enterprise Architectural Framework (FEAF). -An understanding of data architecture approaches (e.g., DODAF, Zachman, UAF, TOGAF, JARM, etc.), industry standards and best practices (e.g., DMBOK) -Familiarity with the use and operation of Enterprise Architecture tools (e.g. System Architect, Magic Draw, Cameo Enterprise Architecture, SPARX, IBM Rhapsody, CORE or Power Designer Architecture Tool Suites) *Model Based System Engineering SE5* -Work in small teams to translate existing documentation and subject matter expert knowledge into System Engineering models using a software tool (CORE or CAMEO). -Successful candidates are system engineer practitioners, with system-level experience contributing to complex system-of-system engineering. -Candidates must have hands-on experience producing SE products, use cases, architectures, and related engineering functions. -Candidates must have produced and be able to interpret Use Case Diagrams with specifications, understand and be able to describe system architecture. -Experience with SE software tools is highly desired but not required. *DCGS SE ORA-3/SE-5* The DCGS Systems Engineer will work directly with the Distributed Common Ground/Surface System (DCGS) Team and be responsible for installing, configuring, monitoring and maintaining Windows and Linux servers and workstations. -This position will also support all of the DCGS Team activities to include Tactical SIGINT integration and National Tactical integration, STORMFORCE, and testing efforts for a variety of challenging tactical SIGINT Interoperability initiatives. -Candidate will facilitate discovery of technical solutions and work with U.S. and international government, military, and industry stakeholders to test and validate solutions. Candidate should be familiar with and able to coordinate with a variety of national and tactical SIGINT capabilities, including Theater Netcentric Geolocation (TNG) capabilities at both the National and service level. Candidate will participate in live test events. -Candidate must be willing and able to travel; with up to a one month trip annually, to support STORMFORCE and several shorter (up to one week) trips to support STORMFORCE, DCGS, and other activities, as needed. Candidate must have the ability to lift up to 40lbs to help load/unload equipment and supplies for STORMFORCE. -A working knowledge of the following is required: NSAnet architecture and policies, Windows/Linux systems administration and security best practices, setting up a SIPR domain, guards/cross-domain solutions, networking environments and performance monitoring, network optimization and security*.* *Data Modeler/Mapper, SE6 (NSAC)* This is an NSAC-based position. Assists mission organizations and data architecture teams in developing physical, logical and conceptual data models that are crafted using a local model methodology. This methodology guides the creation of supporting UML class diagrams. These UML based models will be the source for mission physical models and associated exchange formats. -Performing logical and physical data modeling. Skills needed include UML and relational theory. -Develop and maintain artifacts, such as: Logical Data Models (LDM), Data Element Dictionaries (DED), model release documentation, data mappings. -Ensure that TechSIGINT mission models align with the entire collection of models. -Coordinate, meet, and hold Technical Peer Reviews with Subject Matter Experts and Stakeholder communities to discuss requirements and models developed. -Define and analyze data requirements, map legacy data stores and formats to logical data model concepts. *Data Modeler, SE4-5-6/SDM1-2-3* Assists mission organizations and data architecture teams in developing logical and conceptual data models that are crafted using a local model methodology. This methodology guides the creation of supporting UML class diagrams. These UML based models will be the source for mission physical models and associated exchange formats. -Analyzing customer requirements in order to produce and maintain artifacts such as Logical Data Models (LDM), Data Element Dictionaries (DED), model release documentation, and data mappings. -Representing business and mission concepts, their definitions, properties, and relationships via modeling. -Collaborating with data modelers within the organization and from other organizations to develop data models of common concern. -Aligning domain models and mission models with each other and with enterprise models. -Coordinating, meeting, and holding technical peer reviews with subject matter experts and stakeholders to discuss modeling requirements and perform model validation. -Producing models to support the mapping of data in legacy data formats and data stores to modern formats and enterprise data stores. *CRS SE6* Provide SE support to the Customer Requirements Management Program -Experience in Cognitive Systems Engineering, Human Factors Engineering, -Industrial Engineering, or demonstrated experience in face-to-face Requirements elicitation from non-technical customers and translating those into technical requirements. -Excellent oral and written communication skill *CRS SE4* Provide SE support to the Customer Requirements Management Program -Familiar with agile development and test methodologies. -Recent demonstrated experience in the administration and back end engineering of JIRA/ Confluence -Familiar with automating reporting and tracking diverse projects within JIRA/Confluence. -Recent experience in integrating the requirements of multiple organizations using the JIRA/Confluence Tool -Excellent interpersonal skills and diplomacy. Excellent oral and written communication skills. *MSO SE5 – GRAILS (SE5)* -Experience using Groovy-on-Rails (GRAILS) -Proficiency with hand-coding HTML, JavaScript, jQuery, CSS, and HTML5 -Experience with Bootstrap, jQuery UI, and the jQuery ecosystem, OR strong understanding of MEAN Stack (MongoDB, Express.js, Angular.js, and Node.js) -Experience designing and engineering web-based applications using standards-based HTML/CSS/ JavaScript -Solid understanding of current web standards and technologies *CSDI SE5 Data Analytics* -Assist in maintaining the overall Phase 2 architecture and collaborate with and between development teams in the area of data analytics -Familiar with the principles and concepts of service-oriented architectures and data analytics -Familiar with agile development and test methodologies -Excellent oral and written communication skills *Network and Storage SME (SE5)* · _Overview: Looking for an SE to assist in planning and optimizing distributed data centers_ -High Performance Computing network and storage integration support -Evaluating new products, methodologies, and agency policies to continually improve data center services while reducing cost and customer turn-around -Working on architecture documents to forge new milestones to allow data center offerings stay relevant -Actively participate in future roadmap decisions for storage, network, HPC, and server support -Analyzing issues, including capacity planning for HPC-specific solutions such as Lustre fabric and high-speed networks -Driving automation across data centers *Analytic and Engagement Applications SE6* -Provide leadership, providing guidance, manage individual assigned tasks to schedule, and drive communication and engagement with stakeholders. -Provide systems engineering, technical analysis and guidance to support Y36’s response to corporate mission needs affecting tools/systems within their portfolio. -Provide relevant mission and tool understanding to investigate and triage mission needs to discover and document potential impacts. -Engage and collaborate with tool owners and development teams to analyze, investigate, discover and document technical assessments and responses related to mission needs affecting the portfolio. *TECHSIGINT SE6* -Documentation and design of TechSIGINT data flows and related applications such as WRANGLER, GRM and IM&S -Documentation of WRANGLER database processes -Knowledge of TechSIGINT data formats, intercept metadata and USSID guidelines -Subject Matter Expertise with modernization efforts associated with transition formats -Experience in test development and evaluation -Experience in completing and tracking milestone completion and updates to documentation *CMS Lead System Engineer SE6* The SE will assist with the analysis and documentation of current systems, evaluation of potential new systems, identification of capabilities gaps, development of data models, and development of system transition, data migration, and decommissioning plans and activities in support of CMS’ modernization plans and in the design of enterprise solutions. -Significant system engineering experience in the Intelligence Community (IC) -Familiarity with IC system engineering policies, directives, and regulations. -Familiar with agile development and test methodologies. -Skilled communicator, able to collaborate with program management, lead system engineers (LSE), engineer review boards, and working groups. -Ability to provide guidance to program offices and engineer leads in facilitating/coordinating engineer documents, host technical exchange meetings, and brief organizational document review processes. -Ability to lead document reviews; ensure target dates for completion are met; facilitate consolidation of comments; track status of comments matrix during adjudication process. *CMS System Engineer 5* The SE will assist with the analysis and documentation of current systems, evaluation of potential new systems, identification of capabilities gaps, development of data models, and development of system transition, data migration, and decommissioning plans and activities in support of CMS’ modernization plans and in the design of enterprise solutions. -Familiar with agile development and test methodologies. -Ability to work independently and in groups to complete tasks bounded by constraints. -Ability to breakdown complex problem space, formulate technical strategies, build action plans, and track progress against established baselines to resolve technical challenges and meet customer expectations. -Knowledge and understanding of customer’s overall mission areas. Job Type: Full-time Experience: * DoD and IC: 10 years (Preferred) Education: * Bachelor's (Preferred)",-1,Strategic Analytix,"Fort Meade, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
172,"in vitro Research Scientist, Respiratory Diseases",$60k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"500+ million people worldwide suffer from chronic respiratory diseases. The Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research is seeking an experienced and highly motivated scientist to join the Integrated Discovery Biology group in the Respiratory Diseases Department.

The Respiratory Disease Area is dedicated to discovering new therapies for diseases such as Cystic Fibrosis, Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease (COPD), Asthma, and Idiopathic Pulmonary Fibrosis. The group’s primary responsibilities are the discovery and validation of new targets, performing in vitro and in vivo experiments that support the selection of clinical candidates, and the coordination of preclinical activities, to ensure a smooth progression of candidates through the development process.

As a Research Scientist, you'll work in an interdisciplinary, dynamic environment, developing novel in vitro models that will drive target discovery and validation. You will have proven proficiency in cell-based assay technologies that will drive decision-making activities, to bring forward development candidates for therapies for patients with chronic lung diseases.

Key responsibilities:

• Design and conduct in vitro experiments to interrogate biological processes and test novel therapeutics for activity against key signaling mechanisms
• Perform cell culture with primary human lung cells and establish endpoints relevant to chronic lung diseases
• Deliver, analyze, and interpret high quality data to help advance drug discovery projects
• Effectively collaborate with cross functional teams to support experimental plans
• Perform confocal and/or multi-photon fluorescence microscopy on above assay systems, to study real-time signaling events and physiological responses to novel therapeutics

What You'll Bring to the Role:

• BS or MS (or equivalent) in the biological sciences, or a related subject area, and a minimum of 2 years related laboratory experience in a role requiring in vitro support to project teams with a strong emphasis on cellular biology studies
• Experience in the culture of human primary cells
• Strong cellular and molecular technical skills
• in vitro cell assay development expertise
• Excellent written and verbal communication skills
• Ability to work efficiently in a collaborative and multidisciplinary team
• Ability to independently design experiments and generate, analyze, and present data.
• An ability to troubleshoot and solve problems

Desirable Skills:

• Experience with flow cytometry, qPCR, Western blotting, microscopy, and quantitative analyses
• Human epithelial cell culture and experiment experience, ideally with respiratory airway cells
• Respiratory epithelial biology and disease knowledge
• Familiarity with compound handling, and the identification and implementation of new technologies to improve in vitro models

Why consider Novartis?

799 million. That’s how many lives our products touched in 2019. And while we’re proud of that fact, in this world of digital and technological transformation, we must also ask ourselves this: how can we continue to improve and extend even more people’s lives?

We believe the answers are found when curious, courageous and collaborative people like you are brought together in an inspiring environment. Where you’re given opportunities to explore the power of digital and data. Where you’re empowered to risk failure by taking smart risks, and where you’re surrounded by people who share your determination to tackle the world’s toughest medical challenges.

Imagine what you could do at Novartis!

Commitment to Diversity & Inclusion:

Novartis embraces diversity, equal opportunity and inclusion. We are committed to building diverse teams, representative of the patients and communities we serve, and we strive to create an inclusive workplace that cultivates bold innovation through collaboration, and empowers our people to unleash their full potential.

The Novartis Group of Companies are Equal Opportunity Employers and take pride in maintaining a diverse environment. We do not discriminate in recruitment, hiring, training, promotion or any other employment practices for reasons of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, marital or veteran status, disability, or any other legally protected status.",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
173,Sr. Data Scientist,$103k-$162k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientists produce innovative solutions driven by exploratory data analysis from complex and high-dimensional datasets. Sr. Data Scientists apply knowledge of statistics, data modeling, and advanced mathematics to recognize patterns, identify opportunities, pose business questions, and make valuable discoveries.

Scope

Participate on projects and manage project phases or smaller projects in their entirety (includes project management)
Partner with customers across the organization to assess needs and define business questions. Influencing customers to take action on analytical insights
Communicate results and insights, both verbally and written (including visual graphics), in a clear and concise manner to a non-technical audience
Proactively identify and communicate roadblocks. Evaluate and suggest alternatives to overcome
Lead multiple concurrent projects and accommodate frequent interruptions and changing priorities
Effectively lead meetings with customers and guide discussion and decision making.

Data Analysis

Identify, define and translate business needs/problems into analytical questions. Emerging ability to think strategically and broadly (end to end process), analyzing complex business problems
Design and execute experiments, models, algorithms, and visualizations
Fully understand data sources and limitations, warehousing system and the impact of the data on business decisions
Identify, retrieve, and manipulate data from internal and external datasets
Apply advanced statistical and computational methodologies to provide actionable insights and identify strategic opportunities that optimize quality, consumer experience, and healthcare costs
Develop scalable, efficient, and automated processes for large scale data analyses and model development, validation, and implementation

Successful Candidate Will

Write technical reports, white papers, and publications
Stay current on new processes and technology in Data Science and provide findings on advanced analytical and computational methodologies to other Data Scientists and analysts
Manage projects from end to end and develop project plans

Preferred Qualifications

Master's degree Applied Mathematics, Computer science (e.g. specialization: Machine learning/Artificial Intelligence /Visualization, databases, and Big Data), Statistics, Epidemiology, Health Services Research, or closely related field with Data Science specializationExperience with Hadoop, Tableau, R, and Netezza Java, Perl, Python, UNIX/Linux scripting
Healthcare, medical, or pharmaceutical work experience
Experience with analysis around quality, consumer experience, and healthcare costs
SAS certification

Required Experience

7+ years related work experience. Experience Details: Data Scientist or similar role
Related Bachelor's degree or additional related equivalent work experience Data Science, Applied Mathematics, Computer science (e.g. specialization: Machine learning/Artificial Intelligence /Visualization, databases, and Big Data), Statistics, Epidemiology, Health Services Research, or closely related field with Data Science specialization
2-5 years experience with statistical packages SAS (R is acceptable), SAS EG, SAS EM and SQL
Must have applied experience with advanced statistics e.g. predictive analytics models
Experience with large data sets Excel/PowerPoint skills (including visual graphics)
Clear proven track record of creating strong actionable insights that drive decision making and business process

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veteran/Disabled.

We are interested in every qualified applicant who is eligible to work in the United States. However, we are not able to sponsor VISAs at this time.",3.5,"Florida Blue
3.5","Jacksonville, FL",-1,10000+ Employees,1944,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
174,Data Engineer - TS/SCI w/Poly,$62k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Job Description:

Why wake up every day and want more when YOU CAN HAVE IT? Do you love KNOWING at the end of each day that your work made a difference? We embrace and solve some of the world's toughest challenges. We’re focused on ensuring our intelligence customers have the right tools, technologies, and tactics to keep pace with an ever evolving threat landscape and succeed in their mission to protect people and critical assets around the world. Who wouldn’t be fulfilled being part of that every day? We know once you join Team Leidos, you are sure to go home at the end of every day knowing YOU MADE A DIFFERENCE, resulting in one of the most REWARDING careers you could have imagined. EACH DAY MATTERS!

We have an IMMEDIATE NEED for a Data Engineer to provide Agile DevOps support to mission critical systems. As a Data Engineer on this program, you will have the opportunity to use Data Engineering, Data Science and Software Engineer techniques to satisfy customer requirements in processing, transforming and enriching large scale datasets. This role designs, develops, tests and maintains processing pipelines, web services and APIs to condition, enhance, model and apply domain-specific logic to data for use by API consumers and Mission Applications. This role deals with a wide variety of raw data and data processed at different levels using Python or Java and associated libraries or frameworks: Spark, PySpark, Spark Streaming, DataFrames, Flask, Scikit-Learn, Parquet, Numpy, Pandas, etc.) that utilize, collect, aggregate and clean large data sets to implement services perform analysis, extraction, and enrichment for persistence in various data stores. This role collaborates across a team of Data Engineers, Data Scientists, Administrators, and Software Engineers to produce work products using a CI/CD workflow in an Agile development process.

Primary Responsibilities:

This role supports objectives and tasks by leveraging numerous tools, techniques and infrastructures to include Elasticsearch, Spark, and AWS/S3
Responsible for building, orchestrating and running data migrations across different datastores/databases and environments, for example, data migration from an on-premises Elasticsearch cluster to a cloud hosted Elasticsearch cluster.
Responsible for building solutions that respect customer data policy, retention, compliance, governance and handling requirements
Coordinates across various internal teams to ensure linkage between numerous data sources

Basic Qualifications:

Degree in engineering, computer science, or other related technical field or degree in a business or management-related field accompanied by experience managing technical requirements in complex programs.
Hands-on experience with Python, Java and data processing, manipulation or querying (SQL or NoSQL)
Hands-on experience with Spark/PySpark, MapReduce or other large scale distributed processing frameworks.
Experience working on complex scenarios and challenges and devising courses of action to resolve situations with predictable outcomes.
Experience working on critical objectives where decision making is of utmost concern to the outcome.
The candidate must have a Bachelor's degree with Bachelor's degree with 4-8 years of experience; or a Master's with 2-6 years of experience.
Will consider experience in lieu of a degree.

Preferred Qualifications:

Experience with tools like Git, Jenkins, Unix bash scripting
Experience developing in or deploying to AWS""

Clearance/Citizenship

Candidate must be US Citizen.
Candidate must have an active TS/SCI with Polygraph

""External Referral Eligible""

NSOINT

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.7,"Leidos
3.7","Reston, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
175,"Research Scientist (Computer Vision, Machine Learning)",$60k-$126k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Robotics and Electromechanical Systems (REMS) Group at Intelligent Automation, Inc. (IAI) has an open full-time position for a Research Scientist in computer vision and machine learning. We are looking for an outstanding self-motivated researcher with a Masters or Doctorate degree in Electrical Engineering or Computer Science with a background in computer vision and machine learning.

You will be working with the multi-disciplinary team of scientists and engineers to conduct R&D in the fields of video analytics, machine learning, robotics perception and AI. We have numerous active research and development projects where we design, integrate, test, and deploy systems for a range of applications, including image and video analytics, artificial intelligence, scene understanding, perception for autonomous systems, healthcare, training, and simulation.

The desired candidate should have a strong publication record in computer vision particularly in the areas of deep learning, object detection, tracking and classification, segmentation, cross-modality inference, self-supervised learning, activity recognition, and robotic vision. A solid background in programming is important.

CITIZENSHIP / VISA STATUS: Applicant must be a US Citizen or US Permanent Resident (Green Card)

JOB DUTIES

Conduct research and development in the area of computer vision and image processing
Design, implement, and integrate computer vision and machine learning algorithms and prototypes
Interact with and support multiple research teams
Support program management and business development efforts by writing reports and presenting to customers

REQUIRED EXPERIENCE & EDUCATION

Masters or Doctorate degree in computer science, electrical engineering, computer engineering, mathematics or other related field
Minimum 3 years of hands-on experience in research, engineering, or research & development

DESIRED SKILLS

Proficiency in Python, C++, and MATLAB
Minimum 3 years of experience with computer vision techniques such as object recognition, segmentation, and classification
Experience with machine learning or deep learning models
Proficient technical writing and strong communication skills
Familiarity with computer vision libraries and machine learning framework, such as OpenCV, PyTorch, and TensorFlow
Experience with embedded vision development

About IAI

IAI is a technology innovation company specializing in providing advanced technology solutions and R&D services to federal agencies and corporations. IAI leverages agile R&D processes, a multi-disciplinary collaborative environment, and its substantial intellectual property portfolio to excel in developing concepts into market-focused products and customer-driven solutions. IAI’s core R&D areas include: AI & Advanced Computing; Autonomy & Robotics; Healthcare Research Technologies; Modeling, Simulation & Visualization; and Networks & Cyber Security; and Radar, Communications & Sensors. For more information about IAI please visit www.i-a-i.com.

US Citizenship or Permanent Residency required

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race,

color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status.

Requisition ID: 20-1247",3.6,"Intelligent Automation
3.6","Rockville, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1987,Company - Private,"Health, Beauty, & Fitness",Consumer Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
176,"Scientist, Process & Analytical Development - Cell Therapy",$97k-$171k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us as a Scientist, Process & Analytical Development - Cell Therapy in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

As a Scientist, Process & Analytical Development - Cell Therapy working on the Pharmaceutical Sciences, Cell Therapy team, you will be empowered to build a world class cell therapy team.

POSITION OBJECTIVES:

This scientist position will play an important role in developing the clinical manufacturing processes and/or analytical methods for developing cellular therapy products. Independently plans and executes process and assay development, characterization and qualification studies. Prepares study protocols, reports, technology transfer documentation, and regulatory documents for clinical trials. Presents study results at team or department meetings, to external partners or at conferences.

POSITION ACCOUNTABILITIES:

• Understands project timelines and deliverables and plans/coordinates project work accordingly with departmental, functional and external stakeholders

• Provides technical leadership to project teams within area of expertise and commits resources to execute specific project tasks.

• Contributes significantly and independently to project work which may include multiple projects within functional area.

• Reviews, interprets and communicates data cross-functionally within CMC and/or project teams.

• Plans and implements resolutions to technical problems/issues

• Supports local and global initiatives which may include leading initiatives or work streams

• Serves as a technical resource for junior staff and leverages expertise in laboratory technology as a functional resource/trainer.

• Independently designs and executes experiments, and reports results

• Assists with development of project strategy and communicates complex data/decisions within department and cross functionally as necessary

• Builds and maintains relationships with key vendors and assists with technical aspects of vendor negotiations

• Proactively analyses manufacturing issues and coordinates potential resolution with the CMC team.

• Responsible for integrating scientific/technical efforts around cross-functional issues.

EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE, BEHAVIOURAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

Education and Experience:

Required:

• PhD in immunology, virology, cancer biology or stem cell biology or related pharmaceutical science; 0+ years relevant industry experience

• Experience in working in a multi-disciplinary team environment

• Demonstrated mastery of subject or area related to field

LINE FUNCTION SPECIFIC QUALIFICATIONS:

• Experience in developing cell therapy products (CAR-T, CAR-NK or iPSC derived cells) , or experience in developing and executing cellular characterization assays, including flow cytometry-based, and multiplexed luminescent readouts

• In-depth experience in principles and practices of cell biology methodologies, cellular immunology or stem cell biology (e.g., induced pluripotent stem cells (iPSCs)), including cell culture, viral transduction (retroviral or lentiviral), development and execution of functional in vitro and preclinical methods relevant for various types of immune cells or stem cells.

• Understanding and experience of using the tools of Design of Experiment (DOE) and Quality by Design (QBD) in process & assay design, development, qualification and validation.

• Understanding of viral transduction principles and processes is strongly preferred

• Previous exposure to cell therapy or biological products, or participation in technical transfer of clinical processes to a CMO, or tech transfer of product release & characterization or clinical assays to a CRO, or other third party is a plus

Knowledge and Skills:

• Analytical and Problem-Solving Skills - Able to troubleshoot critical issues or problems, and determine causes and possible solutions

• Teamwork - Ability to work well in highly cross functional team environment and across global line functions.

• Communication Skills -Able to expresses one’s self clearly and concisely within team; documents issues and/or concerns concisely with colleagues; adjusts communication style as appropriate for the audience; timely and effectively communicates issues to supervisor; technical writing skills to support authorship of internal technical documents

• Organization – Exercises good time management and prioritization skills and is able to successfully manage multiple tasks simultaneously

• Knowledge Sharing - Ability to capture organizational knowledge; improve solutions, processes, and deliverables through use of information; improve information capital by contributing experience, theories, deliverables, and models for others to use

• Resource Management -Ability to manage one’s time within individual, departmental, and corporate goals and timelines; management of internal and external resources (vendors)

• External Involvement – Demonstrated involvement in professional community evidenced by presentation of scientific posters or lectures at professional conferences or events

• Technical - Subject matter expertise and knowledge of applicable lab equipment and operations.

TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS:

• May require approximately 5-10% travel

WHAT TAKEDA CAN OFFER YOU:

• 401(k) with company match and Annual Retirement Contribution Plan

• Tuition reimbursement

• Company match of charitable contributions

• Health & Wellness programs including onsite flu shots and health screenings

• Generous time off for vacation and the option to purchase additional vacation days

• Community Outreach Programs

#LI-AA1

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
177,Scientist - Automation,$52k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB DESCRIPTION

Title: Scientist - Automation

Department: Vaccine Sciences - Dabney

Location: Richmond, Virginia

PPD is a leading global contract research organization providing comprehensive, integrated drug development, laboratory and lifecycle management services. At PPD, we are passionate, deliberate, and driven by our purpose- to improve health!

Envision a workplace where you have a direct impact on improving health, work alongside expert scientists, use newest technologies and collaborate with industry thought leaders and therapeutic experts. Welcome to PPD® Laboratories, where science is our passion, quality is our commitment and people are the cornerstone of our success.

As a Scientist you will perform a variety of complex sample preparation and analysis procedures to quantitatively measure pharmaceutical and biopharmaceutical compounds in a variety of formulations and/or biological matrices.

At PPD we hire the best, develop ourselves and each other, and recognize the power of being one team. We offer continued career advancement opportunities, award winning training and benefits focused on the health and well being of our employees.

Summarized Purpose:

A scientist possesses a thorough understanding of laboratory procedures and can reliably conduct complex analysis with increased independence. Performs a variety of complex sample preparation and analysis procedures to quantitatively measure pharmaceutical and biopharmaceutical compounds in a variety of formulations and/or biological matrices. Follows validated or experimental analytical procedures with periodic direct supervision. Responsible for review and compilation of results and data comparison against SOP acceptance criteria, methodology, protocol and product specifications. Enters data into databases and reports. Performs self-review for own data prior to QC submission.

Essential Functions:

Performs a variety of complex sample preparation and analysis procedures to quantitatively measure pharmaceutical and biopharmaceutical compounds in a variety of formulations and /or biological matrices for stability and analytical testing.

Works with multiple functional groups to meet business needs

Plans and organizes work with periodic supervision

Sets up and maintains analytical instrumentation.

Trains on routine operation, maintenance and theory of analytical instrumentation, SOPs and regulatory procedures and guidelines.

Ensures QA findings are addressed appropriately.

Aids and training to other team members.

Problem solving, either independently or with assistance pertaining to extraction and/or instrumentation problems.

Communicates project status to project leader.

Performs work assignments accurately, and in a timely and safe manner.

Reviews, interprets, and analyzes data for technical, quality and compliance to protocols, methods, SOPs, client criteria and Good Manufacturing Practices (GMP) or Good Laboratory Practices (GLP).

Performs self and peer review of the data for accuracy and compliance with reporting requirements prior to submission to QA and issuance to customers.

#GD
#LI-AP1
PPDLABS

Job Qualification

Education and Experience:

Bachelor's degree in science (biology or chemistry prefrred) or equivalent and relevant formal academic / vocational qualification
Previous experience that provides the knowledge, skills, and abilities to perform the job (comparable to 2+ years).
In some cases, an equivalency, consisting of a combination of appropriate education, training and/or directly related experience, will be considered sufficient for an individual to meet the requirements of the role.

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:

Demonstrated knowledge of multiple laboratory techniques
Knowledge and hands on experience with automated laboratory equipment

Proficient in Microsoft Excel and Word

Proven ability to interpret data by performing trend analysis

Proven ability in technical writing skills

Ability to independently optimize analytical methods

Proven problem solving and troubleshooting abilities

Good written and oral communication skills

Time management and project management skills

Ability to work in a collaborative work environment with a team

Working Environment:

PPD values the health and well being of our employees. We support and encourage individuals to create a healthy and balanced environment where they can thrive. Below is listed the working environment/requirements for this role:

Able to communicate, receive, and understand information and ideas with diverse groups of people in a comprehensible and reasonable manner.
Able to work upright and stationary and/or standing for typical working hours.
Able to lift and move objects up to 25 pounds
Able to work in non-traditional work environments.
Able to use and learn standard office equipment and technology with proficiency.
May have exposure to potentially hazardous elements, including infectious agents, typically found in healthcare or laboratory environments.
Able to perform successfully under pressure while prioritizing and handling multiple projects or activities.

PPD Defining Principles:

We have a strong will to win - We earn our customer’s trust - We are gamechangers - We do the right thing - We are one PPD -

If you resonate with our five principles above, and ultimately wish to accelerate the delivery of safe and effective therapeutics for some of the world’s most urgent health needs, then please submit your application – we’d love to hear from you.

Diversity Statement
PPD is proud to be an affirmative action employer that values diversity as a strength and fosters an environment of mutual respect. PPD is committed to providing equal employment opportunities without regard to age, race, color, pregnancy, national origin, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, disability, veteran status or status within any other protected group.",3.8,"PPD
3.8","Richmond, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
178,Air Compliance Staff Engineer or Scientist,$43k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"SCS Engineers is an employee-owned environmental consulting and contracting firm that designs and implements sustainable environmental solutions. We just celebrated our 50th anniversary as a company on April 1, 2020! Our core capabilities are: solid and hazardous waste management, landfill gas, environmental due-diligence and assessment, brownfields redevelopment , site remediation, renewable energy, and regulatory compliance for businesses and municipalities responsible for protecting our air, water, and soil. Our employees take pride in their work, and together, we have the singular vision to be the environmental firm of choice for clients and our employee owners. If you thrive in a friendly, collaborative company and desire dynamic and challenging work among a team of innovative individuals, then SCS is the place for you. Are you up for the challenge?

Job Summary

To support our ongoing environmental consulting business efforts, SCS Engineers is looking for an air compliance specialist to become a long-term asset to our growing practice in California. This individual will be required to complete technical work, manage and maintain contact with clients, and manage the schedule and work product performed consistent within SCSs quality control standards. We prefer this person to be based in Long Beach, but are open to them being based in another SCS California office.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Air quality permitting and compliance; greenhouse gas emissions compliance; general regulatory compliance; various permitting for solid waste and industrial facility projects
Technical work may include completing calculations, reviewing compliance issues, preparing permitting documentation, reviewing data, research, and report writing as well as related services.
Work may also include in field activities, such as field meetings on engineering-related issues, oversight of construction activities, collection of samples, site inspections, etc.
Client interaction and preparation of proposals will be required on an as needed basis
Occasional travel may be required.
Qualifications
Bachelors of Science Degree or higher in Environmental, Chemical, or Civil Engineering, or other Science degree required
2 to 5 years of related experience in Air Quality and/or related disciplines required
Engineer-in-Training (EIT) preferred for engineering candidates
Demonstrated knowledge in Air Compliance required
Strong communication skills, oral and written (technical)
Valid drivers license with a driving record in good standing required
MS Office software, with particular demonstrated skills in MS Excel; AutoCAD and/or GIS expertise would be a plus
At SCS, you will have an opportunity to contribute to our strategic direction, help us continue to grow, and provide our clients with responsive, innovative, high quality client service. We offer excellent opportunities for career advancement and a competitive compensation package, including: medical, dental, vision, 401K, ESOP, Student Debt Employer Contribution Program, paid holidays and PTO.

SCS Engineers is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE). SCS provides equal employment opportunities to all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran or disabled status.

If you have questions, difficulty using our online system and/or you need an accommodation due to a disability then please contact us about your interest in employment at recruiting@scsengineers.com.",4.1,"SCS Engineers
4.1","Long Beach, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1970,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
179,Senior Product Data Analyst,$77k-$137k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Remitly, we help immigrant communities around the world send $6 billion a year to their loved ones. Sending money is faster, easier, and costs less with our all-digital money transfer platform. We want to transform the lives of immigrants and their families by providing the most trusted financial service products on the planet. At Remitly, your work has a direct and positive impact on people around the globe. Your work matters, every day.

The Role:

The North America Product team at Remitly is in charge of optimizing our customer experience through a test and learn agenda. As a Senior Product Analyst on this team, you will work with product managers, engineers, and UX designers to guide product improvements for our customers. You will propose data-driven hypotheses to improve our customer experience, design and analyze A/B tests. The quantitative insights you bring will have an out-sized impact on the business. You will report directly to our Director of Product Analytics.

What You'll Do:
You will uncover product insights in our conversion funnel, with the goal of increasing healthy customer conversion by increasing our new customer adoption rates and monthly active customers.
You will visualize a quantitative view of the performance of our customer acquisition and onboarding funnel that results in applicable analysis.
You ask, ""Why?"" and question the status quo. You view unexpected data results as a puzzle to be solved, a challenge that you accept.
You can explain the methods behind your analyses and validate your results. Once you have data to support your ideas, you're willing to advocate for and move your recommendations forward.
About you:
Bachelor's degree in a technical, business, or quantitative field (Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, or related field).
Minimum five years of relevant experience in a product or customer analytics role.
Experience designing and analyzing A/B experiments and are comfortable with basic statistical techniques
Experience working at startups or large consumer internet/technology companies
Experience with technical skills (e.g. SQL, R, Python) and data visualization tools (e.g. Tableau)
Our Benefits:
Unlimited paid time off
Health, dental, and vision benefits + 401k plan with company matching
Company contributions to your HSA or FSA plan, if you choose one
Continuing education and corridor travel benefits
Scholars program
Remitly is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Equal employment opportunity has been, and will continue to be, a fundamental principle at Remitly. We are committed to nondiscrimination across our global organization and in all of our business operations. Employment is determined based upon personal capabilities and qualifications without discrimination on the basis of race, creed, color, religion, sex, gender identification and expression, marital status, military status or status as an honorably discharge/veteran, pregnancy (including a woman's potential to get pregnant, pregnancy-related conditions, and childbearing), sexual orientation, age (40 and over), national origin, ancestry, citizenship or immigration status, physical, mental, or sensory disability (including the use of a trained dog guide or service animal), HIV/AIDS or hepatitis C status, genetic information, status as an actual or perceived victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or any other protected class as established by law.

Remitly is an E-Verify Employer",4.4,"Remitly
4.4","Seattle, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
180,SQL Developer/Data Analyst,$46k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Corbins Electric, we believe people are first! Our teammates, our partners, and our customers can expect that we genuinely care to serve them and look out for their best interests. Our culture is built on the cornerstone of our Core Values – Passion, Relationships, Innovation, Development and Excellence! They set our expectation of each and every employee and are integrated in everything we do. As one of the largest electrical contractors in the Southwest and an industry leader in virtual construction, fabrication, electrical construction, and electrical service, we continually look for people who share in our Core Values to better themselves and contribute to our mission of changing the construction industry as empowered thought leaders.
As the SQL Developer/Data Analyst you will be providing cutting edge analysis of financial and construction data. You will work with key stakeholders to design processes and present data in a meaningful way to help drive business decisions. You will design the database structure and basic workflows for reimagined processes while ensuring data integrity. You will get the opportunity to drive the entire process from start to finish: inception to finished product that we put in our users hands.

Build databases and write database transactions
Develop database structures to accurately and efficiently store data from new or existing processes
Develop the front end for basic CRUD apps to map these in a platform called Xalt (rapid app development platform) using the database structures created
Build Basic UI components to display data and processes in Xalt
Develop SQL stored procedures that produce and manipulate data in a useful way
Utilize different data sources to provide connected data analysis
Develop SQL analysis queries to produce insights about the company
Continuously work with key stakeholders to clean up data and streamline data analysis

Advanced skill in T-SQL, stored procedures, and common table expressions (CTE)
Ability to develop appropriate relational database structures given requirements
Ability to work with different data sources and consolidate the information
Understanding of object oriented design concepts
Understanding of programming paradigms and best practices
Basic UX/UI understanding
Passionate to understand business environments and translate business needs into technical requirements to provide technical solutions for the business.
Enjoys working with key stakeholders and business leaders to develop requirements and adept at communicating technical ideas to non-technical audiences”
Ability to handle multiple tasks in a detailed efficient manner
Enjoys working in a team environment
PowerBI or other data visualization experience is preferred, but not required
Education/Certifications
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field",3.8,"Corbins Electric
3.8","Phoenix, AZ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1975,Company - Private,Construction,"Construction, Repair & Maintenance",$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
181,Principal Data Scientist Virtual Hiring Event,$94k-$149k (Glassdoor Est.),"GEICO Hiring Event!

Event Details
Date: Wednesday, October 21, 2020

What We're Hiring For

DevOps Engineer

Big Data Developer

Workday Financials

Workday Integration Developer

DevOps SRE Engineer

Principal Data Scientist

Actuarial Analyst

Senior IT Auditor

Underwriting Business Analyst

Statutory Accountant

Instructional Designer

Senior Strategic Business Analyst

Intake Details:

Requirements

A Bachelors Degree or equivalent professional experience is required

All candidates must meet the minimum requirement listed in the individual description of the job applied for

Technical requirements

The interview will take place on Indeed's virtual interviewing platform. After RSVP, you will find a link in your email that will lead you directly to the video interview lobby during the event. Try to find a quiet place with good lighting and a stable internet connection.

What to bring to this event

Resume

What to wear

Dress code is Business casual (dress pants/skirt, button down/blouse, optional tie).

About GEICO

For more than 75 years, GEICO has stood out from the rest of the insurance industry! We are one of the nation's largest and fastest-growing auto insurers thanks to our low rates, outstanding service and clever marketing. We're an industry leader employing thousands of dedicated and hard-working associates. As a wholly owned subsidiary of Berkshire Hathaway, we offer associates training and career advancement in a financially stable and rewarding workplace.

As a full-time associate, you’ll enjoy our Total Rewards Program to help secure your financial future and preserve your health and well-being, including:

• Premier Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance with no waiting period
• Paid Vacation, Sick and Parental Leave
• 401(k) Plan with Profit Sharing
• Tuition Reimbursement
• Paid Training and Licensures

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

GEICO's Data Science team uses predictive analytics and innovative machine learning models to create value from data. We solve problems across GEICO, from Marketing to Claims and Underwriting, and are responsible for developing and driving strategic modeling initiatives. We see our projects through the entire data science lifecycle, from problem definition to data exploration, data munging, modeling, analysis, and deployment into production systems. We maintain a close partnership with IT to ensure that our models can be deployed quickly and monitored in a flexible deployment framework.

Expected Qualifications:

Advanced degree in a quantitative discipline, such as statistics, data science, computer science, mathematics, engineering, physics, etc. Advanced degree or certification in analytics-related field strongly preferred

5+ years of experience in a quantitative analyst and/or leadership role with 3+ years leading a team of quantitative analysts. Experience leading an Agile team preferred

Demonstrated leadership competencies, including teambuilding, creative problem-solving, flexibility, and willingness to challenge the status quo

Excellent communication, facilitation, and coaching skills in a business context and as it applies to team and project management

Demonstrated experience in influencing business decisions and driving business value

Working experience with analytical modeling tools such as R or Python, predictive modeling, machine learning, experimental design, and AB testing strongly preferred

Completion of an analytical product critique may be required

Please find the full job description here: https://geico.referrals.selectminds.com/jobs/principal-data-scientist-11795",3.4,"GEICO
3.4","Rochester, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1936,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
182,Senior Data Engineer,$93k-$166k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us as a Senior Data Engineer.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

As a Senior Data Engineer, you will providing leadership to complex data analysis, uses and explores data, languages, tools and software to best construct data for predictive modelling, tests the model, trains data to deploy the modelling within a complex R&D, Medical, Mathematical environment and a large complexity of IT systems and data.

OBJECTIVES:

Provides leadership to complex data analysis, uses and explores data, languages, tools and software to best construct data for predictive modelling, tests the model, trains data to deploy the modelling within a complex R&D, Medical, Mathematical environment and a large complexity of IT systems and data.
Manages and influences technical existing and new computer science platforms to design, to analyze and implement complex and new data driven solutions, with an impact on the IT Structure and Architecture.
Interprets and impacts advance techniques in partly structured and unstructured big data across different partner organizations.

ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Manages and influences the data analysis approaches, uses different technologies, big data preparations, programming and loading as well as initial exploration in the process of searching and finding data patterns.
Uses data science input and requests, translates these from data exploration - large record (billions) and unstructured data sets - to mathematic algorithms and uses various tooling from programming languages to new tools (artificial and machine learning) to find data patterns, build and optimize models.
Leads and implements ongoing tests in the search for solutions in the data modelling, collects and prepares the training of data, tones the data, optimizes algorithm implementations to test, scale, and deploy future models.
Conducts and facilitate analytical assessment conceptualizing business needs and translate them into analytical opportunities.
Makes recommendations to design/build/deploy complex data models related to R&D questions independently.
Leads the development of technical roadmaps and approaches for data analyses to find patterns, to design data models, to scale the model to a managed production environment within the current or a technical landscape to develop.
Influences and manages data exploration from analysis to scalable models, works independently and decides quick on transfers in complex data analysis and modelling.
Impacts on IT structure and architecture and provides leadership to this discipline.
Independently use own judgement to identify data requirements and influences the design and implementation of the IS/IT data strategy.
Ensures execution and documentation to Takeda Quality Management System (QMS), suggest adjustments to the Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) and other standards, policies and procedures.
Work independently on tough problems with other team members and independently solve, with little guidance in only most difficult problems.
Leads a team of engineers to deliver analysis and data modelling that fits into the IT landscape.
Coaches or leads lower level engineers and other technical groups.
Maintains up-to-data knowledge on modern data technologies, explores new platforms and beta tooling.
Represent the team while working on project across R&D and commercial. Is internal and external expert to-go-to in how to drive advanced Computer Science and Engineering skills and techniques.
Influences and maintains relationships with partner organizations in support of data analysis, modelling and deployment.

COMPETENCES, EDUCATIONAL AND SKILLS

Required:

Bachelor Degree in Computer Science or equivalent
5+ years’ experience or relevant project / coursework
Ability to write and speak in the English languages
Excellent oral and written communications skills, business acumen and excels in problem solving and analytical skills
Up-to-date specialized knowledge of data wrangling, manipulation and management of technologies to affect change across business units.
Ability to manipulate voluminous data with different degree of structuring across disparate sources to build and communicate actionable insights for internal or external parties.
Possesses strong personal skills to portray information.
Ability to work in an agile and rapid changing environment with high quality deliverables.
Experience with two of the following languages: Java, Scala or Python
Experience with data formats including Parquet, ORC or AVRO
Understanding of Web Services as well as JSON formats
Working knowledge of SQL and Relational Databases
Experience with Multiple NoSQL datastores (Cassandra, MongoDB, Neo4J, …)
Experience using a “Data Lake” environment.
Experience using Spark (Scala or PySpark)
Architectural understanding of Horizontally Scalable solutions

Preferred:

Additional Languages: Chef, R, Javascript
Understanding of AWS (S3, EC2, Redshift, EMR, Athena)
Experience with a Rapid UI tools: EX: Tableau
Experience with any of the following Frameworks: Spring, Django, R Shiny, Tensorflow, MXNet
Understanding or Application of Machine Learning and / or Deep Learning
Experience in a scientific environment.

TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS:

Access to transportation to attend meetings
Ability to fly to meetings regionally and globally, up to 10% of the working time during projects phases

Locations

Cambridge, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
183,Data Scientist (2+ yrs),-1,"Data Scientist uses advanced techniques that integrate traditional and non-traditional datasets to enable analytical solutions; Applies predictive analytics, machine learning, simulation, and optimization techniques to generate management insights and enable customer-facing applications; Builds analytical solutions leveraging internal and external applications to deliver value and create competitive advantage; Leads initiatives and influences system architecture to enable automated intelligent solutions; Translates complex analytical and technical concepts to senior management to enable business decisions; Maintains relationships with academic and industry thought-leaders to ensure enterprise has access to cutting-edge thinking and technologies.

As a *Data Scientist*, you’ll utilize advanced quantitative & statistical analysis techniques to drive business model innovation for our client, and work closely with our senior management to help drive decisions. We are looking for a data scientist with a specialty on Machine learning, neural networks, and iot.
Responsibilities*
· Work with partners to translate business challenges into Data Science problems

· Mine data and extract information in companies Big Data environment.

· Apply machine learning algorithms and statistical techniques to build new product features.

· Mentor other data scientists on your team.

· Help define and drive roadmap for Engagement KPIs based on user behavior and usage patterns correlated with higher engagement and retention.

· Help determine what metrics are critical to the organization, construct predictive models to optimize those metrics, and build out those projects into useful data products
Requirements*
· Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or a related field is required. MS degree preferred

· 2+ years of experience in Data Science/machine learning

· Strong proficiency in querying, manipulating and analyzing large data sets using SQL and/or SQL-like languages.

· Experience with Apache Hadoop and related technology stack like Pig, Hive, Oozie etc.

· AWS, Google Cloud(GCP), or Azure strongly preffered

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $90,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.6,"Ntelicor, L.P.
4.6","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
184,US Data Analyst - MB,$60k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Summary:

At Martin Brower we are on a Journey to change our culture to be more data driven. The Data Analyst will be a key resource on the Data and Analytics team, working on critical Data Analytics efforts. This role is responsible for supporting the development of interactive and actionable dashboards, analyses and reporting through partnership with senior level staff on the Data Analytics team.

Position Responsibilities may include, but not limited to:

Develop, update and maintain the BI dashboards we provided to our brand customers and internal user stakeholders
Help perform ad-hoc data analysis that supports strategic growth and leadership initiatives
Obtain and integrate data from new sources to help expand the breadth and depth of our analyses and resulting insights
Have fun and work with a scrappy, optimistic, energetic new team
Use state-of-the-art technology and programming tools
Collaborate on the roll-out of internal solutions, prioritizing automation
Be encouraging, supportive, kind, fun, sensitive, honest, a great teacher, and above all, a great student
Any other duties as assigned.

Required Skills and Experience:

Bachelor’s degree in relevant field
Strong business orientation with experience deriving value from data.
Knowledge of Business Intelligence tools including, but not limited to, Cognos and Microsoft Power BI.
Experience creating data models, working with Data Warehouse/Data Lake, creating ETL pipelines
At least 3 years of experience in a BI or Data Analytics role, in which the following occurred:
Demonstrated capabilities in building reports and dashboards to meet business needs.
Worked successfully in Customer- and Business-facing roles.
Experience gathering business requirements while influencing decisions to drive change and modernization.
Proven ability to collaborate with IT and business teams.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, with the ability to communicate technical subjects to non-technical audiences.
Strong teamwork and interpersonal skills.
This position must pass a post-offer background and drug test.

Preferred Skills and Experience:

Experience as BI or Data Analyst.
Experience within the distribution or Food Service industry.
Familiarity with data science concepts like machine learning and forecasting models with an ability to explain them to non-technical audiences.
Experience creating moderately complex to advanced SQL queries to explore data.
Experience with the following tools and technology – Snowflake, Azure Data Factory, Azure Data Lake, Azure Bricks, Power BI

Physical Demands and Work Environment:

Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Due to the nature of our business in regard to such things as delivery schedules, order inputs, selection, and Department of Transportation Hours of Service, overtime,
attendance and punctuality are essential job functions. Should an individual in this classification not be able to adhere to this requirement due to a disability, they should contact their Human Resources department to see what, if any, reasonable accommodation may be made.

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, Reyes Holdings companies will recruit and select applicants for employment solely on the basis of their qualifications. Our Practices and Procedures, including those relating to wages, benefits, transfers, promotions, terminations and self-development opportunities, will be administered without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation and gender identity, age, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status and all other classes protected by the Federal and State Government. Drug Free Employer.",3.4,"Martin Brower
3.4","Rosemont, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,1956,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Wholesale,Business Services,$10+ billion (USD),-1
185,"in vitro/in vivo Research Scientist, Musculoskeletal Diseases",$67k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"That's the number of viral gene therapy treatments approved by the FDA and EMA for any neuromuscular disease. Novartis’ AAV gene therapy, approved for the treatment of spinal muscular atrophy, offers patients a transformative option in their fight with this devastating disease. Novartis Institutes for Biomedical Research and the Musculoskeletal disease area are dedicated to development of the next generation of life saving medicines for the world’s most severe medical disorders.
We are seeking a talented and self-motivated scientist to join our preclinical stage research group in Cambridge, MA. As part of a team, the successful candidate will craft and conduct in vitro, ex vivnd o ain vivo studies in support of the discovery and characterization of therapeutics (low molecular weight, biologics and gene therapy) for musculoskeletal and neuromuscular diseases.

Your Key Responsibilities:

• Perform basic molecular biology techniques to support proprietary gene therapy platform technologies for the creation of new therapeutic candidates.
• Apply a diversity of in vitro techniques to identify and validate assays, characterize cellular models of disease and assess preclinical samples for pharmacodynamic biomarkers ex vivo.
• Assist in the generation and/or characterization of rodent models to elucidate disease pathophysiology and efficacy of test articles.
• Generate, analyze and document study results accurately, as well as interpret and present data to cross functional groups.
• Keep current on emergent technologies through literature review and scientific meetings.

What you’ll bring to the role:

• BS, MS, or equivalent degrees in the life sciences with 3-5 years of proven ability, preferably in industry.
• Expertise with in vitro methods including but not limited to molecular and cellular biology.
• Knowledge and hands-on experience in designing and implementing assays (e.g. cell culture, qPCR, IHC/IFC, ELISA, gene and protein analysis, imaging).
• Experience with rodent models of disease (musculoskeletal and/or neuromuscular disease an advantage).
• Ability to document, organize, communicate and present complex data sets to multidisciplinary groups.
• Ability to multi-task, work collaboratively as well as independently, be scientifically curious and self-motivated
• Excellent oral and communication skills, analytical skills and interpersonal skill

Desirable requirements:

• Viral vector techniques
• Experience with in vivo gene therapy delivery

We will ensure that individuals with disabilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation.

Why consider Novartis?

799 million. That’s how many lives our products touch. And while we’re proud of that fact, in this world of digital and technological transformation, we must also ask ourselves this: how can we continue to improve and extend even more people’s lives?

We believe the answers are found when curious, courageous and collaborative people like you are brought together in an inspiring environment. Where you’re given opportunities to explore the power of digital and data. Where you’re empowered to risk failure by taking smart risks, and where you’re surrounded by people who share your determination to tackle the world’s toughest medical challenges.

Imagine what you could do at Novartis!

The Novartis Group of Companies are Equal Opportunity Employers and take pride in maintaining a diverse environment. We do not discriminate in recruitment, hiring, training, promotion or any other employment practices for reasons of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, marital or veteran status, disability, or any other legally protected status.",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
186,Research Scientist Intern,-1,"Job Title
Research Scientist Intern (Summer 2021)

04-Sep-2020

Job Description
Driving success happens daily here. Tokyo Electron America, Inc. employees foster strong partnerships with TEL’s US customer base. We market a wide range of semiconductor production equipment (SPE) products and provide outstanding service and support to U.S. semiconductor device manufacturers. TEL's world-renowned products and technologies support diverse customer needs for the manufacture of increasingly sophisticated semiconductors.
This position will be payrolled via payroll processing provider.
Responsibilities:
Collaborate with other scientists and engineers to identify potential issues and subsequent solutions for advanced semiconductor patterning and etch
Responsibilities include early recognition of industry trends, identification of key patterning problems for future nodes, proposing novel patterning solutions, participating in projects
Communicate project goals and status both internally and externally at customer sites, conferences and consortia workshops
Qualifications:
Pursuing PhD in Chemical engineering or related field
Strong communications skills are considered critical
Must be legally authorized to work in the U.S without sponsorship.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans

State/Province
TX

City
Austin

Subsidiary
Tokyo Electron America, Inc.",4.2,"Tokyo Electron America
4.2","Austin, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1963,Company - Public,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
187,"Research Associate/Scientist, Protein Kinase Assays",-1,"AssayQuant® Technologies, Inc., has an exciting Life Science opportunity to join our rapidly growing team developing novel *Protein Kinase* activity assays and offering Custom Testing Services that enable our clients. Our innovative fluorescence-based sensor technology is exclusively licensed from MIT.
Minimum Requirements*
Bachelor's or advanced degree in biology, chemistry, biochemistry, etc.
Highly motivated and self driven - Thrive in a fast-paced and interdependent working environment
3+ years hands-on experience developing or using quantitative microtiter plate-based assay formats.
Excellent technique including small volume dispensing and attention to detail.
Ability to master new techniques, find solutions and effectively multitask to achieve goals efficiently.
Strong computer skills including Microsoft Office/Access and scientific/data analysis software.
Demonstrated organizational, documentation and oral communication skills with ability to work independently and as a team.
Preferred Skills & Experience - The ideal candidate should have mastered one or more: *
Practical knowledge of fluorescence-based activity assays to assess enzyme kinetics and drug potency.
Familiarity with modern automation instrumentation and software for drug discovery assays.
About Us: *
AssayQuant® Technologies, Inc. (www.assayquant.com; full web site being finalized) is located in Marlborough, MA near I90 & I495 in MetroWest. We are a rapidly growing USA-based provider of innovative Life Science products and services to enable biomedical discovery and drug development. AssayQuant® is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE) and strongly supports diversity in the workplace.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $50,000.00 - $75,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
10 Hour Shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
We have been operational during the pandemic. We follow CDC/WHO guidelines and are able to physically distance at work and wear masks when in close proximity to others. We have not experienced any interruptions in delivering our products and services.

Experience:
running microtiter plate assays: 3 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
What are 3 key reasons why you think we should hire you?
Additional Compensation:
Other forms
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Aggressive -- competitive and growth-oriented
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
www.assayquant.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,AssayQuant Technologies,"Marlboro, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
188,"Director, Data Scientist – Visualization, Novartis AI Innovation Lab",$128k-$208k (Glassdoor Est.),"12-Oct-2020

Job ID
279466BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""Two companies and one incredible alliance.

Novartis and Microsoft have formed alliance to leverage data & Artificial Intelligence (AI) to develop transformative medicines faster and more cost-effectively for patients worldwide.

We are seeking a thought leader and team builder to join the Novartis Innovation AI Lab to advance the field of Life Science and healthcare analytics.

In this newly formed alliance with Microsoft, you will lead Visualization analysis for Novartis .

In this newly created role, you will:
• Conduct end-to-end Visualization analysis of large scale healthcare data sets
• Take a hands-on role and deliver on highly visible multiple projects
• Serve as an ambassador for Novartis Data Science by presenting and publishing articles at conferences, business meetings and academic institutions
• Facilitate design and creation of knowledge repositories
• Collaborate with the digital and DSAI teams
• Keep ahead of latest development in the field and mentor associates
• Inspire others on culture change

Why consider Novartis?

799 million. That’s how many lives our products touch. And while we’re proud of that fact, in this world of digital and technological transformation, we must also ask ourselves this: how can we continue to improve and extend even more people’s lives?

We believe the answers are found when curious, courageous and collaborative people like you are brought together in an inspiring environment. Where you’re given opportunities to explore the power of digital and data. Where you’re empowered to risk failure by taking smart risks, and where you’re surrounded by people who share your determination to tackle the world’s toughest medical challenges.

We are Novartis. Join us and help us reimagine medicine.

Posting Title
Director, Data Scientist – Visualization, Novartis AI Innovation Lab",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
189,Senior Data Scientist,-1,"Senior Data Scientist
Location/City: Any US location (offices in Atlanta, GA and Playa Vista, CA)

Responsibilities
We are looking for a sharp, highly-motivated Senior Data Scientist to join our team. This is a high-impact role that will leverage data & analytics to derive insights from our Members’ data and make recommendations to help improve their financial wellbeing. You will collaborate with product, and engineering as well as executive stakeholders to create analytical solutions to help achieve business goals. An ideal candidate is an individual who has a deep background in statistics, analysis, experiment design, and can bring those skills to bear in a start-up environment. A strong understanding and hands-on ability with data science technology and infrastructure is important as well.
As the Senior Data Scientist, you will:
Work with large volumes of bank transactions to create proprietary intelligence about the nature of employment and earnings for our Members
Help build out our job recommendation engine to aid our Members in finding new or additional work to increase their income
Help drive a data-first culture where data is understood and leveraged in decision making
Collaborate with the data science team and CDO to define the technical strategy for Steady’s data science ecosystem
Develop and codify processes and best practices for modeling, testing, and analytics
Effectively balance short term delivery with long term direction and value
Advocate for data science innovation and increased contribution to Steady’s mission

Skills & Requirements
Advanced degree and relevant experience (MS + 5 years, PhD + 3 years) in statistics, mathematics, computer science, or similar field
Demonstrated experience creating production ML pipelines (training, scoring, leveraging in real-time systems)
Expert knowledge of modern machine learning algorithms (regression, classification, random forests, clustering, optimization, etc.) and statistical inference
Experience with bank or credit card transaction data preferred
Experience with NLP and textual data analysis is a plus
Demonstrated experience of efficient manipulation and storage of large datasets
Hands on experience and expertise with SQL, Spark, Python (preferred) or R
Experience with machine learning platforms Sagemaker/Databricks a plus
Strong data visualization skills (experience with Tableau preferred)
Familiarity and experience with the AWS data ecosystem (S3, AWS Glue, EMR, etc.)
Excellent verbal and written communication skills with the ability to interact at all levels of the organization
Comfortable working with distributed teams across multiple offices and timezones
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial, high-energy environment


Benefits
We value our Steady Team Members and are committed to their success. We are located in downtown Atlanta near MARTA, as well as in Playa Vista CA. We offer competitive compensation packages and a 100% company-paid benefits package including medical, dental, and vision. Steady is a relaxed, casual work environment with flexible hours and lunch provided once weekly in addition to a weekly meal stipend. We also offer a generous PTO plan, 401K, and future growth opportunities within the company. We strive to maintain a positive and fun environment for our employees where people can learn and grow with the company.
About Steady
Steady is a mission-driven business that helps people earn more. Through the free Steady app users can build & track income, networks, and buying power – allowing them to augment retirement savings, work around childcare responsibilities, pay down debt, save for purchases, and supplement their income from primary employers, while limiting their income volatility and better positioning themselves for access to a sustainable financial services ecosystem.
Every Steady member will build something different. We celebrate those who take the initiative to create a path that works for them. Whatever that looks like, Steady is there to support it, providing a stable foundation that allows people to build financial success over a lifetime.

Mission: Steady turns the tables by putting workers back in charge of their financial future with an income-building platform that creates financial stability and helps its users to take charge of their future.

For more information, visit us at www.steadyapp.com or on Twitter @TheSteadyApp.

Steady, Platform Inc. (Steady) is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer – All qualified applicants/employees will receive consideration for employment without regard to that individual’s age, race, color, religion or creed, national origin or ancestry, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, physical or mental disability, veteran status, genetic information, ethnicity, citizenship, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Statement to ALL Third-Party Agencies and Similar Organizations: Steady accepts resumes only from agencies with which we formally engage their services. Please do not forward resumes to our applicant tracking system, Steady employees, Steady hiring manager, or send to any Steady facility. Steady is not responsible for any fees or charges associated with unsolicited resumes.",4.0,"Steady
4.0","Atlanta, GA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
190,Business Intelligence Analyst,$46k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: Senior Business Intelligence Analyst

Join a team where you can be an integral part of Aptean’s success.

The Who, What, Where And Why

Aptean is seeking a Senior Business Intelligence Analyst to work with the Business Operations team to continuously design, build and evolve our data reporting capabilities – all in an environment of rapid growth and increasing complexity. In this role, you will have the opportunity to incubate data solutions and help build Aptean’s centralized data platform by partnering with teams across different verticals to drive data reporting efficiency and performance insights to key stakeholders.

As a Senior Business Intelligence Analyst, you'll contribute technical skills, business judgment, and creativity to build automated data solutions that provide these strategic insights. You'll take initiative and work well in environments with multiple cross-functional stakeholders and differing priorities. Additionally, you'll contribute people skills and drive to provide training and support to team members and partners. You'll lead complex, multi-disciplinary projects using your data warehousing and analytics expertise, manage project schedules, identifying risks, and clearly communicating them to project stakeholders. You're equally at home explaining your analyses and recommendations to executives as you are discussing the technical trade-offs in product development with engineers.

Who?

We are looking for someone with:

· 3-5 years of related work experience

· Experience with Data Analysis and Visualization of Power BI Dashboards

· Experience with data integration of Power BI with Salesforce.com, SQL Server and Excel (including VBA, Macros, Pivot Tables, array functions, Power Pivots, etc)

We’d like this person to have the following skills/abilities
Experience working within a high-growth, technology company
Able to operate successfully in a lean, fast-paced organization
Strong written and verbal communication skills, with a track record of supporting a variety of stakeholders
Exhibits sound business judgment and a proven track record of taking ownership, leading data-driven analyses, and providing clear answers to complex problems
Motivated self-starter, proactive and action-oriented
· Take charge mentality with a track record and ability to “get things done”
Strong problem solving and collaboration skills
Experience in prioritization of deliverables and tasks
What?

In this role, you would:

Responsible for designing, developing, and deploying Business Analytics Dashboards using Microsoft BI technologies including SQL Server, Power BI, Excel etc.

1. Responsible for designing, developing, and deploying Business Analytics Dashboards using Microsoft BI technologies including SQL Server, Power BI, Excel etc.

2. Analyze and leverage external data sources like Salesforce to integrate with existing datasets and relate a comprehensive BI story.

3. Build compelling, interactive and actionable reporting on top of structured data models that helps in deriving meaningful business insights from large, complex datasets.

4. Supporting the full BI lifecycle from requirements analysis through design & development, and through release and support/maintenance phases.

5. Gather requirements and design reports/custom analysis tools for the Executive Leadership Team.

6. Some of the reports that will be required but not limited to this set are:

- Daily/weekly/monthly performance reports for key performance indicators and provide analytics on them.

- KPI reports for monthly/quarterly/annual forecasting for Business Reviews.

- Gather, publish & maintain information related to historical, current and future performance.

- Compile and analyze data on historical sales and trends to forecast future trends.

7. Collaborate on identified ad hoc business problem-solving requests.

8. Train team members/users on Power BI tool, dashboards and reports, as required by leadership team.

Why?

In this role you will work on a great team that values self-motivation, attention to detail, and effective communication. This team is fast-paced and cooperative.

Aptean is where go-getters with strong problem solving skills can thrive. We provide learning opportunities across the company so that you can build and advance your career here no matter your background. Each and every one of us has a different story and different strengths. We are a dynamic company that cares about our 1,700 employees as much as our customers, and our leadership team believes in finding and retaining awesome people.

To promote health and wellness, Aptean employees are provided with competitive compensation, robust benefits beginning day-one, and a self-managed PTO policy. Our open-office environment and modern breakroom allow people to get to know each other from across departments.

Where?

This position will be located in our corporate headquarters in Alpharetta, GA at 4325 Alexander Dr #100, Alpharetta, GA 30022. You will enjoy our perks: mini-mart for snacks, drinks, and quick lunches, modern breakroom that allows people to get to know employees from other departments, monthly birthday celebrations, massages, monthly food trucks and breakfasts – all provided in an open-office environment. What you will also get to experience is a company that believes in the power of working collaboratively and winning together; that strives to balance work and home life, that seeks and hires teams of motivated go-getters, understands that this is a marathon, not a sprint; that continuously and purposefully builds an inclusive culture where everyone is able to do and be the best version of themselves. We seek people who naturally demonstrate our values, who are challenged by problems, empower others to thrive, people who can draw the owl and not be beholden to one playbook.

About Us
Aptean is a private-equity backed software company that connects companies in specific industries with specialized software solutions. In today’s fast-paced, highly competitive economy, organizations don’t have time to waste forcing homegrown software, spreadsheets, and one-size-fits-all solutions to do things they were never designed to do. Aptean is on a mission to end those workarounds with streamlined industry-specific software solutions. That’s why over 4,100+ highly specialized organizations in more than 20 industries and 54 countries rely on us to simplify their everyday operations.

If you are looking for a company where you can give your best, work collaboratively, and build your career, we encourage you to submit an application!

Aptean, Inc., is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer. In accordance with applicable federal, state, and local laws we do not tolerate discrimination or harassment against any applicant for employment or employee with Aptean because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, genetic information, or any other group status protected by applicable law.",3.2,"Aptean
3.2","Alpharetta, GA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
191,"Associate Scientist/Scientist, Rare Genetic Disease Biology",$62k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Associate Scientist/Scientist, Rare Genetic Disease Biology
Location


Agios Pharmaceuticals HQ

Job Code

1293

# of openings

1

Apply Now

Associate Scientist/Scientist, Rare Genetic Disease Biology

Agios (agios.com) is a biopharmaceutical company committed to applying our scientific leadership in cellular metabolism to transform the lives of patients with cancer and rare genetic diseases. We are growing rapidly with an active research and discovery pipeline across both therapeutic areas. Agios has two approved oncology precision medicines and multiple first-in-class investigational therapies in clinical and/or preclinical development.

Agios Pharmaceuticals is searching for a dynamic and motivated Associate Scientist/Scientist to join our growing Rare Genetic Disease (RGD) Biology group. Candidates should have a strong background in Molecular & Cell Biology, as well as proficient experience in a specific disease area, such as Neurobiology or Metabolic Disease. S/he will be responsible for the design and execution of cell biology experiments for the identification and validation of novel RGD drug targets, while developing phenotypic and mechanistic cell-based assays to test compound structure/activity relationships. The successful candidate will have the opportunity to interact and collaborate with scientists in other cross-functional departments, including biochemistry, metabolomics, pharmacology, and chemistry within an energetic team environment.

Key Responsibilities
Work in close collaboration with Agios scientists to conduct research in a dynamic, highly-collaborative and fast-paced environment
Discover and validate novel therapeutic targets using RNAi/AAV and/or small-molecule inhibitor modalities using in vitro and in vivo models of disease.
Develop and characterize cell-based models and assays to be used in target validation studies and/or medium-throughput screening campaigns.
Communicate research findings in cross-functional project team meetings.
Review literature and identify methods/technologies to facilitate research and the development of novel targeting strategies for RGD indications
Minimum Requirements
PhD + 1-3 yrs academic or industry experience in Cell & Molecular Biology, Neurobiology, Metabolism, Genetics, or similar field
Exceptional cell biology techniques (particularly mammalian cell culture, including primary cells)
Experience in standard protein and molecular biology techniques (nucleic acid purification, PCR, gel electrophoresis, Western blotting, and qPCR)
Ability to design and execute experiments, analyze, and interpret results with minimal supervision
Proven ability to work well and collaborate with others, both in small group and cross-functional team settings
Excellent problem-solving ability, organization skills, and ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment
Must possess excellent communication skills and be comfortable presenting data in small group as well as larger formal settings
Preferred Qualifications
Prior experience working on rare genetic or metabolic diseases desirable, but not required
Experience in lysosomal storage disorders would be a plus",4.2,"Agios Pharmaceuticals
4.2","Cambridge, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
192,CMC Scientist / Staff Engineer - Biologics,$71k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us as a CMC Scientist/Staff Engineer in our Boston Area office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Futureto people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

As a CMC Scientist / Staff Engineer working on the Biologics Process Development Purification team, you will be empowered to develop purification strategies for novel biologics and see them to fruition in the lab and in manufacturing In this role, you will contribute to Takeda’s mission by bringing lifesaving biologics to a diverse patient population .

POSITION OBJECTIVES:

Provides theoretical/conceptual input to the design, development and execution of research assignments for a specific project or projects within the functional area.
Independently plans and executes most unit operation characterization and optimization experiments within expertise and develops an awareness of unit operations in other areas.
Responsible for significant or sole technical leadership within project or complex study.
Prepares technology transfer documentation and regulatory documents or coordinates with team members to ensure execution.
Represents line functions on GCT teams as appropriate/necessary.
Proactively identifies process or study issues/challenges and proposes potential resolutions.
Manage external collaboration such CMOs and partners.

POSITION ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Provides technical leadership to project teams within area of expertise and commits resources to execute specific project tasks.
Contributes significantly and independently to project work which may include multiple projects within functional area.
Reviews, interprets and communicates data cross-functionally within CMC and project teams.
Plans and implements resolutions to technical problems/issues
Serves as a technical resource for junior staff and leverages expertise in laboratory technology as a functional resource/trainer.
Independently designs and executes experiments, and reports results
Builds and maintains relationships with key vendors and assists with technical aspects of vendor negotiations
Responsible for integrating scientific/technical efforts around cross-functional issues

Coordinate and consult with CMOs and partners on mission critical projects

EDUCATION, BEHAVIORAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS:

PhD in Chemical engineering, Chemistry, Biology, Engineering or related pharmaceutical science; 2+ years relevant industry experience
Masters degree in chemistry, biology, pharmacy, engineering or related pharmaceutical science; 6+ years relevant industry experience
Bachelors degree in chemistry, biology, pharmacy, engineering or related pharmaceutical science and 8+ years relevant industry experience
Extensive experience in CMC pharmaceutical development for active pharmaceutical ingredients and drug products under cGMP’s
Sound knowledge of current Good Manufacturing Practices (cGMP)
Previous experience with the use of contract facilities
Experience in working in a multi-disciplinary team environment

TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS:

May require approximately 10% - 20% travel.

WHAT TAKEDA CAN OFFER YOU:

401(k) with company match and Annual Retirement Contribution Plan
Tuition reimbursement Company match of charitable contributions
Health & Wellness programs including onsite flu shots and health screenings
Generous time off for vacation and the option to purchase additional vacation days

Empowering Our People to Shine

Discover more at takedajobs.com

No Phone Calls or Recruiters Please.

#LI-AA1

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
193,ENVIRONMENTAL ENGINEER/SCIENTIST,Employer Provided Salary:$25-$28 Per Hour,"McPhail Associates, LLC is a geotechnical and geoenvironmental engineering consulting firm located in Cambridge, Massachusetts within walking distance of Davis Square. We are currently seeking an entry to mid-level environmental engineer/scientist. The successful candidate will work with a dedicated team of geotechnical and geoenvironmental engineers, geologists and scientists on projects involving environmental due diligence, environmental regulatory compliance, subsurface explorations, and the assessment and remediation of soil and groundwater impacted by oil and hazardous materials. McPhail Associates offers a robust benefits package and opportunity for advancement.
Responsibilities:
Preparation of ASTM Phase I and II Environmental Site Assessments.
Preparation of dewatering permit applications.
Preparation of state and federal regulatory compliance reports.
Preparation of chemical testing data tables.
Preparation of soil disposal pre-characterization reports and soil disposal facility profiles.
Planning and executing subsurface explorations.
Sampling of soil, groundwater, soil gas, and indoor air.
Occasional field monitoring of subsurface explorations, storage tank removals, and environmental remediation.
Interact and communicate with staff, clients and subcontractors.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Environmental Science, Civil Engineering or related field.
3-5 years experience preparing ASTM Phase I and II Environmental Site Assessments and MCP submittals.
Strong technical writing and excellent verbal communication skills.
Current 10-hour OSHA Construction Industry Training or 40-hour HAZWOPER training is preferred.
Knowledge of the Massachusetts Contingency Plan (MCP) is preferred.
Computer Skills - Microsoft Office and Bluebeam Revu
Please send resume to McPhail Associates, LLC c/o careers@mcphailgeo.com",3.3,"Mcphail Associates
3.3","Cambridge, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1976,Company - Private,Construction,"Construction, Repair & Maintenance",Less than $1 million (USD),-1
194,"Scientist 2, Data Analytics",$65k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Areté Associates seeks highly motivated, technically talented and intellectually agile individuals to perform challenging and important work in the areas of signature discovery and exploitation algorithms; detection, classification and tracking algorithms; and design, analysis and performance optimization of robust, real-world advanced analytics software solutions.

The Data Analytics group at Areté has position openings for entry- to mid-level research scientists at our headquarters in Northridge, California.

Roles and Responsibilities:

Conceive, design, prototype and implement advanced algorithms aimed at generating solutions to critical problems

Assess algorithm performance on real-world data

Support multiple projects throughout the company

Engage customers and collaborators to provide technical results and recommendations

Document results via written reports, briefings and well-commented code

Required Qualifications:

Bachelor’s, Master’s or PhD degree in physical sciences, engineering, or mathematics with 0-8 years’ experience

Ability to quickly pick up “on the fly” new skills and develop expertise necessary to provide the best possible solution

Experience in scientific programming using Python, C++, Matlab, or similar high-level languages

Excellent interpersonal communications, technical writing, and briefing skills

Ability to work with minimal supervision and collaborate on small teams

Agility to work multiple potentially disparate projects simultaneously

Proven capability to develop creative solutions to complex technical problems

Intellectual curiosity and high motivation to solve challenging problems

U.S. citizenship and ability to acquire a security clearance

Desired Qualifications:

Experience in any of the following areas: machine learning, including artificial intelligence and deep learning; data analysis, statistical signal processing, spectroscopy, bioinformatics, data fusion, natural language processing, algorithm development

Experience with the Department of Defense (DoD) or the Intelligence Community (IC)

Current security clearance

Areté Associates offers an excellent compensation and a full benefits package. U.S. citizenship, background screen and drug test are required to meet position eligibility. Please submit your resume on-line at: http://www.arete.com

Areté Associates is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex including sexual orientation and gender identity, national origin, disability, protected Veteran Status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.

If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran, you have the right to request an accommodation if you are unable or limited in your ability to use or access our career center as a result of your disability. To request an accommodation, contact a Arete Associates Human Resources Representative.

Areté will consider for employment-qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of the Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring.

#IND123

Back Share
Apply Now",3.7,"Areté
3.7","Northridge, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
195,"Scientist, Research",$61k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

JDRF is the leading global organization focused on type 1 diabetes (T1D) research. Through research, advocacy, partnerships and outreach, JDRF is racing to find cures for tomorrow while striving to improve the lives of those with T1D today. JDRF positions its scientific resources, policy influence and strategic working plan to bring life-changing breakthroughs from therapeutic concepts to the community. As the largest charitable supporter of T1D research, JDRF has invested nearly $2B in research and is funding scientific research and clinical trials in 17 countries worldwide. For more information, please visit http://www.jdrf.org.

Job Description

JDRF will be hiring multiple scientists to manage diverse aspects of our research portfolio. You will be part of a highly interconnected and fast-moving team that is responsible for setting and driving the global research agenda for type 1 diabetes.

These research scientists will be responsible for building and actively managing a research portfolio of grants. The candidates will serve as internal experts in their specialty areas and function as a knowledge resource internally and externally. Due diligence and landscape analyses activities are a requisite part of this active portfolio management. Our mission is highly translationally focused on type 1 diabetes so the candidate should have a strong interest in public health and understand the basic concepts of product development and translational research.

The candidates will be expected to have excellent interpersonal and communication skills to interact effectively with all stakeholders – internal and external scientists, board members, senior management, JDRF supporters, etc. The qualified individual will directly contribute to the implementation, oversight, and advancement of research projects and activities in several programs.

These scientist positions will report to Associate Directors and above, and will participate in all aspects of the JDRF research program including providing scientific input to accelerate the progress of therapeutic areas, contributing to future research strategies aligned with JDRF’s mission, and leveraging opportunities and optimizing relationships within the US and international diabetes research communities.

SPECIFIC RESPONSIBILITIES:

· Strategy and Planning

o Contribute to the regular assessment, review, and presentation of the status of the research portfolio to the Board of Directors and external scientific advisors.

o Work closely with the program administrators to plan, track, and execute on the research budget.

o Contribute expertise to strategic planning efforts across multiple project areas.

o Perform ongoing landscape analyses in areas of relevance to the research department’s therapeutic goals both inside and outside of your area of expertise.

· Review and Oversight

o Development of new research opportunities with internal and external stakeholders (academic scientists, industry partners, etc.)

o Management of external peer review of funding opportunities.

o Active management of ongoing funding opportunities towards early go/no go decisions.

o Opportunity to participate in scouting, securing, and managing research partnerships with companies, other non-profits, governmental agencies, etc.

· Communication

o Generation and presentation of summary documents to lay and/or expert stakeholders.

o Generation of content for public media outlets in collaboration with internal Marketing and Communications team.

o Presentation of JDRF Research and priorities and special topics to both lay and expert audiences.

Qualifications
Ph.D. in biomedical sciences - pharmacology, physiology, cell biology, nutrition/metabolism, public health, biochemistry - or similar field required.
Post-doctoral experience (1-2 years) in disease focused or product development areas desired but not required
Working expertise in one of the following areas is highly desirable:
Experience in the mechanisms of human disease, especially autoimmune disease
Medicinal chemistry, pharmacology, early stage product development
Knowledge of T1D clinical trials and T1D outcomes
Data science/analytics, big data warehousing
Public Health, epidemiology
Psychosocial and quality-of-life aspects of disease, including behavioral health interventions, mental health, patient reported outcomes
· Ability to create, operate and innovate within highly connected team environments with high level of independence

· Ability to handle multiple tasks and meet deadlines demonstrated by strong organizational skills and a detail-oriented nature. Establish priorities in fast-paced environment. Must be a fast learner.

· Exceptional collaboration and relationship-building skills. Ability to interface with stakeholders of highly diverse backgrounds such as all staff and volunteers. Must develop, maintain, and cultivate relationships.
Demonstrate creativity and ability to think strategically regarding scientific and technical opportunities or roadblocks and to conceive and execute on projects
Ability for and interest in developing expertise in new scientific areas
Excellent written and oral communication skills.
Additional Information

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.

#LI remote",3.0,"JDRF International
3.0","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1970,Nonprofit Organization,Health Fundraising Organizations,Non-Profit,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
196,Data Engineer,$48k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Data Engineer you will spend your days finding ways to unlock value from large sets of data in an Azure environment in support of executive decision making and daily operations. You'll do so as part of a complete product team including user experience designers, business analysts, and software engineers/developers. You'll do so in a modern data science tech stack of open source tools and cloud services.

Experience and Education

Skills/Experience:

Support and develop data flows by developing processes that verify, standardize, and scale data input, transformation, and storage.
Expert knowledge in Data Migration, Data transfer, and SQL query script writing.
Self-starter and quick learner that is capable of finishing Data interface projects with minimal supervision.
Collaborate with Data Analysts, Visualization Experts, and Customer-facing advisors to support and develop our data and analytics reporting offerings.
Research and implement cutting edge solutions to solve challenges related to ETL/ELT, data processing, and analytics.
Support efforts by the Data Science and Data Analytics teams.
Discover non-functional requirements, risks, and enterprise strategy deviations while working with project teams.
Identify appropriate data sources for application use.
Profile and analyze data.
Create or validate system context diagrams, logical data models, and integration designs.
Generate data flow diagrams (DFD).
Create or validate data mappings.
Ensure new data sources, mappings, and models are correctly captured in enterprise repositories.
Conduct technical reviews to ensure the application data models and flows have been correctly implemented.
Participate in Integration/System testing.
Discover non-functional requirements, risks, and enterprise strategy deviations while working with project teams.
Identify appropriate data sources for application use.
Profile and analyze data.
Create or validate system context diagrams, logical data models, and integration designs.
Generate data flow diagrams (DFD).
Create or validate data mappings.
Ensure new data sources, mappings, and models are correctly captured in enterprise repositories.
Automate the external data interfaces and the Power Automate flows to replace manual steps.

Desirable Skills/Experience:

Experience with modern data structure design and data engineering.
Experience with Azure Data Factory, COSMOS, Azure SQL, Azure Synapse Platform and Data Lakes and Data Warehouse tools and technology.
A drive to learn and share knowledge about emerging data science tools and practices.
3-7 years of relevant experience.
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or similar.
Ability to obtain a USCIS Public Trust Clearance.

Benefits and unique perks offered, but not limited to:
Medical, Dental, and Vision Insurance
Flexible Spending Accounts (FSA)
401(k) Matching Program
10 Paid Holidays
Paid Time Off (PTO)
Short-Term and Long-Term Disability
Basic and Voluntary Life Insurance
Education Assistance Program
Award Incentive Programs: Leader of the Year, Employee of the Quarter, Energy Award
Scholarship Award Program
Referral Incentive Program
Employee Longevity Recognition

JANUS Research Group provides reasonable accommodation so that qualified applicants with a disability may participate in the selection process. Please advise us of any accommodations you request in order to express interest in a position by e-mailing:

Judy Pagac
Director of Human Resources
judy.pagac@janusresearch.com
(706) 364-9100

Please state your request for assistance in your message. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a specific position within JANUS Research Group will be reviewed at the e-mail address and phone number supplied. Thank you for considering a career with JANUS Research Group.

Janus Research Group participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify link below for more information.",3.5,"JANUS Research Group
3.5","Evans, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
197,"Fermentation Scientist/Sr Scientist, Microbe Research, RTP",$72k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"Fermentation Scientist/Sr Scientist, Microbe Research, RTP, NC

Pioneer a brighter future
At Novozymes, we work in close partnership with our customers and the global community to make an impact and help create a better world. For those around us, for each other and for the next generation. We use science to advance industries, and as part of R&D, you will create and develop the biological answers that will pave the way for a brighter future.

Fermentation Scientist/Sr Scientist, Microbe Research, RTP

Do you want to work in an environment in which creativity and challenging the status quo is as valued as scientific excellence? If so, you could be our new colleague in the Microbe Research Fermentation Group, an ambitious team of scientists and researchers based in Research Triangle Park, NC. Working within the Fermentation Technology Department, you’ll have responsibility for contributing to technologically advanced fermentation methods for a wide diversity of microbes.
You take natural leadership driving projects forward with focus on cross-functional collaborations and customer needs.
In your daily work, you’ll use these talents to pioneer research and transform it into business value for our customers.

In this position you need to:

Have a PhD with in chemical or biological engineering or a closely related discipline with 2 years’ experience or master’s with 5 years’ experience
Experience in industry preferred
Have had direct hands on experience working in industry in a microbiology lab with knowledge and experience with microbial fermentation in bioreactors
Ability to create novel fermentation methods for diverse microbes
Be a proven team player with outstanding communication skills
Ability to work with statistics and data science, visualization and presentation
Project management experience preferred, with people management potential
Ability to work in the United States currently and in the future without sponsorship

Are you the next Zymer in our team? Consider a career with Novozymes and let’s unfold your potential together.

Rethink Tomorrow

Novozymes is the world leader in biological solutions. Together with customers, partners and the global community, we improve industrial performance while preserving the planet’s resources and helping build better lives. As the world’s largest provider of enzyme and microbial technologies, our bioinnovation enables higher agricultural yields, low-temperature washing, energy-efficient production, renewable fuel and many other benefits that we rely on today and in the future. We call it Rethink Tomorrow. www.novozymes.com
Novozymes is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. All employment decisions are based on business needs without regard to race, color, ethnicity, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, age, disability or veteran status.

Application deadline: 23 October 2020",3.8,"Novozymes
3.8","Research Triangle Park, NC",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
198,"Engineering Manager, Data Science and Data Engineering",$102k-$181k (Glassdoor Est.),"What do we do?

At Teachers Pay Teachers (TpT), we're unlocking the power of educator-created content. More than 3 out of 4 teachers in the U.S., Canada, and Australia come to TpT every year to get teacher-tested, engaging, and rigorous materials. What began as a humble exchange for teachers looking to share lesson plans has since exploded into a massive online marketplace where teachers have created 4 million resources for all aspects of PreK-12 education. More than six million educators worldwide (including teachers, administrators, and parents) have downloaded TpT resources more than a billion times. According to Fast Company, Teachers Pay Teachers is one of the top 50 Most Innovative Companies in the world in 2019. If you haven't heard of TpT yet and want to learn more, just ask a teacher.

Role:

The Platform engineering teams are at the core of TpT Engineering. We build the infrastructure, services and tooling that power our rapidly growing TpT marketplace. In this role, you will be supporting and growing two teams that focus on internal users mostly outside of Engineering -- Data Engineering and Data Science.

As the manager for Data Engineering and Data Science, you will scale the teams, drive their roadmaps, help establish their philosophy, and manage their relationships with other teams. Our data teams work closely with the Analytics, Product, Marketing, and Engineering teams. Data Engineering focuses on enabling teams to be data-driven by ensuring reliable, efficient, accurate, and curated data. Data Science uses research techniques such as statistical modeling and machine learning to explore data, test hypotheses, identify underlying causes and patterns, and find the best ways to turn these insights into product improvements.

Responsibilities:
Lead, recruit, and manage data engineers and data scientists from entry level individual contributors to expert level managers
Evolve the teams' processes as we launch new products and the company grows
Provide expertise in data warehousing, systems integration, and rapid software development
Support team members with architecture-level and code-level feedback
Manage stakeholder relationships and dependencies; work with technical leads on your teams to determine priorities and requirements
Qualities for a successful candidate:
4+ years of management experience leading high performing data engineering or data science teams tackling difficult problems; 8+ years of total experience
Strong communicator who can crisply explain complex technical concepts.
Collaborates with product managers, community relations, and other engineering leaders in the org.
Comfortable with lean engineering and agile project management practices with a track record of successfully managing and delivering several large projects.
Able to proactively identify ways in which to improve the quality, timeliness and reliability of data
Expertise with modern data warehouse design patterns and tools
Experience using event-tracking data to explain user behavior on web sites, including A/B testing.
Comfortable with SQL and large, complex relational databases (both transactional and analytical)
Extra credit for:
Knowledge of R or Python for data science, including reproducible research tools, data processing, exploration and visualization, and statistical modeling.
Statistical and mathematical depth equivalent to a Masters in Applied Statistics, Applied Math, Economics, or closely related quantitative field, either from a degree program or experience.
Experience with edtech, eCommerce and/or marketplaces
Extracurriculars:
Parental leave for both mothers and fathers to be able to take some quality time in bonding with their new addition to their family
Comprehensive Medical & Dental Benefits
Mother's Room
Quiet Room
Company Events (Bring Your Child to Work Day, Field Day, Camp TpT, Hackathons etc.)
Here at TpT we value Diversity & Inclusion and encourage people to bring their most authentic selves to work. We cultivate an environment where people are recognized and celebrated for their individuality.

Any TpT applicant who requires reasonable accommodations during the interview process can contact the TpT People Ops Team (accommodations@teacherspayteachers.com) to make the need for an accommodation known.

Finally, if you're a California resident, California law requires that we provide you notice about the collection and use of your personal information. We encourage you to read it carefully. You can find our full notice here.",4.9,"Teachers Pay Teachers
4.9","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
199,Research Scientist (Computational Biology),$82k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"IDL-US works on the state-of-the-art deep generative models for natural language / speech / music. In particular, we are interested in the novel architecture & methodology for modeling very long sequence. The applications include language modeling with long context, music generation etc.

Job Duties:

Conduct cutting-edge research by applying advanced AI technologies in the computational biology and biomedical field. Strengthen the position of Baidu as a leading company in AI research. Conduct research on protein structure prediction, protein design, and AI-powered drug discovery. Compete with top computational research teams and publish peer reviewed articles in top journals and publications.

Qualifications:
PhD degree in computer science, computational biology, bioinformatics or related fields.
Must have experience in each of the following:
Strong skills in algorithms and coding;
At least two (2) years of experience in deep learning;
Published papers in top conferences or journals;
Research experience in computational biology.
Development experience in C++.
Culture Fit:
Mission alignment: If you want to be part of a team to accomplish this great mission, we will provide you the best possible platform to do that.
Self­-directed: We work best with people that are driven, motivated, and aspire to greatness. Are you the sort of person that, if you had time on your hands, will independently find interesting and useful things to do?
Hungry to learn: We are eager to see you learn new skills and grow. But learning is hard work and this is something we hope you want to do.
Team orientation: We work in small, fast­-moving teams. We don't believe in lone wolves. We watch out for each other and go after big goals together as a team.",4.2,"Baidu USA
4.2","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
